MARCH 13, 2020.
Prologue.
Raven.
I felt Ajax’s eyes on me before I saw him. I glanced out the floor to-ceiling window of the living room. There he was—all six feet of him—
standing outside the beautiful Upper West Side brownstone, his gaze
transfixed on me.
I knew this day would come, but that didn’t make it easier.
Ajax grinned and strutted lazily to the front door. Even through the window,
I concluded his shoulders to be broader than I remembered, indicative of a
strict gym routine. He dressed well, his defined body outlined through the
thin material of his white shirt. Experience told me his clothes were
expensive. His black suit hugged him in all the right places and the jacket
was left unbuttoned without a tie. Ajax had an air about him. One that
screamed, I barely put effort into looking good. When we were younger, my
friends swooned over his athletic physique, rigid jawline, dark brown hair,
and green eyes. I’d hoped he aged horribly into his twenties—maybe
developed a bald spot or became fat—but no such luck.
The asshole was still the epitome of male beauty. I bet Ajax’s popularity
with the female demographic hadn’t changed, and they probably fell at his
feet.
However, his charms didn’t work on me because I knew better. Ajax might
be blessed with an angel’s face, but he was evil incarnate and had made my
life dark. He was Lucifer, the Devil, disguised beautifully to trick mortal
women.
He was my worst nightmare.
My mental preparations weren’t enough to overcome the frozen panic
engulfing me as Ajax opened the front door. My first instinct was to run
upstairs and lock myself in my childhood bedroom. The second was to take
off my red bottoms and hit his cocky face with the pencil-sharp heel. Maybe
it would puncture one of his eyes, and he’d be scarred like he had scarred
me. The thought brought a smile to my face, but I suppressed it. Instead, I
focused on the game plan to freeze him and act nonchalantly.
Apathy wounded him more than rage or sorrow. Anger, fear, trepidation,
and tears were the result of some form of emotion. He got off on my
feelings. It was my apathy that he couldn’t control or tolerate. I planned to
throw him off by consistently dismissing him. He could exist or not exist.
He was part of the environment, like the furniture. It wasn’t the most
creative game plan, but it was the best I could do without telling Reid or our
parents about what he’d done. That would cost me more than I could bear.
With my thoughts rampant, I lost sight of the fact that the Devil had flung
open the door and was headed toward me. He stopped to look at me with an
unreadable expression. I finished my last day at work and was in a black
cocktail dress paired with nude pumps. The dress was conservative with a
jacket, but since I took off the coat, the halter exposed more skin than I’d
planned to show.
Ajax continued to stare at me for what seemed like an eternity. The intensity
in his gaze made the most confident people squirm. However, I glared back,
hoping to give nothing away.
“Rave.”
I didn’t respond, leveling him with my best, Oh, it’s you, expression. But
when he started toward me, my body tensed, followed by trembling.
“How have you been?” he asked warmly as if we were old talking pals.
My mind went blank when he stood close enough for his familiar musky
scent to waft into my nostrils. The smell used to bring me comfort. Now, it
was a reminder of my horrors. Instead of answering, I tried to throw him
off.
“Ajax,” I said coolly. “Come in. Would you like a drink?”
“You’re inviting me to my own home and offering me a drink? Shouldn’t I
be the one offering you a drink?” He raised an eyebrow.
“Okay. Get me a drink.”
He grinned at my attempt to turn the tables. I wanted to slap the cocky
smile off his face. Instead, I gave him my drink order.
“I’ll take a dry martini with orange bitters and a lemon twist. Olives will do
if you don’t have lemons. I prefer it in a chilled glass. You can probably
chill the glass in the ice bucket.”
I held my facial expression as he gave me another amused look. Ajax was
polite and would comply with playing host. I was never going to make that
motherfucker a drink. This was a power struggle, and I wanted him to cater
to me.
Ajax shrugged off his jacket and draped it over the back of a living room
chair. His body appeared more muscular than my initial assumption,
reminding me how quickly he could overcome me.
He waved out an arm, motioning toward the kitchen. “After you.”
We walked to the kitchen island with a built-in liquor shelf. I kept a safe
distance, not daring to underestimate the risks of my predicament. The
pepper spray in my pocket was a solemn reminder that I was no longer
trusting or naive. Staying at this house was far from ideal. It was my last
resort.
Rent in New York City was absurd, even for the shitty basement I shared
with two girls. I had a full-time, unpaid internship Monday through Friday
and worked as a bartender after work and on weekends. I was exhausted
from the seventy-hour work week and could barely scrape enough cash for
food and rent. Nonetheless, I was committed to the schedule to avoid
returning to this hell hole. For a little while, the plan had worked.
However, I hadn’t accounted for a fucking pandemic.
A few months ago, we heard an inkling of coronavirus discovered in the
Wuhan district of China. At the time, it seemed like a problem for the other
side of the globe. The virus was all over the world in less than a few
months. The government set up protocols such as social distancing,
shutdowns, and staying indoors. The company where I did my internship
closed until further notice, and a few days ago, the part-time servers were
laid off at my second job.
Reid and the rest of my family twisted my arm into moving back to the
Sinclair home. Free food and accommodation were readily available at my
childhood home. What excuse could I possibly provide to decline their
reasonable request?
I couldn’t find a suitable reason, and instead, took comfort in the fact the
whole family would be staying here, too, not that their presence ever
stopped Ajax.
Ajax continued to watch me as he searched the liquor shelf, settling on a
bottle of red wine. He poured two glasses.
“We don’t have any gin for the martini.” He shrugged. “I hope you still like
Malbec.”
“That’s fine.” I loved Malbec, but he did have gin since Reid stocked
ingredients for martinis. I spat out a complicated drink order, but Ajax was
making it clear he wouldn’t bend over backward for me. I bit the inside of
my cheek and accepted the glass of wine with grace.
I had to establish a polite, ladylike, and aloof nature to create distance
between us. Familiarity bred contempt. If I acted childish or chided him like
a close friend, he wouldn’t take me seriously.
With my intentions on guard, I took a sip of my wine.
“When did you get back to New York?” His eyes remained glued to mine.
“A week ago,” I lied smoothly. I’d been dodging him for years. If he found
out I had been living in New York for months, it’d start an argument.
“Are you working?”
“I’m doing an internship at Karen’s company.” I cleared my throat,
uncomfortable.
“What about Paris? And your mom?”
“It didn’t work out.”
“And now you plan to branch out on your own?”
I nodded, taking another sip of wine.
“I’m guessing it’s a non-paying internship since Karen thinks gracing
interns with her presence is the same as paying them an actual salary.”
I nodded again.
Realization dawned on him as he continued, “With the pandemic, you can’t
work a part-time job. So, you’ll stay here. We’re all camping out here as
well.”
I didn’t respond. I didn’t have to. Ajax had phrased a statement about me
staying here instead of asking me.
Reid told me about Ajax’s business and its enormous success. Ajax created
an app when he was in college. It landed him on Forbes’ 30 Under 30
brightest entrepreneur list. He often traveled for work. Whenever he
returned to New York, he stayed at his parents’ brownstone rather than his
condo in Soho. He had always preferred to be around family, so I wasn’t
surprised he chose to quarantine at the brownstone.
It wasn’t enough for Ajax to be rich and handsome; he was also the prodigal
son. He’d rather hang out with family than party like a regular twenty-fiveyear-old on the prowl. Both of our families loved him for it. Everyone loved
him. Everyone but me because I knew better.
I shook away the thought. This run-in had served its purpose. Ajax was
aware of my return. Years had passed since I last saw him. I had to believe
he had grown up and become a better man. Everything would be different
this time around. It had to be for my sanity.
With that resolution, I made up my mind to leave him be. I’d avoid being
alone with Ajax and hide until Reid returned from campus.
“I’m glad that’s settled. I wish I could stay and catch up, but I have to
unpack. Thank you for the drink.” My words came out coherently, even as
my body shook, legs ready to give out.
Ajax eyed me, taking a long sip of his wine.
I didn’t wait for a response. Placing my wine glass on the island, I turned on
my heels. I walked toward the stairs without a backward glance. My goal
resided at the top of the stairs—my room—my sweet escape from him. I
even installed a lock in case he got any funny ideas in the middle of the
night.
A gust of air moved behind me as I took the stairs. Before I could turn to
inspect, two freakishly strong hands wrapped around my waist and hoisted
me up. It happened so quickly I didn’t have the chance to scream. The
shock subsided when it registered that Ajax had followed me and firmly
held my back to his front. I found my voice and screamed bloody murder.
Unfortunately, Ajax was fast. When my wailing subsided, we reached the
top of the stairs.
“You think you can waltz in here after four years and give me the fucking
cold shoulder?” Ajax growled as he walked with me in his arms. “You
didn’t think I knew you moved back months ago and had been avoiding me.
What the fuck, Raven!”
I froze. Of course, he knew I had moved back. He played along to fuck with
me, to humor me into thinking I was in control, so he could catch me off
guard to get what he wanted.
“What the fuck are you doing?” I yelled back. “I swear to God, if you so
much as touch me, I’ll go to the police. I’ll tell our families. I’ll tell
everybody. I’m not letting you get away with this shit anymore.”
“Do it.”
“What?”
“Do. It. Do all of those things. When will you understand? I don’t fucking
care.”
Pure shock took me over. He wanted me to go to the police and embarrass
our families.
Before I could respond, he opened the door to his room. He walked us
inside as I struggled against him. I froze upon hearing the familiar snick of
the lock. The door was sealed, and so was my fate.
I reached for my pocket, but the pepper spray wasn’t there. Fuck. It must
have dropped while he was manhandling me. I tried the last-ditch effort of
appealing to his rational side.
“Ajax, listen to me. You have to stop. Reid is about to come home. He’s
going to hear me scream. He might be your brother, but he’s my best friend.
You know he’ll kill you if he finds you forcing yourself on me. Your
relationship will be—”
He tossed me onto the familiar bed and covered my body with his, keeping
me in place.
I hit him with my hands, legs, elbows, and anything that might make
contact. I screamed and pushed against his chest and tried to kick him in the
groin. I should’ve saved my breath. If possible, Ajax was stronger than
before. I couldn’t move with his legs keeping me in place. He grabbed both
of my wrists and pinned them on the mattress.
“Enough, Rave.”
“Fuck off! You’ve no right to do this to me.”
“No right? I’m the only one with the right.” He leaned down, lips grazing
my ear. “You are mine. Or did you forget?”
“I’m not yours. I’ll never be yours. Forcing me doesn’t make me yours.”
“You’re lying to yourself, just like you lied about Reid coming home. You
don’t think I know when he is coming home? If you’d stop lying to yourself
and to me, we wouldn’t be here.”
“Fuck you!”
He crushed his lips to mine and nipped at my bottom lip until I parted them.
His tongue aggressively explored my mouth, leaving no space to reject it. I
could barely breathe. I moved my head, but the firm hand on my nape kept
me caged. He pulled my dress to my waist, yanking down my thong.
This can’t be happening.
“Ajax, listen to me. I’ve known you my whole life. You’re a good man. You
know this is wrong. Please don’t do this.” There had to be something good
left inside of him, some semblance of the man I once knew.
He put his forehead on mine and groaned, “Rave, I’ve thought about you
every single day, every hour, every fucking second. I can’t stop now. Not
when you’re here in front of me.”
“Please just stop, and I’ll forget this happened.”
Ajax glared at me. “You will never forget this happened, and you’ll never
forget me. I won’t let you.”
He trailed kisses along my neck and my jaw. “Fuck, I missed you. I missed
you so fucking much. You don’t know how—” His voice trembled with
effort before his lips collided against mine.
Shaking with anger, I tried to bite anything within the vicinity—his nose,
lips, ears. His head fell back with a curse when I made contact.
“Stop it unless you want to get punished.”
“Get off me. Get off me, or I’ll do it again.”
Ajax didn’t bother responding and pretended as if I weren’t there. I moved
my limbs to attack him. He must’ve known I wouldn’t go down without a
fight or lie here and take it. Ajax collected my wrists with one large hand.
He pinned them to my stomach and dropped toward my lower body.
Before I could determine the intent, his tongue was on my sex. He knew of
my most sensitive spots and found my clit with ease. His free hand traveled
south, slipping two fingers inside me. Boxed in, I willed my body not to
respond to his tongue. I already knew it to be useless. He was familiar with
every spot on my sex and could make me come with a blindfold on.
This time was no different. Within minutes, I arched my back and clenched,
cognizant of what was about to happen. Ajax released my wrists as they no
longer needed to be held prisoner. I was now chasing this high on my own.
I heard the opening of his zipper as my eyes fluttered shut. Unable to hold
back, I cried, “Oh, God.”
My mouth remained open as the orgasm took over. Ajax swapped the
tongue on my clit with his fingers before switching again with the head of
his cock. The change between the three happened so fast that I didn’t feel
void of a sensation between the transitions. Ajax prolonged my orgasm by
rubbing his head against the same spot for an unbearable moment. My back
remained arched, fisting my hands into the bedsheets. My voice was stifled,
unable to scream as his dick stretched me.
Ajax entered me slowly—too slowly—shaking for control. He roared as he
slammed inside me. “Holy shit, baby. Fuck!”
He stilled, panting heavily and stroking my hair. The intimacy was
unbearable. He found a slow rhythm as if testing the water while covering
my neck with soft kisses.
“Fuck, baby. I missed you. I missed you so damn much. You’re better than I
remember. You are fucking perfect.”
Ajax sped up, thrusting and rotating his hips. I could barely catch my
breath, but I refused to make more sounds that might make him happy. I lay
still with a blank stare, waiting for him to finish. This bothered him more
than anything. While I had no control over this situation, I could control this
little emotion. Apathy was my ultimate form of defiance against him.
I could feel his anger pulsing through his body. A look of determination
followed it. He nibbled at my bottom lip, then dropped his head to suck on
my neck, twirling his tongue around a sensitive spot. It was tough, but I
refused to give him another inch. The fucker forced himself on me and
passed off orgasm as consent. I refused to provide him with more
satisfaction. Fuck him.
As my resolve grew, so did his. He slowed the thrusts and dropped his head
to lick my breasts. My dress was hiked to my waist. Instead of pulling the
dress off entirely, he pulled down the top, bunching the outfit around my
midsection. He grabbed my bra and yanked one of the cups to reveal my
breast. His tongue swiped over my nipple before taking it between his teeth.
I didn’t look down but felt his eyes on me, waiting for a reaction. I stared at
the ceiling though my insides were frozen. A bad feeling was festering
inside me.
There was an accident during one of our intimate times. Ajax was fucking
me and flicking my right nipple with his tongue. He had clamped down
with his teeth right as I squeezed him. It surprised him, and he thrust up.
His body shot forward with my nipple between his teeth. To say it was
painful was putting it mildly.
From what I understood of this psychopath, his fixation came from my
rejection. He wanted me to crave him. Being the perfect narcissist, Ajax
wanted me to like his physical touch. So, he only did things that got me off.
Following the incident, I recoiled from sex for a few days. I wouldn’t get
aroused no matter how hard he tried, and Ajax would never allow that.
Afterward, he only ever sucked gently or licked my nipples. He never used
his teeth.
Until now. Now his teeth were clamping down, holding me at mercy. Panic
flared at the memory of the traumatizing pain. I hated it, and he was doing it
to punish me for my defiance.
The slow fucking sped up with each thrust. We were playing a game of
chicken to see who’d fold first. He wanted an expression. He could deal
with anger or lust, but he couldn’t deal with nothingness.
I didn’t want to risk the possibility of a brutal thrust while he clamped down
on my nipple. If I gave him something, he’d stop. I also knew he’d hate to
risk my body recoiling the next time he touched me. I shuddered at the
thought of a next time. All the same, I called his bluff and remained
expressionless.
Without provocation, Ajax suddenly changed his mind about this mind fuck
game. He licked my nipple and flicked it instead. When he swiped his
tongue upward, I let go of the breath I didn’t realize holding.
He sucked on my neck, calming my trepidation. I felt my taut muscles
relax, grateful to be rid of the threat and the fear to come with it. Ajax
pounded into me, and my body jerked from impact. His dick rubbed against
my sensitive clit, the friction increasing with each thrust. Despite myself, I
arched my back and moaned as another orgasm took hold.
“That’s it, baby. Come with me.”
My eyes flew open upon realizing what had happened. The fake-me-out
nipple clamp was a distraction. I was distracted with relief when Ajax
didn’t bite down, involuntarily giving him the expression he truly desired—
my submission.
I didn’t have to look at him to know he was wearing a smirk. With nothing
else to prove, Ajax pounded harder until climaxing inside me.
Afterward, he kissed my cheek and neck, looking content as hell.
“That was amazing,” he murmured. “I knew you’d remember. Your body
always remembers that you are mine. You’ll always be mine.” Ajax buried
his head into my neck as I turned away.

NINE YEARS AGO - AUGUST 2011.
Ajax.
I wiped the kitchen counter littered with food crumbs. I should’ve known better when Mom decided to make breakfast. She was high on life
earlier today, cooking and singing, and made a massive mess in the kitchen.
After breakfast, she crashed from the high and retreated to her room. Reid
and Mia had no clue of what had happened or why her door was locked
once more.
I didn’t want to ruin one of the few good days they’d had with her in weeks,
and I decided to clean up the mess before taking the runts to see Uncle
John. It was one of our family traditions—one outing per weekend, no
matter how small.
During the weekdays, Reid and Mia were in school. They didn’t notice
Mom locked away in her room for hours. On the weekends, they were
around for far too long. I distracted them with made-up activities as if it
were normal for a sixteen-year-old to be in charge of his twelve-year-old
brother and eight-year-old sister.
I finished cleaning as Mia and Reid descended the stairs. Mia almost lost
her footing at the bottom. I lifted her before she could fall, smiling as I
swung her around. Mia squealed and fell into a fit of giggles as I put her
down.
Reid and Mia tugged at their socks and shoes, ready to leave the house. I’d
barely done the laces on my combat boots when Reid opened the front door,
practically flying outside.
I smirked. He couldn’t wait to see Raven, his best friend. Today was the day
Raven and Uncle John officially moved next door. We were going over to
serve as their welcome wagon.
Though we called him uncle, we weren’t related. Uncle John was Dad’s
best friend, although they considered each other brothers. Uncle John and
Dad grew up in a small southern town in Virginia. Their families were
devout Christians, and their friendship solidified through religion and the
church community. Throughout their lives, they tried to instill the same
values in us. It didn’t stick.
After high school, Uncle John and Dad went to the same college. They also
applied to the same medical schools, but it didn’t work out. Dad ended up in
New York, while Uncle John ended up in Boston.
I was three years old when Uncle John got married. Within the year, they
had a baby girl, Raven. My parents had Reid the same year. Reid and Raven
were born on the same day, only an hour apart. Naturally, they struck up a
lifelong friendship. Reid and Raven were inseparable growing up. Every
time Dad visited Uncle John in Boston, Reid tagged along.
When I was younger, I used to visit them, too. But the last time I went to
Boston was eight years ago. That’s when Mom got sick, and life went to
shit.
Mia was born when I was eight. Mom started having mood swings—crazy
highs and lows. Initially, they chalked it up to postpartum depression. She
was later diagnosed with depression. Finally, it was anxiety and depression.
The opinions had been many, and the drugs and therapy treatments had
been even more. Lately, she hung out in her room, coming out on select
days when she felt well enough.
Our lives took a hit after Mom’s unsuspecting disorder crept up, disrupting
life as we knew it. She became oblivious to her surroundings, drowning in
self-pity. Her bedroom turned into her solace while we became strangers to
her. She wasn’t abusive. Severe neglect was the best description of her
relationship with her family.
When Mia was young, I once came home and found her crying her little
lungs out. She was alone in her crib, her diaper hadn’t been changed, and
she possibly hadn’t been fed in hours. I quickly realized it was dangerous to
leave Mia in Mom’s care and convinced Dad to hire a part-time nanny.
Later, I started helping with Mia after school.
After Mia was old enough, I found a reputable daycare for her. Nonetheless,
Mom regularly forgot to pick her up. Once more, I had Dad hire a nanny. It
was alright for a while, but Mia rebelled against nannies with a vengeance
after turning four. She was attached to me and would throw a fit if strangers
came near her. It was World War III trying to part ways during school dropoffs. It was a lot of pressure for a thirteen-year-old to be in charge of his
five-year-old sister.
Dad tried his best to help, but he worked long hours at the hospital, and Mia
never developed an attachment to him. He didn’t have a choice. Mom lost
her job after missing one too many days. Dad picked up extra moonlighting
shifts to carry on the lifestyle we’d grown accustomed to over the years.
Initially, Dad tried to make it work by renting out part of our home to
compensate for the loss of a second income. The previous owners had
customized our house into a duplex style. The downstairs had its own
entrance, kitchen, bedrooms, and living room—a separate apartment. We
rented it out, but after one freak tenant to the next bad one, we realized it
wasn’t sustainable for a family of five to rent out a part of their home. The
alternate was cutting down our semi-luxurious lifestyle.
We weren’t rich, but we did have a brownstone on the Upper West Side.
The three of us attended private school, and Dad started trust funds for us
when we were young. We weren’t made of money, but we were
comfortable.
Financial stability was something Dad never had while growing up. He
didn’t want us to be deprived of opportunities because of money. He wanted
us to have the best opportunities, the ones New York City public schools
wouldn’t be able to provide, but private schools and trust funds would.
Dad worked extra moonlighting shifts on his off days. Watching his tired
eyes and dark circles from lack of sleep was difficult. I couldn’t let Dad
drown, so I stepped up to the plate. I helped around the house and never
complained. He never realized how the burden of raising my siblings at a
young age affected me. As far as Dad was concerned, they were cared for at
school all day, followed by various after-school activities. It didn’t cross his
mind to worry about who picked Mia up after school, if their homework
was done, if they were disciplined for poor behavior, if their lunches were
packed, or what they ate for dinner.
He was the household's primary breadwinner and clueless about how
children were raised. That used to be Mom’s job. He never questioned how
those duties were fulfilled with Mom’s diagnosis and Mia’s aversion to
nannies. It was a trigger for Mia. She assumed if the nanny was here, then
I’d leave her.
The drastic change in role during my childhood didn’t leave time for travel.
I hadn’t been to Boston since I was eight. Raven was only four the last time
I saw her. I wondered if she still had a sweet tooth. She used to steal candy
and all kinds of sweets from the kitchen, hiding them in her room.
While I hadn’t seen Raven in years, I saw Uncle John frequently during his
visits to New York. Uncle John was my hero and my biggest cheerleader.
He didn’t judge people for their shortcomings and never passed unkind
opinions. Being a man of faith, he told me he had demons, too. If he were to
succumb to them, he hoped someone would be kind enough to help him
without judgment. Even in his professional life, he was a hero and big on
giving back to the community. Before getting married, he worked for
Doctors Without Borders and was a gem of a human being.
While he did reserve his judgment about Mom, he understood the toll it
took on me. He invited Reid and Mia to visit Boston for the last few
summer vacations, giving me a much-needed break to be a typical teenager.
I could have friends over, go to parties, have sex—the usual teenage shit.
Mia loved Raven and didn’t throw tantrums despite being away from me.
For the last eight years, Uncle John had been my constant salvation. Now, I
had to be his. His wife, Theressa, recently left him and his thirteen-year-old
daughter. Uncle John was heartbroken.
When Uncle John married Theressa Beckett, she was a runway model and
aspiring fashion designer. Uncle John quickly became obsessed with her.
She didn’t feel the same, but her fashion design career never took off, and
she was too old to keep modeling. The prospect of settling down with a
rich, semi-handsome doctor was suddenly not so horrendous.
She was still on the fence about marrying Uncle John until she got pregnant
with Raven. Our parents wouldn’t admit to this story, but I’d heard it
through enough family friends to know it was true. Theressa only agreed to
marry Uncle John because she was pregnant. Uncle John didn’t want kids,
but if it meant getting to marry the woman of his dreams, he didn’t seem to
mind. Theressa put her ambitions on hold and pursued the role of a mother
and wife instead. She sketched designs as a hobby and was content for a
while. They both were.
Things changed drastically in their quiet lives after one of Theressa’s
designs caught the eye of another successful designer. She was offered a job
in Europe, entailing significant travel between Milan and Paris. When it
came down to choosing between her dream job and marriage, she chose the
job. It wasn’t feasible to take along a thirteen-year-old when her job
required constant travel and an inconsistent schedule. So, she left them both
behind.
Uncle John begged her and even went to Europe to win her back. However,
Theressa was determined. Life as a wife and mother wasn’t for her, and he
had been a mess since.
My father suggested they move to New York City to be closer to us. At a
time like this, you needed to be with family. But I suspected the real reason
was that Uncle John was a terrible father. Although he was my role model,
he was better as the fun uncle. He never wanted children and now had no
idea what to do with Raven. Dad thought we could keep an eye out for one
another while ensuring Uncle John didn’t go off the deep end.
The move was surprisingly easy. Uncle John had a license to practice in
New York, and Dad hooked him up with an interview at his hospital. There
was also a brownstone up for rent a couple of houses down from us. Within
a few weeks, they were able to make the shift. Hence, here we stood in
front of their brownstone, ready to welcome them with open arms and
hearts.
Reid and Mia sprung forward as the door flew open. We piled in, and soon
hugs were exchanged. I grabbed Uncle John into a bear hug, noticing the
deep-set dark bags under his eyes.
As I released him, I caught sight of the darkest shade of jet-black hair flying
everywhere. I had barely grasped myself when a pair of hazel eyes stared at
me as if peeking inside my soul and pulling it out of my body. It was
intense, and I glared the orbs down, but they didn’t waver. Before I could
utter a word, two tiny arms flung around my neck, pulling me into a tight
hug.
Vanilla. It was the first thing to register, the smell of warm vanilla, maybe
mixed with a hint of lavender. The scent was intoxicating.
“Ajax! I’m Raven. I know we met when I was younger, but since one of us
was going through cognitive development, I think it’s only fair that we
consider this our first meeting. I want to officially introduce myself.”
I blinked. There was no way this was Raven. She didn’t look thirteen. She
looked fifteen, possibly sixteen. I racked my brain for photos I’d seen in
Reid’s room. He must’ve put up pictures from a long time ago. She didn’t
look like this in those photos because this I would remember. She was
thirteen?
Raven pulled back from the hug. I couldn’t utter a response to her eloquent
introduction. It was embarrassing to be nervous, trying to come up with a
witty response. That was until I noticed what she was holding. In her right
hand was a half-opened Snickers bar. I couldn’t gather my thoughts and
burst out laughing. She followed my gaze to the candy bar and joined in as
if it were normal for us to share a private joke. She was fucking adorable.
Finally, I stuck out my hand. “Hello, Raven. It’s nice to meet you, postcognitive development.”
She laughed again and brushed off my hand to take me into another hug. I
was surprised by her affection and warmth. She might be too sweet and
innocent for New York. This city was going to chew her up and spit her
back out.
Raven linked one arm with mine and another with Mia’s. She had become
family to Reid and Mia but didn’t let me feel left out of their exclusive
circle. She led us inside and showed us around their new home. Raven
excitedly spoke about their move, the furniture they ordered, her new room,
and everything under the sun.
Uncle John remained quiet. He interjected here and there, barely responding
to my attempts at a polite conversation. Finally, he excused himself,
something about catching up with work.
My gaze followed his retreating body. I knew the signs of depression a little
too well. I hoped Uncle John realized he had someone depending on him
and snapped out of it. He had seen me suffer due to a depressed parent.
Unfortunately, it wasn’t a luxury a parent could afford, especially a single
parent.
When I focused back on the scene, I found Raven setting up the game
console. Mia and Reid were busy putting together a model train set, a gift
from Raven.
I sat next to Raven. “What are you playing?”
“Mario Kart. Want to play?”
I grabbed the second controller, and we set up our characters. Pretty soon,
she was kicking my ass and smack-talking with her smart-ass mouth. I
would be annoyed if I wasn’t busy laughing. I couldn’t remember the last
time I laughed.
After a couple of hours, I forfeited. “Are you guys hungry?”
All three of them grunted, busy with a movie they had put on. I called our
favorite delivery place and searched for Uncle John. I hadn’t heard a peep
from him all night. I looked everywhere, but he was nowhere to be found.
Did he leave? He didn’t say a word to his daughter or me. Was this a regular
occurrence?
I found Raven in the next room, setting the table. She gave me a big smile
when I entered the room. “Hi.”
“Did you see your dad leave?”
She shrugged.
I reminded myself of Uncle John’s words about not judging others. This
was none of my business, but curiosity got the better of me. “Do you know
where he went?”
“No. He sometimes needs to get away to clear his head.”
“And he doesn’t tell you where he goes?”
Another shake of her head.
“Does he stay out all night?” I pressed.
“Sometimes. He is going through a lot,” Raven said casually.
I was stumped. Raven was also going through a lot. She was only a kid, and
her mother left her. They only moved in today. How could her father leave
her in a new house in a new city without telling her? How could she be so
cavalier about this?
Sure, I dealt with my share of parent drama, but I had the good sense of
being angry at them. Raven didn’t give anything away with her expression.
I didn’t know if this made her angry or sad. She was blank.
I didn’t voice more concerns. This was none of my business, and I had
enough on my plate.
Once the delivery arrived, Raven and I set up the food. Reid and Mia piled
into the dining room and barely used utensils, devouring everything in front
of them. Raven laughed alongside me at their savagery and had the sense to
eat like a normal human being.
After dinner, we stuck around for a bit longer. I waited, hoping for Uncle
John to return. As the night progressed, it became clear that he wasn’t
coming back. I told Raven to pack a bag and stay the night at our place.
“Oh no, that’s okay.” Raven appeared irritated by my suggestion. I didn’t
understand this girl.
“Please, Rave,” Mia chimed in. “Please come home with us. Let’s have a
slumber party. Pretty please.”
“Really, guys. I can’t. I have a tour scheduled at the school tomorrow. Plus,
I have to unpack the remaining boxes.”
“Jesus, Rave. Just come back with us. There is no one here,” Reid echoed
my sentiment.
Raven averted her gaze. “You guys are making a big deal out of nothing.
Dad probably got called into work for an emergency. I’m sure he’ll be back
any second. I’m fine.”
It hit me, then. Pride. We caught Raven at a vulnerable moment, one that’s
embarrassing for her. She was alone, but she didn’t want us to save her like
a stray cat we were taking home. We had to word it differently.
“Okay, Raven,” I said casually. “No worries. I know you have a lot to do. If
you can’t stay the night, come by for cake. We have a whole chocolate
fudge cake in the fridge. I was going to bribe these two with a slice in
exchange for cleaning their rooms.” I hoped for her to take the bait.
Raven smiled at me with another unfathomable expression. I didn’t know if
she was excited about the cake or if she realized my ruse to let her save
face. Or maybe she was relieved about not being left alone in this big
house.
“Nom, nom, nom. Cake! I can’t say no to that. Let’s go.”
I grinned as the three of them headed out. I shut the front door but couldn’t
help my disappointment. Uncle John, my savior, was no more the hero of
this story than my mother.

JUNE 2012
Ajax.

“Go upstairs!” I used my stern voice, hoping it reflected my serious
tone. I seldom went out on the weekends. Dad’s hospital shifts were seven
on and five off. This meant he worked twelve hours a day, seven days
straight. Then he had five days off.
He’d often moonlight and pick up extra shifts during his days off, so I
rarely left the house at night. Dad felt terrible about me missing the usual
high school stuff, birthdays, homecomings, hanging out with friends.
However, I couldn’t leave Mia home alone. I used to have the nanny stay
over on the weekends, but Mia’s tantrums put a stop to it.
Instead, Dad let me use the split-level apartment to throw house parties. As
long as I was responsible, he never gave me a hard time about it. These
parties had gained a reputation, attracting even college students. The
downstairs was soundproof. It was large, with a cool retro vibe and a neverending supply of liquor. Our housekeeper, Maria, came by once a week.
Dad gave her a stipend for grocery shopping. One of the requirements was
to ensure the liquor cabinets were full. The upstairs liquor cabinet had a
lock, so Maria stocked it with expensive stuff. The downstairs bar got the
cheap shit. No one at these parties cared, though, as long as it was free. Pair
alcohol with absentee parents, turning this house into a party sanctuary.
I scheduled these parties after Mia’s bedtime and put two strict rules in
place—don’t go upstairs and follow my rules regarding my family, which
included not allowing Reid or Mia into these parties.
That’s why I was annoyed Reid was standing here, demanding entry. I made
sure to tuck Mia in before everyone came over. When I checked on Reid, he
was also getting ready for bed.
I wanted to throw back a few drinks and relax with people my age. I wasn’t
exposing my little brother to that. I’m aware kids in New York start
drinking at a young age. Hell, I started drinking at his age. But guess what?
I was a parent to Reid and Mia, and parents were hypocrites. They didn’t
want you to make the same mistakes as they did.
Plus, when I was his age, I never put myself in unnecessarily risky
situations because my family relied on me. I drank, I had sex, but safety
was my number one concern. I was never out of control and did everything
in moderation.
I didn’t see the same maturity in Reid. I often saw it in Raven, though. I
trusted her. I trusted her more than the adults in our lives because she
thought past herself. She reflected on how her behavior might affect her
loved ones and acted accordingly. Reid hadn’t developed the same state of
mind. He might in a couple of years, and when he did, I’d rather he drank
under my supervision. I wouldn’t deny him entrance to these parties
forever, but I would deny it tonight.
“The answer is hell no,” I snarled. “Go upstairs.”
“You are such a fucking hypocrite.”
“Reid, what the hell is the matter with you? You’re too young for this shit.”
“You were my age when you started drinking. You’re living it up here and
keeping us locked upstairs. You leave us with her while you screw around.
Fuck you, Ajax! Go choke on a dick.” Reid stomped upstairs.
His comments hit home, and I felt like a piece of shit. I was fucking up with
him. I could feel it.
I used to think Dad left me with her every time he walked out of the house.
I understood now that money didn’t grow on trees. Dad worked to provide
for us, send us to private schools, and secure us a future. I hoped Reid came
to the same conclusion about me. Dad was doing his best, and I was doing
my best. Parents weren’t perfect, and being a parent didn’t absolve you of
your flaws.
Suddenly, my chest squeezed, and I took shallow breaths to alleviate it.
How could a stupid fight with Reid cut me so deep?
Having lost my energy to entertain, I walked outside for fresh air. Reaching
the sidewalk, I spied a mass of long jet-black hair.
Raven.
She was sitting on the steps outside her brownstone. The sight calmed me,
and my chest didn’t feel hollow anymore. Over the past year, Raven
became a part of our family. She was young but shockingly mature. At this
point, I considered her a good friend of mine. She was poised, classy, and
well put together—the kind of person who had a calming effect on
everyone. Not to mention, she was incredibly beautiful.
I frequently reminded myself not to think shit like that. I was seventeen—a
few months shy of eighteen—and about to start college. She was fourteen
and about to enter her freshman year of high school. Plus, she was Reid’s
best friend. I forced myself not to look deeply into her physical beauty,
which was fine because the best part about her was her words. She was
articulate yet humorous and exactly what I needed.
“Hi, Rave.”
Raven spotted me and gave me her megawatt smile. Despite how much I
chided myself, my heart stopped.
“Hey, there. Did the party end early?”
“Nah, it’s still going on. What are you doing outside by yourself?”
“Just needed some air.”
I feared it meant Uncle John hadn’t come home, and Raven was waiting for
him. Again. I was shocked Raven still craved his love. He had treated his
only daughter like dirt since her mother left. Love had made a monster out
of Uncle John, but not Raven. She spoke to her mother frequently over the
phone and told me she was happy Theressa pursued her dreams. It made me
shake my head at Raven.
The more understanding Raven acted about her mother’s decision, the more
Theressa drowned in guilt and showered her daughter with gifts. Once a
month, Raven now received shipments of designer clothing and shoes. The
downside of the gifts was that they made a fourteen-year-old Raven
resemble an eighteen-year-old model. Furthermore, Theressa demanded
photos of Raven in these outfits. Raven had nowhere to wear the clothes
since her private school required uniforms. Her only opportunity was
around us. Those outfits gave me mini heart attacks, further challenging my
denial about Raven’s physical beauty. Other men seemed to experience the
same difficulty. More than once, Reid and I had threatened to murder men
with leering eyes or groping hands.
I plopped next to Raven on the steps. She put her head on my shoulder like
she often did and sat in comfortable silence for a few moments.
After a beat, I asked her the unsettling question. “When was the last time
you saw Uncle John?”
Raven said nothing.
Another odd fact dawned on me. “Rave, why are the lights turned off inside
your house?”
Still quiet.
“Rave—”
“Ajax… don’t.”
“Don’t what?”
“Don’t worry about it.”
“I do worry about it.”
“It’s not a big deal. Dad made a mistake with the electricity bill. They shut
it off.”
“What the hell! When did this happen?” I was furious, and she looked too
fucking calm for my comfort.
“Ajax, he’s going through something. It’s not that big of a deal. It’s been
great weather lately. Not too hot or cold. If there was a time for Dad to slip
up, thank God it was now.”
She smiled it off. Was she making light of this?
Raven wasn’t a pushover. She wouldn’t let anyone talk down to her. Reid,
with his hot temper, was the only one to try. Raven dealt with him by saying
something to the effect of: If you aren’t in the mindset to have a sensible
conversation, I will excuse myself from this situation. Call me when you’re
in control of your emotions, and we can have a mature discussion on how to
resolve this argument.
Can you believe that came out of a fourteen-year-old’s mouth? It generally
left Reid dumbstruck while I had to reel in my snort. So, why wasn’t she
standing up to Uncle John?
I needed a reaction from her—a normal one to her abnormal father. I’d take
anything other than the nonchalant act.
Raven was rational and all about seeing things from another perspective. I
had to approach her with logic to get through. I never put in this much effort
when speaking to females my age. Somehow this fourteen-year-old kept me
on my toes.
“Okay. Let’s pass off the electric bill fiasco as a fluke. However, do you
believe Uncle John is currently upholding his duties as your father? Yes, he
is going through a tough time. He lost the only woman he loved, but he also
has an obligation to you.”
I reminded myself she was a fourteen-year-old girl. This conversation might
make her cry. On the other hand, if she were as mature as I pegged her to
be, she’d reflect on my words and listen to my advice.
I continued, “We all go through tough times. It’s part of life. It’s okay to
mourn a loss for a reasonable amount of time. But if it’s at the expense of
everything you value, when does it stop being a mourning period and turns
into a lifestyle?” I paused, letting the words sink in. Raven didn’t waiver,
giving nothing away with her expression. “If he doesn’t know his behavior
is affecting you negatively, he won’t change,” I added softly.
Raven listened to my spiel without interrupting. When I was done, she
spoke slowly, “He does know.”
“He does?”
“The first time I approached him was when Mom left. He was reclusive and
detached. I told him I needed him to step up as my father. He agreed, but it
only lasted a week. It was like pulling teeth, and finally, he stopped trying.
You can’t force someone into things they aren’t ready for. Our discussions
only made him uncomfortable and embarrassed. And he stopped wanting to
be around me. He was drowning in self-pity and couldn’t face the
disappointment in my eyes. That’s why we decided to move to New York.”
I was awed by the information. “I thought Uncle John moved because Dad
asked him to.”
“That was part of it. Once we moved here, I told him I needed him to do
better. He tried his best. Then I caught him talking to Doctors Without
Borders about a possible assignment. It became clear to me. He wants to get
away. I’m a constant reminder of my mother, and my expectations aren’t
making it better. Each time he’s unable to meet them, he sinks further into
self-loathing. He has been leaving the house before I wake up and coming
home after I go to sleep. The few times I see him, he looks guilty. He knows
he’s not doing right by me but doesn’t have the willpower to change. So, he
avoids me.”
I opened my mouth to voice follow-up questions, but Raven spoke before I
could ask.
“He still goes to work. He might avoid me or forget to pay the bills
occasionally, but I have a roof over my head, and my best friends live next
door. You guys are my family. Maybe Dad will later realize that he isn’t
being fair to me. The more I discuss unwanted things with him, the more he
pulls away. He doesn’t know how to be my father right now.”
How do you respond to this assessment? I was quiet for so long that Raven
bumped my shoulder. “Lord help the boy you end up with, Rave. He’ll
never win an argument. Most likely, he won’t even know he lost.”
Raven laughed and cocked her head as her dark hair spilled over her
shoulders. I’d already decided how to move forward, but Raven wasn’t
susceptible to ideas that wound her pride. Once more, I needed to use logic
to make my case.
“Look, you made some good points. But by your admission, Uncle John is
currently an unfit parent. He is lost and not mentally capable of his
responsibilities.”
I paused to assess if Raven might voice an argument, but she didn’t.
“I also have an absentee parent, so Dad and I pick up the slack. There is no
one here to do the same. While I believe in your abilities, I’m
uncomfortable with the idea of you living in this house. What if an intruder
breaks in? If your phone is dead from electricity loss, how do you plan to
call for help?”
I allowed the terrifying idea to sink in. My stomach dropped at the thought.
“I’d like for you to move in with us temporarily. We love having you over.
Reid has all but physically moved you in. He covered our guest room with
your pictures and items. When guests stay over, Reid tells them they’re
staying in Raven’s room, not the guest room.”
I casually leaned back on the step. I didn’t want to come off too strong, but
my heart was beating fast over her rejecting my suggestion.
“This makes the most logical sense. You said that you live next door to your
family. If the situation were reversed, you’d want us to come to stay with
you, would you not? If we refuse, it’ll indicate we aren’t as close as we
claim. If we are truly family, this is a no-brainer. If you’re still
uncomfortable with the idea, see it as a trial run until your father sorts out
his shit.”
I took a deep breath after the words I spewed out. I couldn’t imagine Raven
staying in this house after everything she disclosed. She was coming back
with me. It wasn’t a choice, though I patiently waited for her to respond.
Raven.
Ajax was waiting for a response, but he wasn’t waiting for me to say yes.
This was happening no matter what. He was waiting for me to acknowledge
it.
All of his protective instincts were out. I had seen this side of Ajax before
with Reid and Mia. When he was this determined, no one could stand in the
way—not his parents, not the world, not God himself.
“Let’s go inside, so I can pack a bag,” I mumbled. “I’ll come back
tomorrow for the rest. Is Reid still up?”
“He is, but I don’t think he’s talking to me right now.” Ajax appeared
exasperated at the mention of Reid’s name.
I felt for Ajax. Lately, Reid had become exceedingly hot-headed. He was
loyal and would lay down his life for his loved ones, but he was rough
around the edges. When I lived in Boston, it seemed like Reid idolized
Ajax. Now that I lived closer, I realized Reid held an unfair amount of
resentment toward Ajax.
Ajax was a pseudo-parental figure for Reid and Mia. Hell, he was a pseudoparental figure for me, too. Mia and I idolized Ajax. Reid worshiped him,
too, but he fought Ajax at every turn, and I wasn’t allowed to point it out or
take Ajax’s side. Reid would get angry whenever I did. It was a sore topic,
though Reid was the one at fault. Ajax disciplined Reid for poor behavior,
whereas Reid spewed hateful words at Ajax. Reid didn’t know how good he
had it.
Ajax and I walked inside the house. My phone was dead, so Ajax used the
light from his to find our way. I grabbed a backpack and packed some
toiletries. I also packed a duffel bag with essentials for the night. When
Ajax wasn’t looking, I pulled out a special box from under my bed and
slipped it inside the duffel. It had my most prized possessions, and I’d
rather take it with me.
I often stayed at the Sinclair home. Every time I did, Ajax packed my lunch
for school. As he did for Reid and Mia, he’d also include a handwritten note
for me.
My heart melted the first time I saw a note.
An apple a day keeps the doctor away. Have an awesome day, Rave!
It was basic, encouraging me to take in my daily fruit intake. However, I
had never gotten a lunch note before. My parents used to give me money
for lunch.
So, I saved the note and prayed for another one. My wish was granted every
time I stayed at the Sinclair home—more packed lunches with handwritten
notes.
I’ll keep packing this apple with your lunch until you eat it.
And he did.
Enjoy your lunch because Reid is cooking dinner tonight.
Reid loved to be creative in the kitchen. Every time a new season of
MasterChef came out, he forced us to eat the home-cooked version of his
latest creation. He was a terrible cook.
We’re out of peanut butter. This is a jam & jam sandwich. Here is $5 for a
better lunch.
The jam and jam sandwich was delicious.
I never asked. Did your parents name you Raven because you have jetblack hair?
Yes, they did.
Why didn’t they name you Snow White? You look more like Snow White
than a raven.
My mother tried. Dad stopped her, thankfully.
I saved the notes in my special box. I had no handwritten memorabilia from
my parents except for a few birthday cards. These personalized notes meant
so much more than the generic words my parents wrote on birthday cards.
Sadly, Ajax informed Reid that he’d no longer pack our lunches once we
started high school. We’d be enrolled in the cafeteria lunch program instead.
In the meantime, I collected as many lunch notes as possible.
Though I craved the little notes, I never overstayed my welcome. If I stayed
at the Sinclair home two days in a row, I grudgingly scooted back to my
empty house on the third day.
I hated it.
That was why I’d never forget this moment. I’d always be grateful for what
Ajax was doing for me and prayed to repay him someday. I secretly vowed
to do anything to decrease Ajax’s stress. I refused to disappoint him, let him
down, or make him regret letting me move in.
I repeated the mantra in my head as we stepped outside. I strapped on my
backpack while Ajax carried my duffle. Today, I was moving in with the
Sinclairs, and for the first time in my life, I wasn’t forced into someone’s
path. Finally, someone volunteered to care for me simply because they
loved me.
OCTOBER 2013.
Raven.
I had been cleaning Tessa’s room for hours. The room was a
disgusting mess. Trash and clothes were everywhere.
It had been over a year since I moved in with the Sinclairs. Shortly after
moving in, Dad announced he was returning to Africa to work for Doctors
Without Borders. He averted eye contact as he broke the news.
Before accepting the assignment, Dad spoke to Ajax. He made Ajax
promise to look out for me as he did for Reid and Mia. He also asked Ajax’s
parents—Reese and Tessa Sinclair—to become my legal guardians.
After Dad left, Uncle Reese received a job offer as a visiting specialist for a
hospital in the Cayman Islands. The pay was significantly more for working
half the hours. It was too good of an opportunity to pass up.
Uncle Reese spoke to Ajax before making his decision. In the end, it was
decided that Uncle Reese would take the position, and Ajax would become
my guardian since he was eighteen. Uncle Reese loved me like a daughter
and knew it’d be useless to have Tessa become my guardian, especially
when I needed parental representation at school.
So, here we were. Dad was away for Doctors Without Borders, Uncle Reese
was away at Grand Cayman, and Tessa was here but barely present.
Once more, Ajax was the only adult actively involved in our lives. He was
officially my legal guardian. He was also the unofficial legal guardian for
Reid and Mia, all the while attending Columbia University.
Uncle Reese wouldn’t allow Ajax to miss out on more college experiences
than needed. Ajax scheduled his classes over three days out of the week. He
spent those three days at his dorm, living a regular college life. The other
four days, he stayed with us.
The nanny stayed here on the days Ajax was indisposed. It was hell on earth
convincing Mia to let the nanny stay here, but she had a soft spot for me.
She gave in once I used my persuasive skill sets.
I believed Ajax was happy to have an escape. Looking at Tessa’s room, I
couldn’t blame him. It was depressing. Tessa had become worse, staying in
bed for days on end.
It made me feel guilty for forcing him into the role of my guardian. I had a
happy home and life at Ajax’s expense. He was already responsible for Mia
and Reid, and attending Columbia wasn’t easy. He deserved to enjoy
college, so I helped as much as possible.
I turned when I heard the door creak and found Reid’s face peeking through
it. Tessa was lying on the bed, facing away from him.
“How is it going in here?”
“Same old.”
The room was looking better. I didn’t divulge how bad it was because Reid
felt easily irritated by Tessa. The last thing I wanted was to create conflict in
the Sinclair home.
Ajax, Mia, and Reid had become my constants. I needed them to be in
harmony for my sanity. I shared a unique connection with each, and I loved
them more than I loved myself.
My connection with Reid was a spiritual one. I couldn’t explain it. He was
my best friend, but he was also my soulmate. Not the romantic kind, but our
souls were tethered to one another. We were born on the same day, an hour
apart, and to parents who were also inseparable best friends. Our connection
was cosmic.
When my mom left, Reid begged his dad to take him to Boston. When his
dad couldn’t get out of work, he convinced Ajax to let him take the Amtrak
alone. I didn’t even ask.
When Reid realized Tessa was fucked in the head, he never explained
himself to me. I could feel his mood shift, and I’d lean against him to
communicate telepathically.
Do you want me here, or do you want to be alone?
He’d give me telepathic responses when he wanted to be comforted versus
when he wanted to be left alone. No words needed to be exchanged
between us. This was more powerful than romantic love. Romantic love
was fleeting, but the love we shared was unparalleled. I could live without
my parents, but I couldn’t live a happy life without Reid. I’d be missing half
my soul.
Reid stared at me, our telepathic connection kicking in. He was asking, Do
you think she’ll get up today?
It doesn’t seem like it. I shook my head in my silent response.
Tessa’s moods went up and down. There were days when she was lucid, but
lately, she had been retreating. I’d bring her a sandwich and leave it on the
nightstand, but the meals were often untouched. Occasionally, I could trick
her into taking a shower. Today was one of the more challenging days.
Reid rolled his eyes. Years of resentment had severed their ties. As he was
about to walk out, another head poked in. Mia.
Mia was my sunshine. When we were younger, she tagged along with Reid
for his visits to Boston. She quickly became my sister, a little doll I loved
and adored.
She was four years younger than us but refused to be treated as such. She
made me put makeup on her and begged me to try on heels. She looked so
darn cute, with her little feet barely filling my shoes. Growing up in a
household with two boys, she was ecstatic when I moved in. She followed
me around, asking me all sorts of girlie questions. She was a force to be
reckoned with. I could be in the worst mood, but she would gab relentlessly
until I gave in and hugged the crap out of her. Mia’s optimism made it
bearable for cynics like me.
Tessa had struggled throughout Mia’s life. At least Reid and Ajax
experienced Tessa’s love before her mental illnesses took hold. Mia never
had the opportunity.
Mia still loved Tessa fiercely. She was capable of unconditional love, one I
craved. My relationship with my parents deteriorated so fast that I didn’t
have the chance to differentiate. Parents were supposed to love you
unconditionally, but mine loved me with conditions.
But Mia loved with all her might. After Ajax, she loved me the most in the
world. Her face lit up every time I walked by, making my chest swell with
pride. Pride over getting another human to look at me that way. It was the
same way I looked at Ajax—like he was the sun and the light at the end of
my dark tunnel—my hero, my idol, my savior.
“Rave!” Mia whined. “Can we watch the movie now?”
“Yes, ma’am. Let’s do it.”
I stuffed the trash I collected in a black garbage bag. As I dragged the bag,
Reid snatched it out of my hand and walked down the stairs to put the trash
outside. It was such a Reid thing to do. Whenever Ajax gave us chores,
Reid found a way out of it or gave him a hard time. Wanting to keep the
peace, I’d volunteer to take care of Reid’s chores. However, he’d
immediately step up to do his chores, along with mine. Reid acted difficult,
but he was a marshmallow.
Reid was Ajax’s problem child. Maybe that’s why Ajax liked having me
around. Reid’s loyalty to me made life easier for Ajax, and I was eager to
make life easier for Ajax Sinclair.
Ajax. Just thinking of him brought a smile to my face. He was coming
home tonight from campus. It had been a few days, and I missed him like
crazy.
Reid, Mia, and I sat on the couch, propping our feet on the coffee table.
This was our typical movie night position. The coffee table was covered
with take-out, popcorn, and candy. Ajax disapproved of Mia eating candy in
the evening, so I had to negotiate portion control with her. Mia didn’t stand
a chance at overeating anyway because I usually devoured the candy. If
there were sweets in my vicinity, I had to stuff my face with them. Thank
God I took dance classes. I’d be five hundred pounds otherwise.
We turned on the movie. Mia cuddled up to my side as Reid threw an arm
around my shoulders. I leaned back with a candy bar. I loved our family
traditions.
Many of my girlfriends also wished for my little family traditions and living
arrangement, but for a different reason. Most of them swooned over Reid
and Ajax. Reid had joined Ajax on his dedicated gym routine last summer.
The girls had taken notice he’d gained twenty pounds of muscle within the
year. Before we finished our freshman year of high school, Reid had only
kissed one girl. Now, he had a rotation. They were eager to be my friend
and to be on Reid’s radar.
I found it amusing. Ajax, not so much.
He was uncomfortable with Reid’s newfound popularity. Ajax suggested
that Reid waited to have sex until he liked one girl enough to make safe
choices. Reid was pissed at Ajax for meddling and called him a hypocrite
since Ajax started having sex earlier than fifteen. Reid wasn’t wrong in his
assessment.
After turning fifteen, Ajax allowed us to attend his infamous parties. He no
longer wanted to keep fighting with Reid and trusted me to keep him in
check. We discovered through the grapevines of these parties that Ajax was
thirteen or fourteen when he lost his virginity.
Ajax explained he didn’t have an active adult in his life while growing up,
someone to give him better advice about sex. He didn’t want Reid to make
the same mistakes. It made sense to me, but Reid wasn’t so understanding.
That boy was always angry nowadays. Thank God he had a beautiful face to
fall back on.
Both the Sinclair boys were easy on the eyes. Girls swooned over them,
especially Ajax. It was evident that Ajax had an active sex life. I overheard
girls at these parties discuss his ‘lickable six-pack’ and ‘fuckable dick.’
Too. Much. Information.
Yes, Ajax was good-looking. It wasn’t about his sharp cheekbones,
emerald-green eyes, strong set jaw, or his tall, dark hair and handsome
build. It was Ajax’s aura. He was a good dresser and turned heads with how
he carried himself. There had been times everyone would stop to stare when
Ajax walked into a room.
If I was objective, Ajax was more than good-looking. But I never allowed
myself to think past it. To me, both Ajax and Reid were my brothers. The
other girls didn’t see it that way. Ajax’s groupies used to give me the stank
eye. It took them months to realize I was equivalent to his little sister. Once
they did, the girls wanted to be my friend, just like Reid’s groupies. They
bombarded me with questions about Ajax, begging for information to give
them an in. Many of them had slept with Ajax, but they wanted girlfriend
status and wondered how to make it happen.
I understood the appeal of wanting a deeper connection with Ajax. I'd be
the super-obsessed president if there were a Ajax fan club. Even while
growing up, Ajax was my phantom superhero. Mia and Reid idolized him.
My dad considered the Sinclairs lucky for their golden boy, Ajax, an
academically gifted teenager taking care of his family.
Since the night we met, Ajax had taken care of me. He gave me a
permanent home, a real family, and he was my third parent. Ajax was the
one to meet with my guidance counselor, attend the PTA meetings, sign
permission slips, and write checks for field trips. He never treated it as an
inconvenience. If he harbored resentment toward me, he never let it show.
Ajax was the epitome of what was right. He was responsible, a good friend,
a protector, and a self-sacrificing man of honor and brilliant. He was the
perfect human being.
So, yes, to say I understood Ajax’s appeal was putting it mildly. I did
understand the desire for an emotional connection with him; I just didn’t get
the appeal of a romantic one. I chased a different type of love from Ajax.
Every time I excelled in life, I made it a priority to tell him. I had an
incessant need for his approval. My extreme idolization stemmed from my
parental issues and the need for validation from an authority figure. I was
self-aware enough to admit it.
Nonetheless, I didn’t understand the romantic appeal. If you were searching
for love, romantic love wasn’t the way to go. The marriages in my
immediate environment were toxic. However, the friendships in my life
were indicative of true love. Other girls didn’t believe my words and were
convinced I secretly craved romance.
While not life-altering, I did have one romantic interest this past summer. It
wasn’t how these girls described their feelings for Ajax, but it was good
enough for me.
Reid had been bugging me to experiment. We did everything together and
wanted to experience our first kisses by the end of freshman year. I settled
on Asher Huntzberger for the purpose after meeting him at one of Ajax’s
parties. Asher was a family friend of the Sinclairs. He attended college with
Ajax and had a quick wit about him. He was handsome with dark hair and
sharp looks. When we met, Asher was Ajax’s age. I’d only turned fifteen,
though everyone assumed I was seventeen due to the outfits my mother sent
me. I never lied about my age, but Asher never asked, either. I figured out
his age after Ajax mentioned they were from the same year at Columbia.
Asher and I hit it off and made out discreetly throughout the summer. I
never took it further than kissing, but Asher did ask me out a few times.
Ajax was overprotective. Kissing was one thing, but if he found out I was
dating a nineteen-year-old boy, he’d lose it. As far as I was concerned,
kissing was an experiment. For all intents and purposes, it was a successful
exercise. Asher didn’t pique my interest enough to pick a fight with Ajax or
to jeopardize the harmony I shared with the crazy Sinclairs.
The craziest of the Sinclairs, Mia, hopped out of our comfortable seating
arrangement without warning. Surprised by her abrupt movement, I
followed her gaze and spotted Ajax walking toward our front door. I stood
to greet him as well, excitement coursing through me at the sight.
Ajax.
Raven and Mia were up from the sofa, ready to greet me before I could
open the door. My two favorite girls in the world.
I acted annoyed as Mia hugged me hard enough to tip me back. “What’s up,
little one?”
“I’m not so little anymore.” Mia pouted, and I pouted back. She grinned at
my imitation of her.
Then there was her. She was smiling that smile at me. The one where she
looked at me like I was her entire world.
I hated it.
I loved it.
Raven placed a hand on my shoulder and leaned in to kiss me on the cheek.
A zing shot through my body, and my heartbeat picked up. Soft, such soft
lips. How did she keep them this soft? I held my breath until she moved
back.
The kiss was too short. The kiss was too long.
Her lips were too much. I missed her lips.
Raven was a walking contradiction for me.
What the fuck was wrong with me? Raven was fifteen, a sophomore in high
school. I was a month shy of turning nineteen and a sophomore in college.
She was too young for my wayward thoughts. Not to mention, Reid would
go ballistic. He lost it whenever Raven took my side during arguments.
They grew up relying on each other as an escape from their shit parents.
Reid believed Raven belonged to him.
However, Raven was now my escape from this shit life, too. I needed her,
but Reid would never see it that way.
I turned my attention to Reid, who was already scowling. Great. What did I
do this time? I’d barely walked through the door. How could I have ruined
the great Reid Sinclair’s night?
“You’re late.”
“Sorry, man. There was a lot of traffic. Did you guys start the movie?”
“We’re almost done. You missed it.”
“No, you didn’t,” Raven piped in. “God, Reid. You are such a drama
queen.”
The girl melted my heart. She had my back and made everything in my life
better.
Mia turned impatient at our dilly-dallying. “Let’s go! Movie!”
We headed to the living room. Mia threw herself on the rug, stretching out
on her stomach in front of the TV. I dropped my backpack and plopped on
one side of the sofa with Raven next to me. My heart stopped when her
scent hit my senses. The vanilla smell. It was familiar; it was her. The scent
was barely accessible, making it more intoxicating. I leaned toward her to
follow the intoxicating aroma.
Stop it. Stop it. Stop it.
I straightened upon realizing my action and stared straight ahead at the
television. Reid tugged Raven toward his end of the sofa. A pang of
jealousy hit me. I wasn’t worried about a romantic connection between the
two. Once Reid started parading around his bevy of girls, I searched
Raven’s reaction. She seemed amused and ended up befriending most of the
girls. Even Raven couldn’t act that aloof if it weren’t her truth.
However, they had a natural connection, one I craved with Raven. They
cuddled and walked hand in hand since they were babies. Their connection
was easy. There was no sexual tension, so they were physically comfortable
with one another. It killed me.
Raven spoke of their souls being connected because they were two
codependent damaged adolescents. But my soul was profoundly connected
to her, too. In the last couple of years, Raven was the only person I sought
for solace. She was my confidante. On the nights I was home, Raven came
to my room, and we spoke for hours.
She often discussed her mom. Theressa had been a better mother as of late.
Like Uncle John, Theressa was overtly expressive of her gratitude for
taking Raven in. I wasn’t her biggest fan, but I behaved politely because she
was trying. Theressa had been diligent about paying Raven’s school tuition
and sent me monthly checks to cover any other expenses. Raven shared her
mother’s love for fashion and wanted to attend FIT, the Fashion Institute of
Technology. She showed me her designs and spoke of the innovative
materials she planned to use. The sketches and outfits were as unique as
Raven.
In turn, I spoke to Raven about my shitty life. I discussed the panic attacks I
started experiencing a few years ago. Anti-anxiety medications helped,
though I hated taking them because they came with risks of addiction.
Every risk had to be assessed with dependents relying on you. I also opened
up about my challenging family. Mom had sunk deeper into depression. We
tried everything—psychiatrists, therapy, antidepressant drugs—all failed
attempts.
Dad worked hard to keep us afloat. We had more money coming in with his
new position as a visiting physician in the Cayman Islands. He flew home
once a month, but it was hard not having his support. I no longer had a
backup.
I didn’t expect to become the sole guardian of my siblings at the age of
eighteen. While they were my life, Mia and Reid were challenging. Reid
fought me every step of the way. I had found cigarette butts in his room,
weed, and random girls. His anger was out of control. I had tried and tried,
but his rebellious streak was mentally exhausting.
Mia was my light, but she was difficult, too. She needed a nanny—someone
who could pick her up from school and take care of her—but she chased
away the vetted professionals.
On top of taking care of them, I wanted to ensure they weren’t spoiled rich
kids. I forced them to do chores to earn an allowance, do their homework,
and set the dinner table. Some days, my schedule was so packed that the
idea of waking up the next day and doing it all over again paralyzed me
with anxiety.
However, when Raven came into my life, things changed. She put me back
together.
It started innocent enough. When she moved in, she’d help clean up after
dinner and casually spoke about life. Soon, our discussions evolved. We’d
stay up for hours, sharing and pouring out our souls to one another. When I
spoke to Raven, she simply listened. She never offered advice or hollow
sympathies. Instead, she took on some of my responsibilities. She checked
in on Mom, coaxed her into showering, and cleaned her room. She
convinced Mia to let the nanny stay so I could experience a normal college
life. She was the only person who could deal with Reid. She knew when to
stand her ground and when to leave him be to stew in his anger.
Raven did everything in her power to make my life easier and to create
flexibility in my schedule. I’d look at her, and for the first time in years, I
could breathe. I’d been taking care of everyone, never realizing how much I
needed someone to take care of me.
She had a little crush on me, glancing at me like I was the only man in this
world. Many of our friends suspected and teased me for it, not expecting me
to reciprocate similar feelings. No one took it seriously. I tried not to, either,
chalking it up to adolescent nonsense. It was getting more difficult by the
day.
However, Uncle John would lose all respect for me if I chased his fifteenyear-old daughter, who’s legally my dependent. I was the older one in this
situation and had to make the tough call; the responsible decision. It was
hell. I didn’t have the heart to tell Raven not to come to my room, but I left
the door open, so her actions were perceived as innocent. I restrained
myself but masked my expressions so as never to lead her on.
I told myself these feelings were fleeting and would pass. Our emotions
were amplified due to our situation. Yet, time barely moved without her. I
always watched the time, drowning in my obsession and waiting for the
clock to announce the next minute. Another minute to pass meant another
moment closer to going home to her for those four days.
My biggest hope was Raven getting over her feelings.
My biggest fear was Raven getting over her feelings.
As mentioned, my feelings for her were a paradox, which was why it was
killing me to sit here without touching her. I couldn’t get a read on her as
she watched the movie. She was less than a foot away, but it might as well
be a million miles.
Unable to help myself, I wrapped my hand around her right foot. It was
tucked against me on the couch. Her head was on Reid’s shoulder, but she
twisted to the side and glanced at me. I squeezed gently before tickling her
foot. In turn, Raven gave me that smile. My heart swelled, making another
moment without her bearable.
As long as she kept showering me with that look, anything was bearable.
MAY 2015.
Raven.
I was turning seventeen tonight. We were turning seventeen
tonight.
Another year and another joint party organized by Ajax. At midnight, Reid
and I would turn seventeen. Everyone was at the venue. Ajax had arranged
for a limo to pick us up, so we could make a grand entrance.
I put on the finishing touches while waiting for the limo. I had straightened
my hair tonight and wore more makeup than before. I was nervous about
the outfit Mom had sent for the occasion, so I kept adding more makeup,
hoping it’d somehow distract from the semi-provocative clothes. Now, I felt
subconscious about having overdone it.
Theressa Beckett Special was what we called Mom’s scandalous clothes.
The two-piece attire for tonight was tight. The top was white and resembled
a bra. It had thin straps and showed a bit of cleavage. The skirt began where
the top ended, exposing my midriff.
I was shocked my mother sent me these outfits. Perhaps Europe was more
open-minded?
I completed the outfit with dangle earrings and high-heeled Louboutins
before marching down the stairs to meet Reid. I spotted him standing in the
foyer. He was in a button-down shirt and black slacks. He had bulked up in
the last couple of years. The little boy I knew was now a tall, two-hundredpound man. His shirt highlighted his muscled frame. He was freshly
showered and shaved. If possible, he looked better than usual. His flock of
admirers would shit themselves when they saw him, and I was a lucky girl
to have such a good-looking escort.
Reid stared incredulously as I descended. Damnit. This outfit was too much.
I would have selected something else had Mom not insisted we send her a
video message at midnight. She’d be upset if I wasn’t wearing her handselected choice in the video.
“Damn, Rave.” I laughed when Reid coughed. He whistled like the cocky
bastard that he was. “You look hot. I have to kill a lot of handsy dudes
tonight when they try to maul you.”
I laughed again. “Not looking so bad yourself. Should I also threaten the
women who look at you with perverse intentions?”
“If it bothers you, then yes. Please do.” He lowered his voice, wiggling his
eyebrows.
“Ha-ha… Is the limo here?”
Reid opened the door for me, staring after me as we walked through it.
“Yeah.”
“Stop it. You’re making me self-conscious. Fucking Theressa Beckett
Specials.”
“I love it. I hope she never stops sending you these. But maybe you should
only wear them around the house. Then Ajax and I don’t have to fight pervs
who eye-fuck you.”
I smacked his stomach with my purse before sliding inside the limo. We
wasted no time and had the driver blast our favorite station. Reid pressed
the button to close the partition and pulled out two flasks. He handed me
one, and we raised the flasks in unison.
“Cheers to us. Happy Fucking Birthday.”
“Happy Fucking Birthday to you!”
We took swigs from the flasks and moved to the music. Our hands were in
the air, dancing the best we could from our seated positions as we sang
along to the lyrics. Thank God the partition was closed. Reid and I had
terrible voices. No one should have to witness this.
After a while, Reid reached out to turn down the music. I shot him a look
with a telepathic question. What's up?
“Rave, I fucking love you. I love sharing my birthdays with you.”
“Well, I fucking love you, too. I hate sharing my birthdays with you. I want
the attention all to myself.”
We threw our heads back and laughed.
“Hey, I’ve been meaning to talk to you about something.”
I sent him another silent question. About what?
“Ajax.”
I rolled my eyes. Ajax was a sore topic between us. Reid disliked his
brother laying down the law. I saw it as a caretaker who cared. Trust me,
there were worse things than someone caring enough to say no. At this
point, we were at an impasse.
“Don’t, Reid. He saved all the money Uncle Reese gave him for household
expenses to throw us this epic party. Can we just have a good time tonight?
Please.”
Reid ran a hand down his face.
“Jesus, calm down. I'm not trying to pick a fight. It’s statements like those
that I want to talk to you about.” Reid appeared sad, not angry, which was
atypical. “Look, I'm just going to say it. You’re supposed to be my best
friend. But this obsession you have with Ajax is a big obstacle in our
friendship.”
I didn’t like where this was headed. However, we’d hit traffic and we’re
moving at a snail's pace. If there were things he wanted to discuss, we had
all the time in the world.
“You look at him like he is your whole world. Like he is God. I’ve felt
jealous for years, but I didn’t say anything. Instead, I lashed out. Before, it
was you and me against the world. We looked out for one another. You
looked at me like I was your world. And now you only look at Ajax that
way.” Reid paused, shifting in his seat awkwardly.
Okay, I can see his point. Fair enough. I silently communicate, Go on.
“You guys have been so in sync recently. Like you have an unspoken
understanding. It sucks.” Reid closed his eyes and leaned back. “Dude, I get
it. Everyone loves Ajax for taking care of us. I can be angry at him, but
even I worship him. He did everything for me. Still does.”
Reid was silent, and I didn’t make a peep. I wanted to hear his thoughts.
“It’s not my fucking fault that my parents forced Ajax into this position.”
Reid’s eyes were down, and his hands clasped on his lap. “I wasn’t
presented with the opportunity to act as your guardian. It doesn’t mean I’m
incapable of it. If I had the chance, I could also prove that I could take care
of you. You’re my best friend. I'll always take care of you.”
It was true. Before moving into the Sinclair home, Reid often had me stay
over because of my home situation and invited me to every family outing.
Dad was scatterbrained when we moved to New York. He’d forget to give
me lunch money. If I stayed at their house, Ajax packed me lunch.
Otherwise, Reid would have a tray of food waiting for me at our cafeteria
table, leaving no room for my reluctance. He’d do anything for me like I
would for him.
Had I been acting so obsessive? Did Reid not know I also thought the world
of him?
“You have this weird fixation with parental figures. That’s something I can
never be for you. It just sucks to lose your attention because of something I
have no control over.” Reid was articulating this conversation well. His
thoughts were concise and well put together. This spiel was rehearsed. He
wasn’t lying about wanting to have this talk. The liquid courage gave him
the push he needed.
“Reid—”
“Let me finish. It might be the tequila talking, but I want to get this out in
the open. You look at Ajax with admiration and respect, like everyone else.
You do everything to make him notice you, to make him say he is proud of
you. Anytime something big happens, you call him instead of me. I hate
him for taking you away from me, and I don’t want to hate Ajax.”
Reid’s body shook with a shudder, like he was gearing up to say something
worse. I braced myself. Whatever he was about to say would be hard to
process.
“To me, these feelings of admiration seem more than platonic. It feels like
you’re infatuated with him. Anyone observing would draw the same
conclusion. It’s like you're in love with him. I can’t stomach it.”
And there it was—the heinous thought. It had me speechless. Almost.
“That’s ridiculous! I can’t believe you’d suggest that.” I refused to let such
an insinuation pass. “Ajax is legally my guardian.”
“And I’m supposed to be your Best. Fucking. Friend.” He enunciated each
word as if emphasizing the meaning. “Look, Rave. I hate to pull this card,
but you were my friend first. I’ve been irritated about it for years, but I
didn’t know how to address it. I’m addressing it for my sanity.”
His proclamation hung in the tense air between us. Reid continued, “Ever
since we were kids, I've only had you. I can’t talk to any of my other
friends. Nor can I talk to my groupies, as you call them, about the shit at
home. If I lose you, I won’t have anyone. And every time I see you with
Ajax, I feel like I’m losing you. The whole world loves Ajax and looks at
me like I’m the fuck up. I can’t be second-best in your eyes, too. I only
have your admiration, and he wants to take that away from me. I don’t want
to hate him, but this jealousy is destroying my relationship with Ajax. It’s
also fucking with our friendship. I'm not asking for much, just put some
distance between the two of you. I'm sorry if that’s unfair, but I can’t share
you with him. I just can’t. The truth is, I need you more than he needs you.”
I silently reflected on his words. Reid didn’t rush me for a response, aware
of my preference to process thoughts and analyze my emotions first.
“You are right. You’re absolutely right,” I finally admitted. “I’m sorry. I’ve
been a shitty friend.”
Reid was right on all accounts. Why didn’t I see this before? Reid had been
angry for a long time. It had gotten worse every year, and it was my fault. I
didn’t understand his anger toward Ajax. Now, it made sense.
I loved being Reid’s favorite person. In return, I’d made Reid feel Ajax was
my favorite person. In my desperation for love from a father figure, I left
Reid in the cold and ruined their relationship.
This insatiable need to please an authority figure had taken a sick form.
Ajax never expected anything, but I’d probably walk to his dorm every day
if he patted me on the head and said, Good girl.
Another horrifying realization crossed my mind.
Reid made it sound like I was a lovesick puppy, filled with more than
sisterly love and admiration for Ajax. I could see why he made such a
presumption. I trusted Ajax to know best. I didn’t do anything unless Ajax
approved of it. I did everything to make him happy or proud. In my
obsession to make Ajax happy, I’d been acting like some desperate,
infatuated adolescent.
I texted him constantly. When he slept at the house, I sought him out,
searching for words of encouragement about my accomplishments or
academic success.
Reid had misconstrued my feelings. Ajax must think I was pathetic about
how I’d been throwing myself at him. Oh, God. I probably made him
uncomfortable with my advances. I had acted like one of those groupies
who chased the Sinclair brothers. A psycho stalker. I was ashamed of my
behavior.
Well, it stopped today. Ajax was my hero. I would always seek his
approval, but I could stop acting desperate. Reid was right. I needed to
distance myself from Ajax and ration my texts and calls.
Reid glanced at me tentatively while I made these decisions in my head. I
decided to disclose my thoughts. “I seek Ajax’s approval because I can’t
bear the thought of another parent leaving me. I do have a parent complex.
But you have to trust me, this is more about my abandonment issues than
any romantic interest.”
Reid silently nudged me to continue.
“I got sidetracked in my fucked-up head. You’re the most important person
to me, and I'm so sorry if I made you feel otherwise. Thank you for talking
to me. I didn’t realize how poorly I was behaving until you explained how
my actions came off. I promise you; I’ll work on a more appropriate
relationship with Ajax. You are my other half. I wouldn’t jeopardize that.”
Reid appeared visibly relieved. His face broke out in a grin big enough to
split it in half. “Damn. If I knew it’d be so easy, I would have told you
when we were fourteen. Why do you have to be so mature and
understanding? I was looking forward to a fight.”
“If you like, I can still fight you. Let’s call it your birthday present.”
“Is that your way of telling me you didn’t get me a real gift?”
“You don’t want the present? Fine, I won’t fight you.”
We were both grinning. Reid grabbed a flute from the limo bar and poured a
glass of champagne. Taking my hand, he quickly kissed it before handing
me the flute.
“So, I am your other half, huh?”
“Duh! What are we going to do when we have significant others? Who will
deal with our codependency? At this rate, I'll die a virgin.”
“If you’re worried, I can help you take care of it.”
God, this boy was a flirt when he drank. “Please, I don’t need you and your
STDs to break my hymen.”
“Your hymen will love my STDs.” Reid winked. “Seriously, Rave. Why are
you hanging on to it? Waiting for someone special?”
“Meh.” I shrugged. “Feels like I’ll never be interested enough to go all the
way. I considered going lesbian.”
“You did?” Reid leaned in.
I giggled. “I forgot to tell you. I almost kissed Amy Flinch a couple of years
ago after a house party.”
“No fucking way. What happened?”
I laughed at Reid’s ridiculously excited face. We were already plastered.
“Honestly, I pulled away at the last minute. I didn’t feel the chemistry.
That’s what it comes down to—science. We’re attracted to people because
of smells and pheromones. Attraction is undeniable. I just haven’t
experienced it.”
“I know what you mean.”
“No, you don’t. You have a rotation of groupies coming in and out of our
house. Don’t empathize with my situation. You don’t fit in with my
weirdness.”
“I fit in with all your weirdness. And a physical act doesn’t mean attraction
or chemistry. I don’t necessarily feel the chemistry when I meet a goodlooking girl. I can objectively confirm she is pretty and have a good time
hooking up with her. It doesn’t mean there is a raw, carnal attraction or we
have an unexplainable pull.”
“Keep that in mind when you aren’t feeling chemistry with the groupies
throwing themselves at you tonight.”
“Before I forget, here you go.” Reid took out a small box from his jacket
pocket and handed it to me, grinning ear to ear. “Open it later.”
“And here you go.” I surprised him with a box of my own that I took out of
my purse.
“And here we are!” Reid threw his hands up as the limo came to a stop and
the chauffeur opened the door.
Reid and I put away our gifts and headed inside the party. We were guided
to the elevator that took us to the rooftop restaurant. We walked out of the
elevator and into a stream of greetings, cheers, and “Happy Birthdays.”
Our friends surrounded us as the welcome committee. Ajax had gone all
out. He rented a section of the rooftop restaurant and it looked fantastic.
There was a DJ, a photo booth, arcade games, and a dessert table. My heart
panged upon realizing that Ajax did the dessert table for me. Reid hated
sweets.
This was going to be harder than I thought.
Ajax.
I’d been staring at the entrance, barely responding to the people addressing
me. Usually, I was more polite.
Where are they? Where is she?
Our family friends were here, along with Raven and Reid’s high school
friends. My friends, who had become close to Reid and Raven through our
house parties, were in attendance, too. Thank fuck. I’d be blowing out my
brains if I had to babysit a room full of teenagers.
Other than the hormonal teenagers and the raging college students, there
was another attendant—Mia. Against my better judgment, Raven convinced
me to let Mia attend. Mia’s curfew had been extended, and the little devil
was milking every second. Mia was in one of Raven’s outfits, a Theressa
Beckett Special. Instead of looking like a twelve-year-old, she looked
fifteen. I hated it.
Mia was thrilled to be included in one of our parties. She wanted to play the
part, so Raven dolled her up. As a birthday gift to Raven, I wasn’t allowed
to protest. Leave it to Raven to use her birthday gift on one of us. At least
part two of her gift was only for her. I couldn’t wait to see her expression
when I gave it to her.
Which brought me back to, Where the hell was she? The limo should have
dropped them off by now. Impatience coursed through me as my eyes
transfixed on the door. I turned to the bar for another drink when I heard
everyone cheering and screaming, Happy Birthday!
Reid and Raven had arrived.
My eyes landed on her. The first thing I noticed was her hair. Her dark,
beautiful hair bounced, flowing and falling. As people shuffled, I finally
saw her silhouette. The wind was knocked out of me when I saw her outfit.
That dress might as well be painted on. It was too fucking tight, hugging
every one of her curves.
My eyes locked on her sexy as fuck legs, made longer by her heels. I lifted
my gaze to her midriff, which showed a little skin. I couldn't look away. I
needed to because I shouldn’t be looking at her this way.
Fucking Theressa Beckett Specials—they left nothing to the imagination.
And right now, mine was running wild.
She was too popular for her good. She was surrounded by mindless men
fawning over her. I could hear every guy’s lewd thoughts because I had
similar notions. I was a miserable soul like the rest of them.
I wanted everyone to disappear. They could drop dead for all I cared. I
didn’t care if I couldn’t have her. I didn’t want them to have her, either.
These weren’t mature or selfless thoughts. I wasn’t selfless, though
everyone looked at me as if I were. I wondered what they’d think if they
knew of my constant war between wanting Raven and having to keep my
distance.
I popped my jaw and pulled out my phone, needing to direct her attention
away from those fuckers.
Ajax: Hey, bday girl! Come find me after you are done being mauled by the
peasants.
The phone in Raven’s hand lit up. She glanced at it without unlocking it and
tensed.
What the hell?
In all the years I’d known her, Raven never failed to respond to me.
Usually, she texted me throughout the day. When I texted back, her
response was immediate. That’s how I got by when I had an onslaught of
panic coursing through me.
Was she mad at me? I racked my brain, wondering how I could have pissed
her off. Raven wasn’t one to hold grudges about petty shit.
Maybe I was overanalyzing it. She was busy with her friends and would
saunter over after hugging the herd of cattle surrounding her. I needed to
calm down. I was just nervous as hell about her gift.
The envelope held an itinerary. Theressa left her job after gaining enough
popularity to start a fashion line. She was currently setting up a store in
Paris. She would be moving there permanently and hosting a fashion show
to launch her new line. It was a big show, guaranteed to propel Theressa’s
career. When I found out, I sent Theressa some of Raven’s designs. She was
inspired enough by one of them to make an outfit. She’d be showcasing
Raven’s design at this show.
Mia is visiting Grand Cayman this summer. Dad’s offer as a visiting
physician was extended. I was okay with it but realized I couldn't take care
of three teenagers and my Mom. Taking care of Mom was a full-time job,
and I had to put Reid, Mia, and Raven’s well-being first. Dad agreed with
my assessment and took Mom to the Cayman Islands. She had been doing
better. The sunshine and water had jived with her.
Things turned significantly better after Mom left, especially with Raven’s
help. I didn’t feel overextended. Dad sent me a steady stream of money to
cover our expenses, plus more. Our grades were on par. Reid fought me, per
usual, but there was no other drastic teenage rebellion to report. Who knew
things would be better without our parents around?
Dad flew back every month to visit. If she could muster up the energy,
Mom joined him, too. During school vacations, Dad flew us out to the
Cayman Islands. Those three loved the water. I loved it, too, because I
didn’t have to stress about responsibilities while on the island. Dad was
excellent about taking over.
However, this summer, only Mia would be joining them. Reid and I will be
joining Raven and Theressa in Paris. Raven didn’t know. Our families had
been instructed to keep it a secret until the fashion show.
I paid extra for a flexible flight ticket. Raven could choose her outbound
and return flights. If she wanted, she could fly out with Reid and me, which
I’d guess would be her preference. For that to happen, I had to give her the
envelope burning a hole in my jacket pocket. So why was I still at the
stupid bar with Raven nowhere in sight?
I craned my neck to search for her. Raven had excused herself from the
crowd of imbeciles vying for her attention. Instead of finding me, she was
headed to the dance floor with Reid.
This was weird. She still hadn’t acknowledged me.
I tried to snap out of it and stop being self-absorbed. This party was in
celebration of her and Reid’s birthday. They should enjoy the night, and I
should enjoy it with them.
I headed to the dance floor to join them. Soon as I reached Raven and Reid,
I threw my hands out to take them into a joint hug.
“Happy Birthday!”
“Thank you, Ajax!” they sang in unison and embraced me with a double
hug.
The music on the dance floor was too loud for conversation, and I couldn’t
assess Raven’s mood while swarmed by our friends. We danced in a group
as guests piled onto the dance floor until it was packed.
Reid and Raven sang along while dancing. We laughed as those two
butchered our favorite songs. They were horrendous singers. The lyrics
were wrong, as were their tunes. I recorded tons of blackmail videos on my
phone to use at their next party.
They danced with everyone but stayed by each other’s side. I felt a familiar
pang of jealousy, the one I regularly felt at their easy connection. I brushed
it off.
Out of nowhere, Reid threw his arms around me. “Thanks for the awesome
party, bro,” Reid said without looking at me like I was the devil incarnate.
“Happy Birthday, little bro. Are you happy with the turnout?”
“Are you freaking kidding me? You outdid yourself. Really, thank you!
You’re the best.”
“Oh, yeah? Last week you told me to choke on a dick.”
“I… I was pissed about something, and I’ve been a little shit. I’m sorry.”
Reid appeared guilty and ran a hand through his hair. His face suddenly
turned serious. He jumped on the stage and whispered something to the DJ.
The music wound down, and Reid grabbed the mic.
“Hello, friends and family,” Reid’s voice boomed from the microphone.
“Thank you for coming tonight. Raven and I are having the best night ever.”
Everyone joined in to clap, hoot, and cheer.
“For those who don't know my brother, Ajax, he threw this party for us.”
He pointed at me. “Yes, the good-looking asshole over there.”
More cheers and hoots followed.
“I want to take a moment to recognize my wonderful brother. He is the best
man I know and the best older brother. He’ll sacrifice everything for us and
ask for nothing in return. Ajax is annoyingly patient with me, though I’m an
asshole who deserves an ass-kicking.” Reid held up his fingers and made a
scout’s honor sign. “So, I, Reid Sinclair, want to take this solemn oath in
front of everyone. From now on, I shalt be an asshole no more.”
A round of amused laughter from our guests filtered throughout the room.
Reid raised an imaginary glass. “And I want to raise a glass to my
wonderful brother. Thank you for everything you do and for never giving
up on me.”
Our guests raised their glasses and yelled, Cheers!
“Now, let’s party!” Reid shouted, and his body dove back to the dance floor
as the music started thumping.
Was that a sincere apology and a promise of a better future? Things had
been on and off with Reid. I could deal with a grumpy teenager, but Reid’s
out-of-control behavior scared Mia. If she no longer had to witness our
fights, I'd take the win.
I turned to find Raven. Grinning, I took her into my arms. She tensed and
turned it into a quick hug with a pat on the back. Again, weird.
“Hey, birthday girl.”
“Hey, Ajax. Sorry I didn’t see you there.”
“No worries. Are you having fun?”
“Yes, of course. Thank you for organizing this. This is wonderful.”
“Of course.”
“Hey, I see a couple of friends I wanted to say hello to. Will you excuse
me?”
“Sure.”
“See you around. And thank you again. This really is a wonderful party.”
I was stumped. Did Raven brush me off? She seemed friendly. She thanked
me twice and was perfectly nice and polite. However, she wouldn’t make
eye contact. Something was off.
My deliberations were interrupted when Reid’s arm hooked around my
neck.
“Awesome speech. Should I be flattered or concerned about how much you
drank?”
“I meant it,” Reid replied. “Things will be different.”
Raven froze me out while Reid treated me to hugs and smiles. Was today
opposite day?
Everyone returned to the dance floor, while I politely dodged the females
trying to dance with me. Not interested. I needed to keep a safe distance
from these frisky teenagers. More importantly, I needed a drink.
I headed to the restaurant bar. It was packed with my college friends,
including Brandon, Asher, Jaci, and Alexa. We were close and had been
working on launching an iOS app together. It started as a project for one of
our classes. Our professor was impressed and suggested networking to find
investors. He contributed to our first round of fundraising and invited us to
exclusive networking events. We’d met potential investors interested in
acting as our silent partners. The app was in the developmental phase. The
release date was set for the summer of next year, which meant our senior
year would be spent fixing bugs and beta-testing the app.
We discussed our next course of action for the summer. I’d spend a good
portion of it in Paris but planned to remain involved via email and calls. As
we spoke, I couldn’t help watching Raven from the corner of my eye. Most
of the men tonight were watching her, too, unable to tear their leering eyes
off her.
When she passed by, I tried to engage her in conversation. She dodged me
the way I had avoided her annoying friends. My ego was severely bruised,
and I was beyond frustrated.
“Who do you keep looking at?” Alexa followed my gaze.
“No one.”
“Doesn’t seem like no one to me.”
Were all the women in my life trying to annoy me to death tonight? I smiled
politely. “Come on, guys. I’ll buy you a round of shots.”
We took the shots and then did another round. Soon enough, Alexa turned
handsy. Too handsy. We had hooked up in the past, but I’d made it clear I
didn’t want anything past a friendship. I hadn’t lived a celibate life, but
lately, something was missing during sex—a release without emotional ties.
I politely declined Alexa’s advances. She took the hint. Alexa wasn’t a
pushy girl, thank God. That’s why we could remain friends.
Still, I remained irritated throughout the night. At midnight, we cheered and
sang Happy Birthday to Reid and Raven. A little after, I received a text from
the limo driver. I’d asked him to return shortly after midnight so that I could
take Mia home. Moving to the dance floor, I searched for the little
troublemaker.
“Mia, the limo is here.”
“Thank God. Let’s go. My feet are killing me. And I hate this dress; it
itches.”
I was shocked. Wearing big girl heels had caught up with Mia. Maybe I
didn’t mind her wearing heels and dressing up after all. Not if it sucked out
some of her extra energy.
“All right, grab your things.”
I searched for Raven, wondering if she wanted to go home with us. At the
back of my mind, I was praying for her to be done with this party. However,
Raven was nowhere to be found.
“Let’s go.” Mia tugged my hand impatiently, whining to go back home.
I took solace in the fact that I’d never seen Raven display interest in men.
Those fuckers could leer. It would never happen. Resignedly, I hugged Reid
goodbye, reminding him the limo would return in an hour to pick them up.
The ride home was quiet. Mia passed out, exhausted from dancing in high
heels. My mind, however, was reeling from Raven’s aloof nature. It left a
tightness in my chest that I couldn’t explain.
Once we were home, I carried Mia inside and put her to bed. I also tried to
turn in but felt the onset of a panic attack. My heart pumped, ready to burst
out of my chest. I took deep breaths, but the oxygen wouldn’t reach my
lungs.
I needed Raven. She always talked me down. If I were at the house, she’d
stroke my cheeks. If I was on campus, we spoke on the phone, and she
counted down with me. Hell, even texting with her soothed me.
This was the first time I’d experienced a panic attack while Raven was
indisposed. I’d been relying on the serenity she brought to my life. I’d
become accustomed to dealing with my attacks through her tranquility. I
took it for granted. I took her for granted.
One night. It was only one night when Raven wasn’t at my beck and call.
Just one night, she was distracted by a party—one in her honor, no less—
and I couldn’t deal with it. I was falling apart, paralyzed without her.
My expectations of her were unfair. I was supposed to care for her, not the
other way around. Yet, the truth was difficult to deny. I had been taking care
of everyone while she had taken care of me.
I took shallow breaths. Despite my better judgment, I took an anti-anxiety
pill. It slowed my heart rate, but not the way Raven calmed me. The thought
of her pinched my chest. I couldn’t shake the weird vibe from tonight. I
needed to clear the air. I also wanted to give her the gift. When I heard
voices outside, I grabbed the envelope from my jacket pocket without
overthinking it and let myself into Raven’s room.
Raven.
I did as Reid suggested. I put distance between Ajax and me. It had already
brought peace into the Sinclair family.
Reid’s moods had been bipolar over the last few years. At times, he got
along with Ajax. They had a gym routine and hung out as a family. At other
times, Reid went off about the pettiest things. Ajax was concerned about the
negative effect of these arguments on Mia. Once, Mia started crying while
Reid was yelling at Ajax. While Ajax shielded Mia, Reid wasn’t eager to
comply.
Well, I planned to help Ajax keep the peace, even if he didn’t know of it.
True to his word, Reid had been a loving brother tonight. There wasn’t a
snarky comment or a passive-aggressive remark. I couldn’t remember the
last Sinclair outing without Reid’s backhanded comments to Ajax.
In exchange, I had to hang out with my best friend without staring at his
brother like a creeper. It was safe not to consider this a massive sacrifice.
Tonight, Reid recognized Ajax’s contributions to his life. Ajax looked so
pleased during Reid’s speech. He had been yearning for Reid’s appreciation
while Reid had been yearning for mine. Reid couldn’t give Ajax what he
needed until I hopped on board.
Ajax needed his brother. Reid needed me. Mia needed both her brothers to
be in harmony. At the same time, I needed all three of them to survive my
otherwise lonely life. If it meant not acting like—oh God, I shuddered at the
next thought—like a groupie, that was a bonus. I liked those girls, but they
hung around Ajax, making moon eyes, hoping he’d throw them a bone.
Yuck. Self-respect, where art thou?
During our party, I caught Alexa drooling over Ajax. I refused to follow
Ajax around like a duckling. I’d been in a religious cult, praying to the
church of Ajax, and I needed to snap out of it. This dose of reality was
crucial, and I wished Reid had had this conversation with me years ago.
I might miss my special friendship with Ajax, but the way Reid worded it, it
sounded like a one-sided friendship anyway. I cherished Ajax’s guidance
and mentorship. Every bit of his advice and suggestion has proven
beneficial to my life. However, giving it up would return a non-angry Reid
to our lives.
Reid and I danced to another set of songs during the ride home. When the
limo came to a stop, Reid pulled me out, taking me into a bear hug. I
screamed when he twirled me, laughing until he set me down. With his
arms around me, Reid leaned back to inspect my face.
“Thank you. Tonight was awesome. We haven’t had that much fun in so
long.” He gave me a soft, appreciative kiss on the cheek before resting his
forehead against mine.
I smiled in agreement. We got high with some school friends. We also drank
a lot. The mind-altering substances were hitting me. I twined our fingers as
we stumbled inside. “I’m exhausted. Good night.”
“What? No way. Let’s get in our PJs and watch Borat. Borat! Borat!” Reid
chanted.
Watching Borat was a time-honored tradition on our birthdays, but I
preferred a rain check for the morning. I was exhausted.
“No, dude, I’m done. Too drunk. Too high,” I mumbled as Reid pouted.
“Good night, Stud.” I stood on my tippy-toes and kissed him on the cheek.
“Good night, Beautiful.”
I wanted to face-plant on my mattress. Swinging open my bedroom door, I
turned on the lights and almost jumped. Sitting on my bed was none other
than Ajax himself.
“Ajax. Hi. Hey. How are you?”
Why was I so awkward? Apparently, I’d been stalking this man for years—
albeit without meaning to do so—and now, I couldn’t word a simple
greeting.
Hi. Hey. How are you?
What the hell, Raven?
Sober. Up. Right. Now.
Though I was drunk and high, I had to clear the fog fast. Ajax was staring at
me like I was a lunatic. I willed my mind to sober up and form cohesive
thoughts. I also reminded myself of the promise I made to Reid.
My objective was to ensure everyone in this family got along. My method
to do this was through compartmentalization. I had to separate Ajax—the
guardian—from Ajax, the friend. I could no longer be part of this Ajax cult,
though Ajax-ism was the true religion and he was a God—
Fuck. Stop it. Stop it. Stop it.
I changed tactics.
What if I pretended that my job was for this family to get along, and I
earned my living through the currency of love and a warm home? If this
were my profession, public displays of religious acts would be deemed
unprofessional at the workplace. If I genuinely believed Ajax-ism to be a
religion, I had to maintain professional boundaries, though religious beliefs
could coexist. If the two were in conjunction, I’d have an amicable solution.
I had to show Ajax respect while maintaining a professional distance.
My mind raced with philosophical ideas while in my high and drunken
stupor. However, my motor skills hadn’t caught up. I couldn’t form words.
“Rave. Did you hear what I said?”
No. “Yes.”
“What did I say, Rave?”
I focused my energy on forming the words. “You want to talk.” Don’t see
him like a god. There was no reason to idolize someone because they took
you in, gave you a family, became your legal guardian, showered you with
love, and filled your empty heart.
Oh. My. Fucking. God. I did have a problem with this Ajax obsession. I
grabbed the water off my nightstand and chugged the contents inside the
glass.
“Thirsty much?”
“Yes… much,” I slurred before catching myself.
"Are you drunk?"
Yes. "No, just tired."
“Okay. Wait here. I'll be right back.”
Ajax was gone in a flash. Was it a hallucination? Reid and I had an edible,
along with copious amounts of alcohol. So, it must have been a dream. I
made a mind fuck analogy for no reason. I forced myself to sober up, and it
was only for Dream Ajax.
I fell backward on the bed and stared at the ceiling. Of course, it was a
dream. Dreams were our conscience surfacing what was on our minds.
Right now, I felt guilty.
Guilty for creating a rift between the Sinclair brothers, making Reid resent
his brother, and putting Mia through unnecessary family drama. I feel guilty
for making Ajax uncomfortable with my advances. My actions were meant
to portray my gratitude, not a sexually charged teenager.
Shamelessly, I felt more pain than guilt over giving up my close friendship
with Ajax. It was a closeness I craved above everything in this world.
That’s why I conjured Ajax.
If I did it once, I wondered if I could do it again. I squinted my eyes to
conjure my guardian, so he could tell me he was proud, that I was worth
sticking around for, and that he loved me.
I opened my eyes. My subconscious did well. Ajax stood in front with a
glass of water in hand.
Ajax.
“Here, drink this.”
I sat the glass of water on Raven’s nightstand. She smiled that smile, the
one reserved only for me. Not the bullshit, polite one from earlier. My heart
exploded at the massive grin on her face. She was beautiful.
“Okay.”
“You’re in bed with heels on. Aren’t you going to take them off?”
Raven lifted her head. “You take them off.”
I chuckled. My mood was brighter from her playfulness. The previous dark
thoughts had dissipated. Sinking to my knees, I pulled her legs to the side of
the bed. I undid the straps of her heels, taking them off one at a time.
“Jesus, these are at least four inches. How the hell did you dance in these?”
“Hehe.”
“Seriously, don’t your feet hurt?”
“Can you rub them—” she trailed off.
This was a terrible idea, though I didn’t deny her request. I braced her feet
on my thighs and massaged with the heel of my palm.
“Mmmm.”
The moment I heard Raven’s moan, my muscles moved involuntarily. As if
floating out of my body and into astral projection, I stared down from the
ceiling and watched my lips kissing her right foot. My body stiffened upon
realizing what I had done.
I slowly lifted and sat next to Raven on the bed. She was still in the outfit
that gave me a heart attack earlier in the night.
“Aren’t you going to change?” I rasped out.
“Naaa… tell me things?”
“What things?”
“Just things. Things you couldn't say at the party.”
“I wanted to talk to you about that.”
“Okay”
“Were you mad at me tonight?”
Raven turned to face me. She appeared sad. Really fucking sad. “No, Ajax.
Never at you. Everyone but you.” She placed a hand on my cheek. “You
saved me.”
I shattered like a broken mirror. That’s what I was, a shattered mirror on the
floor with too many tiny, scattered pieces to put back together.
You saved me.
Raven’s words haunted me because she saved me. She saved me every day.
I needed her calming hand on my cheek. Raven—my fucking doctorordered prescription.
I turned my head and kissed her palm. It gave me access to her scent,
vanilla—the smell of home, comfort, intensity, and obsession. I wanted to
smell it again. I covered her hand with mine. I kissed it again before trailing
my lips to her pulse.
“Rave—”
“Are you going to leave me?”
“What? What kind of question is that?”
“Don’t ever leave me."
I reached for her, brushing her cheek with the back of my hand, the other
stroking her hair. “I’ll never leave you.”
“You can't leave me. No matter what I do. It’ll break my heart if you do.
Promise me you won’t leave me.”
Raven was rarely emotional, and I stared in bewilderment.
“Say it.”
“I promise I’ll never leave you.”
“No matter what?”
“No matter what.”
“Ajax.”
“Yes?”
“I love you.”
I remained silent. Raven stared at me with glossy eyes, and I could no
longer take it. I leaned in to kiss her eyelids. I shouldn’t have done that
because now, I needed more. Unable to find the strength to stop, I kissed
both her cheeks. Next, I kissed her nose, followed by her temple. Raven
leaned against my forehead and closed her eyes.
I stared at her mouth for what must have been an eternity. I could hardly
breathe as I dipped lower and brushed my lips against hers.
Raven said nothing.
I kissed her again. This time, Raven raised her head to kiss me back. She
placed her hand on my cheek as I leaned in. I pressed my lips firmly against
hers and took a sharp breath.
“Don’t leave me, Ajax,” Raven murmured against my lips, eyes closed.
I didn’t want to, but I had to do it. I couldn’t stay here any longer.
Fuck. I kissed her.
Then I kissed her again.
And she kissed me.
I shook my head. “Go to sleep. We’ll talk about it later.” I pulled the covers
and left the water on her nightstand, along with the envelope.
I wanted to see her reaction when she opened the gift, but I had to leave
early in the morning. I was meeting the gang on campus to work on a
presentation. Later in the evening, we were leaving for Philadelphia. We
had investor meetings lined up and had to miss our classes for the week. We
were traveling between Philadelphia and DC, returning on Thursday. I
didn’t want to wait until my return to give her the envelope.
Tonight was a reality check for how much I needed Raven. Though I
couldn’t be with her, this carefully planned itinerary would portray how
much I valued and cared for her. The itinerary had confirmation numbers
for her open-ended plane tickets. The envelope also included a list of
activities Raven liked. Amongst other things, I bought her a ten-class
package for French Cancan dance lessons, something she had been dying to
learn. I spent days researching activities close to Theressa’s residence.
This trip to Paris was meant to propel Raven’s career. She’d gain experience
working at her mom’s shop, putting together displays, and dressing models.
Her outfit would be showcased at a real fashion show, increasing her
chances of attending FIT.
After our kiss, the last thing I wanted was to leave her, but I meant it when I
said we’d discuss it later. With another kiss on her forehead, I forced myself
to close the door on the sleeping beauty.
I had barely heard from Raven in the last couple of days.
She wasn’t a confrontational person. Maybe she didn’t want to discuss the
kiss or was mad that I left. At the very least, I assumed she’d thank me for
the envelope.
No such luck.
I wanted to talk about the kiss, but her unresponsive texts made it difficult.
The situation was complicated, much like Raven.
My friends knew Raven had a crush on me. I suspect Reid did, too.
Everyone thought I humored her while ignoring the silly crush. No one
knew that ignoring her feelings was torture, but I had no choice. Her parents
trusted me with her care.
For fuck’s sake, I couldn’t be her boyfriend if I was attending PTA meetings
and signing her permission slips. It’d be a scandal of epic proportions if we
were to be more. We had too many family friends and too large of a social
network. The gossip would spread like wildfire in our community, with
everyone jesting and sneering behind our backs. It’d be humiliating for
Raven, Reid, Mia, and our parents.
But since the kiss, I hardly cared about those valid reasons. It was barely a
kiss, but I kept hearing Raven say she loved me. It tore me up. I called her
on Monday after my investor meetings. She didn’t pick up or return my
call. Instead, she texted me the following day.
Rave: Sorry I didn’t get a chance to call you back.
Ajax: I was just checking in. How’s everything going?
Her next text came late at night.
Rave: Mia is good. We are all doing great. Thank you.
Ajax: Did you open the envelope I left on your nightstand?
Again, she left me hanging until the next day.
Rave: Yes, thank you.
The dismissive messages were on my last nerve.
Ajax: I take it from the curt responses that you aren’t a fan of Paris?
This time her response was quicker but no less infuriating.
Rave: On the contrary, I am leaving early for Paris. I spoke to my teachers. I
only have two final papers left. My teachers agreed to let me email them. I am
done for the semester.
What the fuck.
Ajax: What? Why didn’t you check with me before making these decisions?
Rave: I’m checking with you now.
Ajax: After you already decided…
No response. Nothing after dropping the bomb. Finally, I received a
response after hours of checking my phone.
Rave: You are the one who wanted me to go to Paris.
“This is fucking ridiculous,” I muttered to myself.
Ajax: You are leaving between your school year.
Rave: I’m not. I am done with my school year.
I stared at the messages. I couldn’t believe Raven didn’t check with me
first. This was unlike her. Anger pounded through me, and I wanted to
throw the phone against the wall.
Ajax: When are you leaving?
Raven hammered the final nail in the coffin with her response.
Rave: Tomorrow.
Ajax: You are leaving before I get home?
Rave: The only available flight was in the morning.
She was making a fast exit, purposely leaving before my return. This went
beyond non-confrontational Raven. Something about the way she was
bailing didn’t add up. That girl pined after me for years, and I finally gave
in a little. Wouldn't she want to talk about the kiss at the very least?
Then it hit me.
It happened. Raven was moving on. She wanted to be done with this
adolescent crush and wanted to move forward with someone other than her
guardian. That’s why she was aloof at the birthday party. The kiss was
backward momentum for her, not forward.
I reminded myself, this is the way it’s supposed to be. We were supposed to
outgrow these inappropriate feelings and focus on our roles as guardianward. She was making the mature decision. Raven was stronger and
possessed more willpower than me. She wanted me for years but never
made a move, though my resolute nearly broke numerous times.
Yes, this was the right decision. We needed distance after what transpired.
So, why was I hollow on the inside? It felt as if she had sucker-punched me.
If Raven made the right decision by leaving, why was it tearing me in half?
3 Months later.
This summer had been rough; it was the worst one of my life.
I tried to keep busy. Our app had gained traction and investors. I was also
gearing up for my last year of college.
Between networking, investor meetings, and fixing bugs on the app, there
shouldn’t have been time to think. Regardless, the thoughts returned every
fucking second. I couldn’t take it anymore. The silence. This distance
between us.
Unable to help myself, I messaged Raven a few times. She either sent
delayed responses or was curt with her texts. She never picked up my calls,
making excuses about working at her mom’s shop, the time difference, or
spotty signals.
Though Raven had made the right decision, it had left a hole in my heart.
No one—and I mean, no one—could understand the depths of longing I was
experiencing for that girl. They would say I was pussy-whipped if they
knew, though we never even had sex. I shouldn’t be this stuck on a girl,
especially one I never slept with.
Maybe I needed to get laid. I was experiencing my longest dry spell. I had
been pining for her and couldn’t look at another woman. Since that kiss, all
I saw was Raven’s face, and all I heard was Raven telling me she loved me.
I fought the urge to fly out to Paris. I fought the urge to devour her the way
my body craved. I fought those urges because I knew it was wrong. She was
legally my ward, and I was essentially her foster dad.
Rage burnt through my veins as if to scream, I don’t care!
My body would never get over the fact it craved her, having decided she
was mine and always would be, no matter what. Every part of me was
riddled with this sick desire for Raven. I was consumed with this violent
frustration over my situation. This wasn’t me, yet I had felt out of control
over the summer.
A few weeks into summer, Reid left for Paris to join Raven. Against my
better judgment, I considered doing the same, but I needed an indication
from Raven that she wanted to see me. Fuck. I needed it. I texted to gauge
her reaction.
Ajax: Hey Rave, Hope you and Reid are having a blast. I was thinking of
visiting.
Rave: Oh, Ok. If you want to.
Ajax: Do you not want me to come?
Rave: Nothing like that. I just think you’ll be bored.
Ajax: Why will I be bored?
Rave: Reid and I spend our days helping Mom set up her new shop in Paris.
And he mentioned that your app has been doing well. I'd hate to tear you
away. It’s not that exciting over here.
Ajax: I guess. Are you sure you don’t want me to visit?
Rave: Positive. Focus on your app :)
We didn’t speak after that text. Raven had made her feelings crystal clear.
At least things were better with Reid and Mia. Before he left, Reid and I got
along better than we had in years. Mia also didn't give me a hard time about
the nanny until departing for the Grand Caymans. She called me daily. I
was no longer overloaded with obligations to Mia and Reid. The panic
attacks had become infrequent. When they did strike, they were over my
fear of losing Raven. Fear over her moving on without me, while I might
never be able to do the same.
I had to rely on anti-anxiety medications over the summer. I hated it. Fuck. I
needed Raven to return, even if only for my mental health.
How much longer could I withstand this?
There was a constant desire to ask Reid how she was doing or what she was
up to. But I forced myself not to and stayed away from her Facebook page,
so I had nothing to feed my obsession.
The obsession grew, nonetheless. It never stopped, and nothing worked. Not
time nor space. Nothing filled the void she left. I was missing an integral
part of me—something I’d gotten used to having—and the withdrawal was
slowly killing me.
I couldn’t live like this and made a pact with myself. By the time my senior
year started, I would no longer have these feelings. I wouldn’t let myself. I
vowed to move on with my life.
AUGUST 2015.
Raven.
Tonight was the big night—Mom's fashion show. It was supposed to
be huge for her clothing line, and we had been working toward it all
summer.
I had been in Paris for almost four months. I worked with Mom most of the
time, though I did leave Paris for a short period.
Dad called and invited me to South Africa during my second week in Paris.
He barely called me, much less invited me to visit, and I wondered if he did
it to compete with Mom.
He flew me to South Africa, taking the week off to show me around. It was
beautiful. I visited the townships where Dad worked. I was heartbroken by
the conditions and stayed longer to volunteer. I gained a new respect for
Dad, despite our broken relationship.
Nonetheless, conversations with him were like pulling teeth. The only
discussion we had in common was about the eldest Sinclair son. We were
both in agreement about our admiration for Ajax.
Reid flew out to join me once I returned to Paris. I was so relieved. My
mother was tolerable, but her narcissism took a toll. After years apart, I now
struggled to find a comfort zone with both my parents. Reid served as the
much-needed buffer. Not to mention, I needed a familiar Sinclair face to
feel at home.
We spent most of our summer partying and working. While helping Mom
with her new store and upcoming fashion show, we met designers, models,
and other people from the industry.
It was the kind of work I dreamt about, living a lifestyle that suited me.
Paris had been magical in all aspects except for one—The eldest Sinclair
boy, Ajax.
Ajax kept in touch until the first couple of months but hadn't contacted me
after I thwarted his offer to visit. I needed space. The night of my
seventeenth birthday party solidified this need. In my high and drunken
stupor, I thought I dreamt of Ajax. When I woke, I saw an envelope from
Ajax and smelled his familiar cologne on my comforter. I realized he was
there in person, not in my dreams. Despite my promise to keep an
appropriate distance, I'd worsened the situation.
The night was hazy, but I remembered telling Dream Ajax that I loved him
and begged him never to leave me. The following day, Ajax left without
saying goodbye. When I opened the envelope he had left, I realized how
much I had freaked him out.
I found a printed itinerary for a summer in Paris. A highly organized printed
agenda.
After hearing my declaration of love, Ajax determined that my teenage
infatuation was out of control. In typical Ajax fashion, he went into a fix-it
mode. He probably called Mom to take me for the summer, then put
together a fun itinerary to keep me busy, completed with open-ended flight
tickets. He bolted before having to face me.
Once more, my feelings were misconstrued by everyone, including Ajax.
He called me the following Monday, but I was too humiliated to pick up. I
had been avoiding him since.
He was angry at how I left and for ignoring him all summer. I didn't ask for
his permission and left before the school year ended. My school, Wellington
Academy, allowed students to work independently. I submitted my
paperwork and was done for the semester. Regardless, it was disrespectful
not to check with my legal guardian before leaving the country.
I couldn't bear to face him. I wanted to cut ties to our special relationship,
the one Reid hated, but somehow I had cut ALL ties. Ajax was one of my
best friends; now, we weren't even friends. I missed him so much.
I didn't blame him for sending me away. I needed the distance to stop being
fixated on him. It hit me how uncomfortable I had made him.
Reid and I were returning next week. Reid already booked his flight. My
humiliation wouldn't let me search for return flight options.
I had distractions while in Paris. I helped Mom with her shop and worked
tirelessly on the upcoming fashion show. Reid and I befriended a plethora
of French models and spent our nights partying. I tried my hand at dating,
too.
I was tired of being a cliche, yearning for love from mommy, daddy, and
guardians. I needed to replace the craving with romantic interests.
Determined to try harder, I started dating Michel.
Michel was perfect: gorgeous, tall, and charming. I didn't feel enough to
give it up to him; however, I felt brazen enough to try some sexual acts.
Ultimately, I realized my attraction was lukewarm. I called it quits a few
days ago. Michel wasn't thrilled but agreed to remain friends.
The action-packed summer had come to an end, and I was filled with dread
about returning home.
I pushed away thoughts of home as I dressed. Reid and I were dolled up (or
suited up, as he called it) for the fashion show, followed by the
debaucheries Reid had planned.
As I put on my earrings, I heard the bathroom door creak. Reid strolled out
of the bathroom. "Ready to head out?"
"Yep, let me grab my purse."
We walked to the apartment lobby and waved at the concierge. This place
had become home over the summer.
I linked arms with Reid. "So, what's on the agenda for later tonight?"
"Alcohol, models, dancing. Need more details?"
I giggled. "Nope, that about covers it. I can't wait to sit by my lonesome self
on the sidelines and watch your Parisian groupies rock-paper-scissor about
who gets to maul you tonight."
"You're welcome to join in, and because you're my friend, you don't even
have to play. I'll throw you the first bone for free."
I laughed. "How very generous of you. I don't deserve such kindness."
"I am a generous guy." Reid suddenly stopped, frowning. "Wait, why will
you be alone? What is Michelle doing tonight?"
"It's Michel, and you know it. I broke up with him. Remember?"
"What? You never told me."
"Yeah, I did."
"Umm. I'd remember my best friend breaking up with her boyfriend."
"Hmmm. I could have sworn I told you. Oh well, I broke up with him."
"And?"
"And what?"
"Are you okay? Should we get a pint of ice cream and watch The Notebook
as you cry me a river?"
He was ridiculous. "Hold on to your ice cream and The Notebook. I'm fine.
I just never felt the attraction. It made no sense to continue, especially since
we were returning soon."
"If you didn't feel the attraction," Reid said with air quotes, "then why did
you go out with him?"
I was silent for a few minutes. I had yet to go into depth with Reid about
my issues. "Remember your talk the night of our seventeenth birthday party
about how I was acting like a love-crazed teenager around Ajax? I was
mortified. I didn't realize how my behavior came off to others."
Reid craned his neck to look at me. "I didn't use the words love-crazed
teenager."
I shrugged. "I have this constant need for attention from parental figures.
I'm always the teacher's pet or the chaperone's favorite on field trips. Dance
coaches choose me to be their assistant. For fuck's sake, Mom abandoned
me. But look at me doing everything to make her happy."
I was suddenly filled with self-loathing. However, the venue was a fifteenminute walk. We had time to kill, and I might as well use it wisely.
I sighed, pinching the bridge of my nose. "I did the same with Ajax. He
took over the parental role, and I instantly had a sick craving to make him
love me. I am a teenager. I should ignore family to chase boys, get drunk,
and go to parties. Instead, I'm stuck in this vortex of pleasing authority
figures. I'm consumed by it."
We exited the lobby, stepping onto the sidewalk. I waved my arms in front
of me, trying to paint a picture in the fresh air.
"I need to redirect my attention to someone more appropriate. If I date, I
can find someone who also showers me with love in return. Then I won't
have to humiliate myself in front of parental figures, begging them to love
me," I made my closing statement without bitterness lacing my voice.
Reid's tilted his face and watched me. "Rave, you don't need to refocus your
energy with such extreme measures," he said tentatively. "I didn't
understand why you craved Ajax's attention. I get it now."
I stared straight ahead, too embarrassed by my confessions.
Reid clasped his hands together. "We both have shitty parents. You had no
one. At least, I always had Ajax. Unlike our parents, Ajax returns our
affections. You don't have to beg him to love you. He does that willingly."
Reid rubbed the back of his head with a hand. It was his tick when he felt
guilty or nervous.
"I was a jealous asshole. I didn't want to lose my best friend's attention to
my brother. I didn't think it would push you into dating men you weren't
interested in. I am a selfish piece of shit."
"Reid, no. That's not it. There was truth to your words."
"Even so, I made it sound worse than it was. I'm sorry. Ajax loves you. I get
why you need his approval and crave a special bond. I won't stand in the
way again."
Reid pulled me into a one-handed hug, kissing my temple. I reflected on his
words. Despite his approval, I remained unconvinced.
It was comforting to hear Ajax loved me and willingly returned my
affection. Reid's words made me wonder if I overreacted by distancing
myself from Ajax. However, he was unaware of what happened the night of
the party. I told Ajax I loved him. My actions made him uncomfortable
enough to send me to Paris for the summer. Which meant my behavior
needed changing. Over the summer, I worked on my interactions with Ajax
and distanced myself. I planned to keep it up upon return. By the time we
reached the fashion show, I was adamant in my resolve.
We checked in at the main entrance to enter the large ballroom. The event
was in full swing. Every chair was occupied, music blared, and the
champagne flowed. Mom was backstage, putting the finishing touches on
the models.
Reid and I had front-row seats. We were three glasses of champagne in
when the lights turned off, and the show began.
Reid put a hand on my knee. "Easy! I can feel you vibrating. It'll be great."
And it was. Model after model strutted flawlessly, and the outfits looked
terrific. My nerves settled. I leaned back, enjoying our hard work coming to
fruition.
Toward the end of the show, an outfit caught my eye. I didn't see it on the
list, and something about it seemed oddly familiar. I realized why it was so
once the model neared us.
My jaw dropped. Before I could decipher, the model had retreated, and
Mom walked onto the stage with all the models in tow. The audience stood,
clapping and cheering for the successful show. This was a huge moment for
her.
Once the clapping subsided, I hunted down my mom. Female admirers
swarmed Reid. He had gained a herd of Parisian groupies through our new
clique. Must be nice to be a good-looking Sinclair. I didn't feel bad leaving
him alone as the models would keep him plenty occupied.
"Surprise!" Mom shrieked, kissing me on the cheek.
"W-What?"
"I hope you liked it. It took everything not to blab, and I lasted all summer.
Proud of me?"
"I don't understand. What's going on?"
"Okay, sweetheart. I'll give you the summary." My mom waved her hands
dramatically. "Ajax sent me your sketches. I had no idea my daughter was
so talented." She beamed. "I loved one of them and made the outfit. We
wanted to surprise you at the fashion show, but we had problems setting a
date for the show—" her voice trailed off.
Mom grabbed a bottle of water from a server as she passed by. She took a
quick swig and continued.
"Anyway, Ajax got you open-ended plane tickets to ensure you'd be here
for the show. I offered to pay for the ticket, but he insisted we split your
birthday gift. He paid for the tickets, the dance classes, and your activities.
My part was easier. Make the dress, and don't blab to my daughter."
I felt lightheaded at Mom's admission.
"I hope I did you proud, sweetie, and you liked my belated present.
Congrats, baby. You're officially a designer. The dress is called It's So
Raven." She held up a hand, "I know, I know. Not original. But I had to put
something down for a name."
"Mom, you guys did all this? When?" I whispered.
"Oh, honey. Ajax worked on this all year. How blessed are we to have the
Sinclairs in our lives?" Mom contemplated her words, and her forehead
formed a frown. "But I don't understand why he changed his mind about
visiting Paris. The plan was for Ajax and Reid to join you in Paris after Mia
left for the Grand Cayman."
Her words knocked the wind out of me. My lips quivered as I attempted to
conjure a response.
I knew why Ajax didn't visit Paris. Because I was an ungrateful bitch who
told him not to come.
He did everything in his power to give me the summer of my dreams. To
propel my career in the city of fashion. I misunderstood his intentions so
terribly. This was the most thoughtful gift I had received. He had ripped
open my soul, saw what I wanted, and etched it into reality.
"I don't know, Mom," was all I managed to choke out. "But thank you. This
was so thoughtful. I love it, and I love you."
"I love you, too, baby."
I couldn't form more words and felt grateful when other attendees snagged
Mom. My heart was punctured. I was angry and sad. So sad. I was mad at
myself for doubting Ajax's intentions. I was sad over how much I missed
Ajax and our broken bond. I'd pay any price to have it back.
I texted Reid to tell him I was leaving. It wasn't his fault, but I was too
irritated. Although irrational, I resented Reid for asking me to tone it down
around Ajax.
I planned to return to the apartment, pack my bags, and book the earliest
possible flight. Then I'd grovel at Ajax's feet for acting like a Class A,
ungrateful, spoiled brat. I'd beg for his forgiveness for leaving, for
disappointing him, and for dismissing him all summer.
How could I have thought Ajax was trying to get rid of me? He'd never
push me away. No one—and I meant no one—in this world would stick by
me as he had. How often did the man have to prove he was the only one
capable of loving me unconditionally?
Ajax.
I finished responding to my last email and turned off my computer. I heard
the front door open as I stood from the living room sofa. Out of the corner
of my eye, I caught something that made my breath hitch. Actually—not
something—someone.
The object of my obsession in flesh and blood. Raven stood at the front
door, her hazel eyes transfixed on me.
I couldn’t move. This couldn’t be real.
My starved eyes took her in. She was different. Her dark hair bounced
around her shoulders. She had a tan, making her skin look smoother. She
wore black leggings with a low-cut top, adding a European sophistication to
her look.
She wore more makeup than I remembered her wearing before. Without
makeup, she was an understated beauty and intoxicating to me. With
makeup, Raven looked like a vixen, which did all the same things for me.
I swallowed.
Almost four months since I saw her. I missed her. I missed her so fucking
much. I promised myself I’d be done with these feelings by the end of
summer. So why hadn’t they stopped? If I was over her, why the hell
couldn’t I breathe just from looking at her?
Raven rolled her large suitcase inside. Setting down her backpack, she shut
the door. I stood, ready to gravitate to her like a moth to a flame. Stepping
out of the sitting area, I stopped short with a mere foot between us. We
stood there for God knew how long, staring at one another.
I told myself I could handle being in the same room with her. I fucking lied
to myself.
The time apart didn’t decrease my obsession, I confirmed in my mind.
Nope. If anything, it was the opposite. Time had only fed my obsession
with her.
Raven appeared tense. My jaw tightened as I remembered the last time we
spoke. I was relieved but also angry. And in full-on lust mode.
“Hello, Ajax,” she finally greeted, tucking a strand of hair nervously behind
her ears.
Those two words squeezed down to my soul, tormenting me. Her soft voice
stifled the resolve to remain strong.
“Rave, you’re back.” I tried to smile. “How are you?”
“Good. And you?”
“I’m great. Where is Reid?”
“I-I made a last-minute decision to come home. I took the first available
flight. Reid had already booked his and couldn’t change it.”
“Why did you suddenly decide to come home?”
“I was homesick.” Raven paused, then added, “And I missed you. I wanted
to see you.”
My heart squeezed in my chest once more. My libido flared at the sight of
her, the sound of her voice, and her confession. “I’m glad you’re back. You
look great.”
“Thank you. You look pretty good yourself.”
Raven gave my body a once over. I knew what she saw in my physique. I
had been hitting the gym hard, using it to take out my frustrations. I was in
the best shape of my life. Every part of me was pure muscle. I had received
more female attention in the last couple of months than before.
Did she notice it, too? Did she like it?
“I’ve been working out a lot,” I said, hearing how hoarse my voice
sounded.
She remained silent, but I needed to hear her voice again.
“Did you like your birthday gift?”
“Yes.” Her cheeks turned pink. She fidgeted with her hands. “It was the
most beautiful gift anyone had given me. It defined the word perfection.”
Raven stared at me with glossy eyes. She looked at me in a familiar way. It
was how she used to look at me before everything went to shit. I had seen
attraction in the eyes of many women before, but this went beyond it. The
way Raven looked at me surpassed anything I had experienced—like I was
her whole damn world.
I needed this. I pined for her look. It was the high I had been chasing, and I
was defenseless against it.
“Don’t I get a hug for giving you the perfect present?” What was I saying? I
spent my summer trying to forget her. Now I was seeking out physical
contact. I must be a masochist.
“Huh?” She sounded just as surprised by my request. I didn’t care. I needed
physical contact.
“You said I gave you the perfect gift. Not to mention we haven’t seen one
another all summer. I assumed I’d at least get a hug?”
I slowly walked to her, hands moving around her back. Raven stared, trying
to read my expression. My hands draped her lower back while her arms
wrapped around my neck. I palmed the back of her head with one hand
while the other remained around her waist, pulling her close.
I turned my head to smell her for the first time in months. Vanilla. An
intoxicating smell. I wanted to smell more of it. I wanted to smell her hair,
neck, pulse, and every part of her skin. I wanted to inhale her vanilla scent
so deeply that it would imprint on me. I had been craving this for months—
the smell of my infatuation.
It took a simple hug to break the dam I had built to keep out my desire for
her. I confirmed what I had known all summer—what I refused to admit
even to myself—I couldn’t let her go. Not now. Not ever.
My heart hammered in fear she’d pull away, but Raven remained
complacent. Jesus. She felt right in my arms. I wanted her. I wanted her so
damn much—more than I had ever wanted anyone.
“I missed you, Raven.”
“I’ve missed you, too.”
I didn’t expect her to respond readily. The certainty of attraction flowed
between us, but there was the elephant in the room—my resentment and
anger. The hell I went through this summer.
Before I could stop myself, I broke the spell by growling, “Then why did
you leave like that?” I surprised both myself and Raven with the sheer
volume of my voice.
NO, I almost shouted when Raven tried to jump out of my hold, surprised.
My hands quickly tightened around her back, refusing to let go.
“I didn’t mean to. I’m s-sorry,” Raven stammered.
“Sorry! That’s all you have to say. I’ve been worried sick. Do you know
how I’ve felt this entire summer?”
She told me she loved me. We kissed, then she left without warning and
ignored me for months.
Raven was strong. No matter her feelings, she had enough self-restraint to
do the right thing and tried to make the best decision for both of us.
However, it didn’t decrease my anger.
I looked down at her—bitter and lustful. Without warning, I grabbed her
arms and pinned her to the wall. My body covered every inch of hers while
I held her arms to her side.
“Why, Raven?” My voice reflected the turmoil inside me and the feeling of
being torn apart.
Raven appeared shocked. “Ajax, I…”
“Fuck!” All my anger from the summer came out, and I crushed my lips to
hers. One of my hands fisted her hair, the other pinning down her wrists.
I slowly moved my mouth back from her soft lips. Raven seemed she didn’t
have a single coherent thought. She was speechless.
Good. Because I was still seething, and that wasn’t nearly enough.
I slammed my lips back to hers and groaned before tilting my head. I finally
did something I never had the chance to do. I pushed my tongue inside her
mouth, giving her no choice but to open it for me.
Raven was frozen. She hadn’t stopped me, but I could feel her holding
back. I kept stroking her tongue aggressively, demanding she respond.
Raven tentatively reciprocated, and I moaned as our tongues collided.
The kiss turned rough. I licked her bottom lip, then licked down her throat,
groaning against her skin, “You taste so good.” I was breathing loudly, like
a starved man taking in his last meal.
I panted against her neck, praying to divine intervention for control. I
nibbled on her neck. A sensitive spot on her neck made Raven moan. She
reflexively fisted my shirt and arched her back as I sucked hard enough to
leave a mark.
I needed this, but it wasn’t enough. It'd never be enough. I needed more, so
much more. I grabbed her ass and lifted it, cueing her to wrap her legs
around me. My mouth was devouring hers as I rubbed against her.
Suddenly, Raven froze. She stopped responding to my kisses. Tearing
myself from her mouth, I leaned back to speculate. Her eyes were down,
staring at where our groins were connected on top of our clothes. She could
feel my hardness, which must have zapped her to reality.
The spell broke.
I slowly settled Raven on her feet. She didn’t meet my eyes while I stared
for a long moment, quietly studying her face. I fucked up. I shouldn’t have
kissed her. I just missed her so damn much I forgot my boundaries and
reservations.
“I think I’m going to lie down. I’m exhausted from the flight.” Raven
grabbed her backpack and walked up the stairs, leaving her bigger suitcase
behind.
I nodded, unable to form a sensible sentence. Classic Raven. She got
overwhelmed with foreign emotions and needed a minute to gather herself.
Over the years, Reid, Mia, and I had learned to give her space until she
could sort shit out. She liked to compartmentalize and analyze situations at
her speed. She didn't like confrontations, preferring flight over fight.
We could talk after she has had a chance to process it. At least she was
running upstairs and not to another country.
Walking to the living room, I sat on the sofa and watched television.
Turning my computer on, I worked on my app as well—anything to distract
me.
After an hour, I was out of ideas and patience. I grabbed her suitcase and
carried it up the stairs and to her room.
“Rave,” I called, pushing the door open to step inside.
Silence. She was sprawled in the middle of the bed with a comforter thrown
over.
How could she sleep after what happened?
I moved toward her and sat on the bed beside her unconscious body. I
brushed my thumb over the apple of her cheek, entranced at the sight of her.
“Ajax?” Raven’s eyes barely opened.
“Hey.”
“W-what’s going on?” Raven asked in a disoriented voice.
“I wanted to bring in your suitcase. Are you hungry? Want to come
downstairs for dinner?” It was a silly request. What I wanted was to curl up
in the bed with her.
Raven blinked. She looked ready to go back to sleep, her eyelids heavy.
“If you are still tired, you can keep sleeping.”
Against my better judgment, I trailed my fingers along the edge of her face
down to her jaw. Raven drew in a shuddering breath. My hand moved to her
arms, feeling her goosebumps.
I wanted to feel her in my arms. Fuck it. I was going to do it. Pulling a
pillow, I leaned closer to lift her. Nudging a sleepy Raven onto my chest, I
laid us against the pillow.
1 Mississippi. 2 Mississippi. No protests from Raven. Her eyes were closed
once more, drifting back to sleep.
As she slept, my eyes moved over her face. Her red lips were slightly
parted, the bottom one wet and jutting out. Her long lashes fanned her rosy
cheeks. It seemed she took off her makeup in a rush before hitting the hay.
Some of her mascara was smudged on her eyelids. Her hair was in disarray,
sticking out from all ends.
She was strikingly beautiful.
I’d had sex with more women than I cared to count. Beautiful women. Tall,
skinny, perfect complexions. Keeping with New York City traditions, they
presented themselves in well-put-together designer clothes. None of them
held a candle to Raven when she dressed up.
However, when Raven stripped off her fancy clothes, she was a different
type of beauty, unmeasurable to anyone in this world. With her tousled,
messy hair, no makeup, and current vulnerability, Raven was a rare beauty
found at the end of the world after a lifetime of searching. Her unique
features made her one billion times more beautiful than any woman I had
seen or been with. Her demeanor and composure only added to the allure.
Raven didn’t throw tantrums like most women I knew. She had a way of
carrying herself in a classy, dignified manner.
She was my unicorn—one that lived in fantasies—a fantasy I could no
longer go on without.
I was sure of our feelings for one another, but I was concerned about a
change in relationship status between us. I was positive she was just as
worried about the obstacles standing in our way. For years, those obstacles
held me back. Right now, I couldn’t remember why I cared in the first
place. No man on this planet had wanted a girl as much as I wanted her. I
was positive about this fact. Denying myself for the last few years had
taken more effort than anything I had done.
It sucked. I had no idea what she was thinking, but I could no longer hold
back. I wanted her. I needed to know she wanted me, too. Even if she didn’t
talk to me, I needed assurance. Against my better judgment, I leaned over
and gently brushed my lips against hers.
Raven.
My eyes flew open when I felt a firm pair of lips on mine. I stiffened.
Today had been a long day. I caught the first available flight from Paris,
providing a measly excuse to Mom and Reid. Grabbing a taxi from the
airport, I rushed home, ready to make amends with Ajax.
It didn’t go as planned.
First, Ajax hugged me in more than a brotherly way. Out of nowhere, he
pinned me to the wall and stared at me like I was his missing meal. He
kissed the hell out of me. And then, I sensed Ajax’s arousal.
I had no idea what happened after. I sprinted to my room. Hastily, I took off
my makeup, changed, and threw myself on the bed.
Maybe it was a dream or in my head. I felt guilty for ignoring Ajax all
summer while he had given me the most thoughtful gift. Maybe my brain
conjured a sexual fantasy to create the intimacy I missed with him over the
summer.
Not ready to face what had happened, I shut off my brain and went to sleep.
The flight back had a long layover, taking over fifteen hours. I was
exhausted. My tired mind was playing tricks on me, shading the lines
between reality and fantasy.
However, this was real. I was sure of it.
Ajax came into my room, asking about dinner. I could barely open my eyes.
Then I felt a shift, with my head hitting Ajax’s chest. And now he was
kissing me.
I had no idea how to take any of this. My world had stopped, my heart
beating up to my ears.
Ajax rolled me over. He was on his side with an arm banded around me,
slowly returning to my mouth. I watched him with wide eyes,
dumbfounded.
My brain screamed, STOP! But I didn’t say it. I couldn’t. This was Ajax.
How could I reject Ajax, of all people?
Ajax lowered his lips to mine. His hand was on my cheek, his upper body
pressed tightly against mine. My head spun when Ajax slipped his tongue
inside my mouth. He devoured it, pulling me closer. He dropped his head to
kiss my neck, biting a spot that made me moan. Upon hearing my
vocalization, his eyes flared with a hunger I had never seen in a man.
He gently tugged at my shirt without taking it off, silently asking for
permission with a questioning look as he held the hem of the shirt.
This was getting out of hand. I needed to say something, but I had lost my
voice. I watched Ajax peel my tank top over my chest, enough to expose
my breasts. We stared at one another as it registered what we were doing.
Ajax bent his head and took a nipple in his mouth, running his tongue over
it. He maintained eye contact while giving the same treatment to my other
breast. He returned to my mouth, his hands roaming me like he couldn’t
stop touching if he tried. His hands moved to my chest, waist, and finally, to
the sleeping shorts I’d changed into earlier.
His fingers caressed the top of my shorts. I could feel myself getting wet as
his lips moved to my pulse. There was a growing ache low in my stomach.
Even if we should, I couldn’t bring myself to stop. He was incredible at
what he was doing.
Ajax impatiently pulled my shorts down. He hadn't moved to touch my bare
skin while I was impatient for contact. I couldn't wait for a second longer.
“Have you been with anyone before?” His husky voice startled me. Neither
of us had spoken for so long; I forgot we could use our vocal cords to
communicate.
I stared at him with a stupefied expression, then shook my head for a no.
How could he ask the question so callously, as if asking for the time?
"Do you want me to stop?"
Hell no. Not anymore. I wanted relief, and I wanted it now.
I shook my head for a no again. I didn't care about his reasons anymore. I
merely didn't want to break this spell.
"If you haven't been with anyone, we should wait," Ajax murmured in my
ear but followed up with an alternate solution. "We can do other things, but
we can't go further than touching tonight."
With the fair warning, Ajax’s hand was on my sex. He rubbed my clit. I was
so wet I could almost hear it. Moaning and thrashing, I only returned to
focus when his hardness brushed against my leg. I glanced at Ajax’s
erection straining through his pants.
Ajax followed my gaze. I lifted my eyes. He was on his side with a hand
propping up his head, the other caressing me.
Locking eyes with Ajax was too intense, but I didn’t know where else to
look. Staring at his hand pleasuring me was awkward. Closing my eyes
seemed impersonal. So instead, I perversely glanced back to his tented
pants and the hardness lengthening against me.
Ajax drew his fingers from my folds. Grabbing the hem of his shirt, he
pulled it over his head. Ajax continued to undress, undoing his belt buckle
and unbuttoning his jeans. He lifted his hips to pull down his jeans, taking
his boxers. His dick whipped out, and all I could do was stare.
Ajax was naked. I couldn’t stop staring. He was ripped. No fat. Solid
muscle. Broad shoulders and chest.
Ajax always had a nice body, but over the summer... damn! He had defined
abs, and the veins on his arms stood out. He looked like what Channing
Tatum and Ryan Gosling would look if they had a baby.
Women threw themselves at Ajax. Beautiful women. Models. I had heard
women pine over him. Women who were perfect tens. So, what was he
doing with me?
Is he throwing me a bone out of pity because I told him I loved him?
Does he think fulfilling my fantasy is the only way I'll move on from my
infatuation?
Or does the oldest, most desirable Sinclair want me?
I bulldozed through the questions and possibilities, realizing the last
speculation was laughable. Though it was a flattering notion, someone like
Ajax would never be interested in me. He was a god among mortals, and I
was some high school girl.
So, what was it he wanted from me?
Ajax didn’t do relationships. With his responsibilities—schoolwork, the
new app, and household obligations—there was never enough time for a
girlfriend. As a result, the extent of his romantic relationships were friends
with benefits. Many of them wanted more, but it wasn’t in the cards for
Ajax.
Being a good guy, Ajax clarified as much to women before they chose to
pursue him. He’d never steer anyone wrong or misguide them. Which
meant he wouldn’t do it to me, either.
Once more, Ajax was on his side with his head propped up by his elbow. He
studied me quietly, eyes moving over my face. He trailed his fingers to my
shorts, making me jump from the sudden movement.
“It’s okay, baby. I just want to touch you,” he whispered.
Baby?
What were we doing? I almost formed a word but couldn’t spit it out. Ajax
made me feel like a petulant child, one who should always do as he said.
His fingers slipped between my folds, and I whimpered, eyes rolling to the
back of my head. I was a blank canvas with no more thoughts—a Tabula
Rasa. Nothing existed except for those fingers.
“Baby, touch me while I touch you.”
I should say no, but my usual backbone had exited the building. Ajax was
acting with so much confidence it left no room for arguments. He seemed
so sure I would have followed him to hell had he asked.
And it felt like I just did.
My hands moved between us and down his body. We were both lying on
our sides, facing one another. I ran my index finger down his length, feeling
his size. I felt Ajax holding his breath as my hand traced him. There was a
low groan, but otherwise, he held still while I explored.
Eventually, my trembling fingers closed around his dick.
I had given Michel a few hand jobs over the summer, but my limited
experience had left me. Luckily, Ajax guided me, whispering instructions.
“Hold me tighter. Stroke me up and down.” He gave out another restrained
growl. “Yes, just like that.”
He fixed his gaze on me, and I felt his effort to maintain control.
“Cup my balls with your other hand,” he hissed. Ajax panted, covering my
face and neck with kisses. “God, that feels so fucking good.” His breathing
turned ragged, and his pupils dilated.
All the while, he was focused enough to continue his assault on me. I could
barely follow the instructions, distracted by his fingers. I tried to cup his
balls, squeezing and pumping with both hands. Simultaneously, Ajax
increased the tempo on my clit. Before long, I was chasing an orgasm.
Suddenly, Ajax groaned, “Fuck, baby.”
His warm cum landed on my hands and legs. I didn’t have the chance to
react before he did something that had my back arching. I tried to scream,
but my voice was stuck in my throat.
I couldn’t pay attention and fell back on my pillow. I had dissipated from
reality, unaware of my body and movements.
From a distance, I heard the bathroom door creak. A few moments later, I
felt something wet on my legs. I peeked to find Ajax wiping off the semen
with a washcloth. I vaguely watched as he put on boxers after throwing the
washcloth into my dirty hamper. Ajax adjusted my top and shorts before
stretching out on the bed with his head in the hollow of my neck. A little of
his weight was me, but most of it was on the side, so it wasn’t entirely
uncomfortable. His warm body weight, combined with the post-orgasm
high, was far too relaxing. My eyes closed as we drifted off.
I woke the next day, disoriented.
What the hell.
I was on my side with Ajax’s arms wrapped around me.
We… oh, God.
My world came crashing down.
I didn’t have time to think. Ajax was fast asleep, and I didn’t want to be
here when he woke up. I untangled myself and moved off the bed.
Tiptoeing, I changed my clothes and found my shoes, purse, and phone. I
turned the knob quietly and slipped out, not bothering to close the door. I
dashed downstairs, grasping at the nearest wall to steady myself. I was a
mix of confusion and shame, trying to piece it together.
What the hell happened last night? What overcame Ajax, and what
possessed me?
There were opportunities to stop. He would have respected my choice had I
told him to stop. I wasn’t weak. I had said no to plenty of boys before. So,
why didn’t I say no? I just gaped at him like an idiot. By the time my senses
returned, he’d built up my orgasm. At that point, I would have begged him
to keep going, not the other way around.
What would people say if they found out I did that with the guy who signed
my report cards and chaperoned my school dances? We’d turn into a Woody
Allen joke.
I couldn’t tell Reid; he’d be pissed. Thou shalt not covet your BFF's brother.
Reid gave me his blessing to be close to Ajax again, but I doubted he meant
that close.
Not to mention the most taboo reason of all. The law recognized that man
as my legal parent. This was sick.
Maybe we were both overwhelmed by our emotions when we saw each
other. I was sad about our distance and how I had treated him. He was angry
about the way I left. Emotions were running high and exploded in epic
proportions. It was a mistake—a misunderstanding. Even Ajax was allowed
one mistake.
Yes, he made a mistake. As did I. But we could fix it. We must.
Ajax would know how to proceed. I could always count on him to pick up
the pieces. For now, I had to compartmentalize away what had happened. If
I didn’t, my brain might fry from over-analysis.
I needed to get out of this house and find my bearings. I texted Janeen, one
of my good friends from school, asking to catch up. It was about eight a.m.
She was the only teenager who’d be up at this hour during summer vacation
as she had swim meets in the mornings.
Janeen texted me back right away, agreeing to grab breakfast. I sighed a
relief and sprinted out of the house, needing immense distance from my
place of residence.
Ajax.
I woke to an empty bed, the high from last night dissipating. I knocked on
her bathroom door, hoping to speak to Raven.
No response.
Heading downstairs, I searched for her and called her name. Again, no
response.
You’ve got to be kidding me. Raven had flown the nest again. She freaked
out; I could feel it. The last time we kissed, she admitted to loving me then
fled the country.
What if she ran again?
Anxiety paralyzed me at the thought. I couldn’t go through a repeat of this
summer. I never wanted to experience that again. I had to find her and calm
her down.
My mind was reeling over how to move forward. I knew what we meant to
one another. No other woman had looked at me the way she did. She was
the only person for me. She could see through me to my very soul.
For so long, we put a pin on our feelings. I was her parental figure, the one
who was supposed to hold back. Yet, I initiated it last night. I should have
exercised more self-control.
It was a constant battle—my obsession versus what was right. After last
night, my obsession was winning. She was responsive as well, which didn’t
help.
Grabbing my phone, I fired up a text.
Ajax: Where are you?
Rave: Grabbing breakfast with Janeen.
What was wrong with this girl, running away whenever she didn’t want to
deal with emotion?
I waited for her return as the hours went by. Hours of absolute torture.
Hours of giving her space. Hours of waiting until I couldn’t take it any
longer. Was this how she felt when she pined after me for years, and I had
to ignore her feelings?
I wanted her but couldn’t act on it. I still shouldn’t, but the barrier had
broken. I couldn’t go back. I should feel like a piece of shit, but my desire
was pushing my honor code right out the door. The thoughts kept me wound
tight as I busied myself for the remainder of the day. By eight pm, I was
beyond frustrated.
Fuck that. I was pissed. After a summer of running and avoiding me, Raven
was doing the same shit again. I didn’t expect this from Raven. I never
considered our age difference a barrier. I considered the rest of our issues,
but never this.
Raven played the role of a diplomat in our household, placating tense
situations. Even my friends sought out her for advice. I thought she was
mature for her age, but recently, her inexperience in life was showing. This
wasn’t the way to handle things.
I glanced at my phone for the hundredth time, hoping for a call. A text.
Anything.
I threw my phone across the room and only got angrier when it landed on
the carpet. I needed to hear the noise of shattering. In fact, I wanted
everything to shatter. I wanted to destroy everything. My house. My
possessions. My siblings' possessions. I wanted to be surrounded by chaos
and darkness, the way I felt on the inside.
I breathed heavily and touched my chest, where a budding constriction
built. My anxiety grew. An impending panic attack was around the corner,
and the only person who could calm me was nowhere in sight. Biting down
my ego, I picked up the phone and sent her another text.
Ajax: You need to come home.
Rave: Is everything ok?
I shook from pent-up anger.
Ajax: Come home. NOW!
Rave: Why?
Ajax: Because I said so.
Rave: You are scaring me. What’s going on?
Was she kidding? It had been months of the same crap, and she was asking
me what was going on. She was fucking with my head, and I was over it.
Ajax: Please don’t argue. Just come home.
Rave: Ok
Raven.
I stared at my phone. Ajax had never spoken to me like a strict parent
before. Reid and I enjoyed our freedom so long as we followed his rules.
Ajax sometimes scolded Reid regarding his questionable decisions but
praised me for my responsible outlook. He trusted me to make the right
decisions and treated me like an equal.
So, what the hell was that?
Janeen and I did nothing out of the ordinary on our vacation day. We had
breakfast, went to a movie, window-shopped, and ended the day by
grabbing dinner at a cafe near my house. We were ready to wrap up when
Ajax hit me with his tornado of demands.
I reminded myself that Ajax had every right. He set the rules in my life, and
I didn’t want to fight with him. After what happened this summer, I
shouldn't have left this morning. It was unfair. He was confused, too, and
we needed to figure it out.
Plus, Mia was due home soon. She hated it when there was negativity or
tension in the household. She could sense when something was off, even if
no words had been spoken. If we didn't sort out our shit, it’d fuck with her
head. She was already angry at me for leaving abruptly. It took weeks of
texting and calling to get back in her good graces. I didn't want to rock the
boat.
Not to mention, Ajax was overwhelmed by the piled-up load of
responsibilities. His anxiety took over at times, resulting in panic attacks.
Perhaps it was the reason for the urgent texts. Maybe Ajax had another
attack.
Fuck. I needed to go home.
I grabbed my bag and forked over some cash, apologizing to Janeen about
running off abruptly. Hugging her goodbye, I promised to call the next day.
Walking home in record time, I threw my purse on the floor and dashed to
Ajax’s room, pushing the door open. He was sitting on the bed. Both his
hands were intertwined at the back of his head, looking down.
“Ajax, are you okay?”
Ajax’s head snapped up. His breathing was heavy, eyes bloodshot. I had
seen that look before. He was spiraling.
“Shit. Are you having a panic attack?” I reached for him. “Do you want me
to count down?”
I had helped him through many of these episodes and knew the routine.
Sometimes he’d calm down by counting backward from ten. Sometimes it
was a breathing technique. At desperate times, drugs did the trick.
Ajax’s panic attacks were generally triggered by stress. Particularly stress
over Mia and Reid. Something told me I was the trigger this time.
Fuck. He had been worried about me. Perhaps he felt guilty about last night.
He shouldn't; I was just as responsible. He didn’t force me into anything. I
had plenty of opportunities to stop him. I should’ve talked to him. Instead, I
ran and caused him to have a panic attack. I was a piece of shit.
“Ajax, can you talk to me?”
He said nothing.
“Ajax? What—?” I gasped as he stood and erupted out of nowhere.
“What’s the matter with you? You think you can keep leaving, and I’ll keep
letting it go?” His voice shook with rage, breathing ragged. Before I could
respond, Ajax grabbed my arms. “Why are you doing this to me, Rave?”
“I’m sorry,” was all I could muster.
“No, Rave. That doesn’t cut it anymore,” Ajax yelled. “I thought you, of all
people, wouldn’t cause me stress. Instead of talking to me, you run. I have
no fucking idea what's going through your head. Do you know how hard
that’s been for me?”
My chest tightened, feeling overwhelmed with guilt. Guilt over leaving him
this summer. Guilt over leaving today. He was a human with the weight of
the world on his shoulders, and I made him worry about me. I’d vowed
never to do that.
“I-I didn’t mean to... I'm sorry.”
“Stop saying that. I never expected you to behave this way. I expected you
to act more mature. I am so disappointed in you. In all of this. I thought we
—” Ajax shook his head. “You know what? Just leave. That’s what you do
best.”
My knees almost gave out from the words.
I am so disappointed in you.
His words rang in my ears as tears sprung to my eyes. It was my worst fear
and insecurity where Ajax was concerned. The day I moved into this house,
I promised to never be the cause of his stress. I wanted to be his support
system like he was mine. After everything he had done for me, I had
become Ajax’s source of anguish and anxiety.
“Please stop,” I whispered. “Me leaving had nothing to do with you and
everything to do with me.” I put a hand on his cheek, knowing it soothed
him.
Ajax closed his eyes. He covered my hand with one of his own. Still in full
panic mode, he breathed heavily to catch oxygen.
“Do you want me to grab one of your pills?”
“No.”
I stroked his cheeks with both hands. He pulled my hands from his cheeks,
holding them tight. “Okay. What do you need then?”
“I only need you right now.”
I looked at him for a long moment, wondering if I was reading too much
into it or if he meant… he couldn’t mean… could he?
I tested the water. “Okay. Talk to me. What do you need me to do?”
“Be here with me,” Ajax whispered and showed me what he wanted.
Turning my palm, he kissed my pulse and trailed his lips to my arms. He
couldn’t be more explicit, but I didn’t understand why he needed me this
way all of a sudden. Why had the dynamics of our relationship changed so
abruptly?
I was caught off guard by Ajax's actions, but I couldn’t deny him. Not when
he was crumbling. Not when I was the source of his current anguish.
I recalled the day Ajax moved me to this house. My father was so absentminded that he forgot to pay the utility bill and left me in a house with no
electricity. My phone was dead, and there were no adults in the house. What
if an intruder had broken in? I could have been raped, abducted, or killed.
If it weren’t for Ajax, all those things could have happened. My negligent
parents would’ve been none the wiser. They still hadn't checked in to ensure
I safely made it to New York. At least I was almost an adult now. Back then,
I was a scared kid. A proud little kid.
Ajax broke through to me and taught me it was okay to ask for help, taking
on the burden of being responsible for another person at a young age. The
paperwork alone must have been excruciating. He didn’t have to take me in
or become my guardian at eighteen.
So, perhaps I could do this for him.
Like I did with everything in life, I needed to compartmentalize and focus
on one objective. My objective was to “fix” Ajax because he sure as hell
looked broken. I needed to create and catalog a few justifications in my
mind, or I might back down. I internally identified a list of reasons to go
through with this.
Reason one: Experience. I could gain experience with someone I trust since
the extent of my sexual history was limited to a few blowjobs and hand jobs
with Michel.
Reason two: Sexual satisfaction. Piggybacking off my last point, I was
never into exploring with Michel, but I might be into it with Ajax. If I
believed the gossip, he was good at physical acts. My personal sexual
experiences with him thus far were reflective of the same.
Reason three: Sexual empowerment. I wasn’t into slut-shaming. I didn’t
judge others or have a code of principles for sex. Granted, my current
motivation was based on guilt and feeling indebted to Ajax. But for the first
time in our relationship, he needed my help. It was oddly empowering.
Reason four: Curiosity. I hadn’t explored the sexual realm because sex
never appealed to me. Maybe I needed a push in that direction.
My decision was made by the time Ajax’s lips were on my neck.
Before I lost my nerve, I unbuckled Ajax’s belt, unbuttoned his jeans, and
pulled down his zipper. In a swift move, I reached inside to pull out his
dick. Dropping to my knees, I swirled my tongue around the tip and closed
my mouth over his cock.
“Fuck, Rave!” Ajax sounded bewildered. “Oh, God, baby. Oh shit,” Ajax
groaned loud enough to be heard in Jersey.
It happened so fast that my actions didn’t register with Ajax until my mouth
was on his dick. One of his hands landed in my hair, tugging restlessly to let
me know what he liked.
“Baby, stop,” he suddenly groaned. His breathing was still harsh, but for a
different reason. I had distracted him from the panic attack. “I'm going to
come in your mouth if you don’t stop.”
I lifted my head as Ajax pulled me to stand. His expression changed from
lust to a weird look I couldn’t identify. He frowned, before narrowing his
eyes.
“Where did you learn that?” He sounded surprised.
I was unsure if I should tell him about Michel. Wasn’t there a cardinal rule
about not discussing other men during intimate moments? I remained quiet.
“Raven, I asked you a question.”
“Umm—”
“You said you haven’t been with anyone before.”
“Yes, I haven’t had sex before.”
“But you have done that. With someone else.”
It was a statement, not a question. So, I didn’t answer.
Ajax’s eyes flared. “With whom?”
“A guy I dated.”
“You brought a guy here and sucked him off a few doors from where I
sleep?” Ajax’s voice shook. I had never heard him so angry.
I was instantly taken aback. Ajax grabbed my arm, refusing to let go until I
answered.
Ajax was only twenty. It wasn’t that long ago when he was seventeen. He
must know teenagers in this city were sexually active. He had caught Reid
with girls in his room. At least I was a virgin. I didn’t know any virgins my
age. Ajax was no saint, either, with his extensive list. His sexual history
started earlier than seventeen.
However, I had never seen Ajax bring a girl to his room. He disapproved of
Reid’s behavior, and it wasn’t the precedent he wanted to set. He insisted on
limiting debauchery to the separate apartment downstairs.
“No. I have never brought anyone here.” I clarified. I wouldn't be so
disrespectful as to bring a hookup around our sleeping quarters and risk
exposing Mia to the behavior.
“Where then?”
What the hell. Was he serious? I wouldn’t dare ask Ajax about his history,
nor would he answer. “It was… umm… at his place. This was in Paris.”
Ajax leaned back as if I had struck him. “What the fuck did you say?” he
growled, his fingers digging painfully into my bicep. “This whole summer,
you were too busy to answer my calls because you were on your knees
blowing assholes?”
This time I did manage to rip out of his hold. Ajax had never spoken to me
this way. I didn’t know what to think and gaped at him. This wasn’t him.
Ajax spoke rationally, and when angry, he generally had a point.
Did he have a point?
I assessed it from his perspective to play devil’s advocate.
From Ajax’s perspective, he gave me a thoughtful and meaningful gift: a
trip to Paris to further my future in fashion design. In turn, I didn't bother
checking with him before leaving. I ignored him for months, saying I was
busy working at Mom's store. Instead, he found out I was dating, having
fun, and getting semi-physical.
It was clear to him I wasn’t too busy. I was having fun while he was
worried about me. If the tables were turned, I’d be upset, too. I wouldn’t
have verbalized it the way he did. However, I decided against focusing on
that.
I tried for plain honesty instead. “Look, I didn’t know the Paris trip was a
pre-planned gift. After the night of my party, I-I was embarrassed about
what I said,” I admitted quietly.
This was also the perfect moment to clear up the I love you debacle. Ajax
had an ego. All men of his caliber did. It couldn't sound like rejection, so I
worded it carefully.
“I know you didn't read into it, but then I saw the Paris itinerary the next
morning. I thought you were trying to get rid of me because you were
irritated by what I said.”
Ajax seemed surprised, but a realization flickered on his face as if putting
together the answers to a puzzle.
Relieved to see his anger subsiding, I continued, “I really was busy working
all summer. Through work, I met this boy, Michel. We dated casually and
later decided to be just friends. I wanted to try dating. It seemed like what I
said to you was misunders—"
I didn’t get to finish. Ajax charged at me with a new rage and
determination. He had the same lust-crazed expression as after my return
from Paris. His mouth came crashing down. Hard. One of his hands held
my nape. His pants were already undone. He stepped out of them while
unclasping and tugging my pants down.
I couldn’t focus. My head spun with his tongue exploring my mouth lewdly.
I didn’t realize he had picked me up and dropped me on his bed.
With his forehead to mine, Ajax whispered, “It doesn't matter. I forgive you.
Let's forget about it.”
Impatiently, he pulled his shirt over his head and slipped my shoes off,
skimming his hand over my thong. He took off my thong and tossed it
aside, moving toward my lower body.
“Right now, I just want to taste you,” he breathed against my inner thighs.
I softly moaned as his tongue flicked out. A little too eagerly, he took hold
of my thighs and guided my legs over his shoulders.
He groaned, “God, you taste so good. Even better than I imagined.”
He ran his tongue along my inner lips, kissing and licking before taking a
gentle bite. I was nothing but a machine making gasping and moaning
noises.
Ajax stopped abruptly.
No, I mentally screamed.
He grinned at my disappointed face, grabbing my arms to pull me up.
Sitting at the edge of the bed, he repositioned me to sit on his lap. Ajax
worked on taking off my shirt and bra, then scooted to lie down while I
straddled his stomach. When he yanked on my hips, I had no choice but to
move forward. He tugged at me harder until I stumbled onto his chest.
Grabbing my hips, Ajax lifted me until my pussy was mere inches from his
mouth, ready to ride his face.
He placed a gentle kiss. His skilled tongue started at the bottom and swiped
up. I gasped with my fingers tightly gripping his hair as his tongue flicked
my nub. This position was too much, and I was gone within seconds. My
thighs shook around his head. He was giving me no option but to explode.
“Shit. Shit. Oh, God, Ajax,” I panted, fully riding his face now.
He licked me everywhere, nipping, tasting, devouring me. He was so deep
inside that I felt his tongue against my walls. He gripped my hips to pull me
down, his teeth grazing my entrance.
“Oh, fuck.” I choked on my scream as my movements halted. My thighs
quaked, and my body convulsed as I came on his mouth.
Ajax lowered me, turning me to my back. I trembled, unable to breathe. He
kissed my breasts, stomach, and chest, making his way up until his naked
body covered mine. He dove and took one of my nipples in his mouth,
sucking and nibbling. His hand slid up my ass and pulled my slick pussy
closer, caressing the sensitive clit with the head of his cock. The friction
was incredible, with his dick stroking the right spot. My pussy pulsed, and
my core ached. I was soaked, and I bet the bedsheets were, too. My nails
scratched his back. He was going to make me come again.
My body tightened as I mashed my teeth. My head knocked back, and
suddenly I cried as ecstasy coursed through me once more.
Lying sloppily on the mattress, I went limp, gulping for oxygen. I was
spent, but Ajax wasn’t done. With his mouth on mine, he grabbed his cock
and settled it against my opening.
“Baby, I want to fuck you so bad.”
I tensed.
Ajax also realized what he was about to do. He latched onto the inside of
my thighs, reining himself in. He lifted slightly off me.
“We can wait if you’re not ready,” he hurriedly added, eyes searching mine.
I said nothing as Ajax stared with a desperate, unspoken plea.
I didn’t make the mental preparations to have sex today. I thought we would
do more of what we had been doing thus far, but I should have clarified. I’d
already allowed the guy to rub his dick there. It would be blue-balled level
painful if I asked him to stop now.
Ajax looked ready to lose it from impatience but didn’t rush my response.
He was waiting for permission. I wrapped my arms around his waist to
bring him back. The immense relief on his face was instant.
Ajax knew I was on birth control for my period cramps. He was the one
who took me to the doctor and picked them up for me. My concern was the
notches on his belt.
“I am clean,” he murmured, reading my mind. I held my breath, knowing it
might hurt. Again, Ajax spoke on cue, “Baby, this is going to hurt.”
No shit, Sherlock. Ajax was so big I could barely fit him in my mouth. This
was bound to hurt more than the average allocated amount.
He stroked my hair, planting comforting kisses over my face. “If you tense,
it'll only hurt more. Try to relax and let me in. I promise to be gentle. If it’s
too much, tell me. I can stop.”
I nodded.
Slowly and gently, he moved into me without entering. Instead, he rubbed
his dick up and down my sex. I tried to relax my muscles, breathing in and
out. Ajax twirled his tongue around my pulse, making me moan while at the
same moment he slipped a little inside me.
My relaxation vanished. I had no pain threshold whatsoever and grabbed
onto his shoulders in agony. Ouch.
“It’ll be worse if I keep inching in. Breathe. Focus on me. I'm here.”
I was about to tell him to stop when Ajax slammed inside.
“Ow. Ow. Ow. Fuck!” I whimpered like a hurt feral animal. I knew it might
be painful but holy motherfucker. My insides were burning. My face
scrunched up, and I clawed his shoulders hard enough to leave scratches.
“I am so sorry, baby.” Ajax had a genuinely distressed look on his face.
“There’s no way around the pain. Try to relax. It'll hurt less if you do.”
He held still, letting me get used to his size. Ajax dropped more gentle
kisses on my face and neck. He whispered the sweetest words in my ears,
distracting me from the uncomfortable foreign sensations.
"You are so beautiful."
"You blow my mind."
"You are so talented."
"I am in awe of you, Raven."
"I have never met anyone like you."
Suddenly, I was glad it was him. Another guy wouldn’t have known to give
me this assurance to distract me from the physical discomfort. Although I
was a baby about pain, Ajax knew I was also a sucker for his compliments.
It distracted me from the sting. I forgot about the burning sensation and
moaned when he sucked on my ear lobe.
“Baby, I’m going to move. Tell me to stop if it’s too much,” he reminded.
“Okay,” I barely choked out, dreading it.
He pulled back a little. My walls burnt as he moved. Ouch. Ouch. Ouch.
Ajax gently slid back, studying my face. He waited and repeated. From the
anguished expression, I could tell he was doing everything in his power to
hold back. After a few moments, he found a rhythm. His crescendo was
visibly building. Soon, he looked too far gone, breathing and panting
heavily. He didn’t want to hold back but was controlling himself.
Reid and I had watched porn like we did everything together. I had seen
enough to know a guy sped up while climaxing during sex.
I slid my arms around Ajax’s neck, pulling him closer to encourage him.
Ajax increased his tempo as I braced myself by putting my head in the
hollow of his neck. I wanted him to finish, but he might not if he saw my
agony. I dug my nails in his biceps as painful tears seeped out of my eyes.
After a few thrusts, Ajax fisted my hair as his body clamped down.
“Fuck,” Ajax roared.
A warmth spread inside, and I realized he came inside me. Another thing we
should’ve discussed earlier.
Ajax pulled out and collapsed on top. One of his hands remained wrapped
around my waist. He breathed on my cheek, absentmindedly kissing me
every so often.
I had never felt so close to Ajax. Did the aftereffect of sex bring people this
level of intimacy? I was unsure of what we had done, but a sick part of me,
the one that craved his attention, was happy for the closeness. One that
could only be attained physically.
Ajax eventually stirred and kissed me on the neck. He shifted and pulled
my back to his front.
“Are you okay?”
“Yep.”
“Are you sure?”
I nodded.
“I have never experienced anything like that,” he murmured in my hair. “It
was the only thing that could’ve calmed me down today. Thank you.” He
kissed my temple. “You are amazing.” He grabbed my hand and kissed each
of my fingers.
“I am?” Ugh! Yes, I heard it. I was fishing for compliments. I just gave up
my virginity. Did I expect him to say that I was not amazing? I needed to
see a therapist.
“You are and so much more.” He kissed my cheek. “I know it wasn’t the
same for you. I know it hurt. It’ll be uncomfortable the first few times, but I
promise sex will become mind-blowing.”
I blinked.
I was under the impression that this was a one-time deal because he was
freaking out. I should have known better. Ajax didn’t engage in one-night
stands. He was paranoid about catching diseases from random hookups. At
least the little reminder put my mind at ease.
Plus, Ajax believed one-night stands didn’t result in good sex. People
needed time to learn how to play each other’s bodies like a marionette. Or
so I had heard from his groupies.
If Ajax did meet someone he was attracted to, he let them know he could
only offer friendship or casual dating with no strings attached. They
engaged in a mutually beneficial relationship resulting in sexual
satisfaction. Once either of them got bored—which usually meant once
Ajax was bored—they ended the physical aspect and remained friends. He
expected the same of me.
My heart sank.
At the very least, I thought my sick desire for closeness with Ajax was
being fulfilled through sex. I felt special, knowing only I got to experience
this level of intimacy with him. I didn’t even get that.
Ajax had shared this post-orgasm closeness with lots of women. Some of
them were his closest friends. He wanted me in the same way he wanted
them. Friendship with sex, and then back to being friends. He'd leave me as
soon as he was done with me. Nothing about it made me special to him or
different from the others.
I was so stupid. I gave up my virginity in an unsure moment. I broke Reid’s
trust, I didn’t feel closer to Ajax, and my vagina hurt so much I wanted to
rip it out.
Ajax’s eyes grew heavy. My own were tearing up from the rampant
emotions. Maybe that’s why people didn’t give up their virginity or take sex
lightly. Sex complicated things because the physical affects the emotional. I
wished I’d waited until I was sure. Sex was bringing up a vulnerability I
had never experienced.
I tried to scoot away and return to my room.
Ajax’s hold tightened. “Where’re you going?”
“To my room.”
“No.”
“No?”
“Sleep here with me,” he stated as a finality. Softly kissing my temple, he
dragged me back into his arms.
“Um. I want to take a shower and get in my PJs. I also want to call my
parents.”
“My bathroom has everything you need for a shower.” Ajax pointed at his
bathroom door. “You can sleep in my boxers and a t-shirt or any of my
other clothes.” He pointed to his dresser. “My phone has an international
plan if you want to call your parents.” He pointed at his phone.
I didn't bother verbalizing the real reason I shouldn’t sleep here. Reid didn’t
share his flight details. He was coming home at some point tomorrow. He’d
throw a fit if he discovered us together in the morning.
Ajax turned me to my back. His gaze roamed my face as if searching for a
response. He could feel my defiance resonating through my body language.
“We are sleeping together,” he clarified. “Either here or in your room.”
I wondered if this was about his bruised ego. It didn’t make sense. Since my
return, I have met a different Ajax. Someone borrowing his skin, his shell.
The insides and personalities were entirely different. Ajax was selfsacrificing and prioritized others. He’d never hurt Reid’s feelings out of
pride.
“We can sleep here,” I sighed.
If he weren’t giving me a choice, I’d rather sleep here. There were six
bedrooms in this house. After his parents left, Ajax took the master
bedroom, which stood on the farthest side of the house. It was the most
private.
“Good.” Ajax kissed my shoulder. “I'll join you if you still want to take that
shower.”
Dread built inside me. I did want to take a shower. I was sticky, and pretty
sure I bled. But something told me Ajax expected sex with his proposal for
a shower. The thought kept me pinned to the bed.
“I’m kind of tired now. Can I get a shirt to sleep in?”
Ajax rose and brought me a sleeping shirt long enough to go down to my
thighs. I put it on and headed to the bathroom to clean what I could without
showering.
Ajax stood by the bed, naked. His eyes were fixed on me as I marched to
the bathroom. When I turned to close the door, I caught his gaze—dark,
lustful eyes, looking unbelievably hungry, raked over me.
I hurriedly closed the bathroom door, not giving him a chance to open
Pandora's box again. Suddenly, I wanted nothing more than to sleep in my
bed, away from Ajax. And around midnight, that’s precisely what I did.
Ajax was asleep when I tip-toed back. He had been on edge since my
return. I doubted this defiance would help the situation. However, I did give
up my virginity to the only man I shouldn’t have. I was an emotional wreck
and in physical pain. I had earned myself the right to take a hot shower
alone, sleep in my own clothes, and in my own damn bed.
Ajax.
I woke without that beautiful girl in my arms. Again.
I didn’t need the lights to feel Raven’s missing warmth. Blinking rapidly, I
oriented myself to gather my wits.
Memories of last night washed over me. A smile formed on my lips. Raven
lost her virginity to me. We experienced a moment of perfect togetherness
—just her and I. The way it was always supposed to be.
I didn’t plan for us to have sex last night. When I said to her I needed her, I
meant being with her, holding her, feeling her close. But after she told me
about some guy in Paris, it snapped me out of my noble intentions. The
moment she admitted to blowing some fucker in Paris, I threw caution to
the wind. Pure animal instincts took over as if needing to fill my female
mate with my seed. I dragged her to bed with a need to mark myself on her.
Anger coursed through me at the thought of her with that asshole. She told
me she loved me. We kissed. Then she left without talking to me and blew
some guy in Europe while I was pining after her.
She hurt me. Bad.
I told her I forgave her. In turn, she left me in the middle of the night.
I slammed my hand against the mattress. I found myself irritated,
aggravated, and angry once more. I was furious with Raven for avoiding
conflict. I was mad at myself for having no control left when it came to her.
I was supposed to be taking care of her, not fucking her. Most of all, I was
angry Raven had hooked up with some douchebag in Paris. Imagining her
with another man entirely fucked up my mood from last night’s bliss.
Why did I think she was responsible enough to visit Paris with an absentee
parent like Theressa?
I was her age only a few years ago. I knew what went through a seventeenyear-old’s mind. All those hormones. I gave Raven too much credit by
thinking she was above it.
I was landing in a pile of jealousy. Unable to help myself, I took out my
phone. I had forced myself not to stalk her on social media while she was in
Paris, but now, it was no holds barred. I went through the photos on her
Facebook page from over the summer. It didn’t take long to find the Michel
fucker with his arms draped around Raven. Around MY Raven.
This was three weeks ago. Jesus, I was about to lose it. She was blowing
this douchebag only three weeks ago. Fuck.
I looked at his profile. He was my age, which meant he was experienced.
She put her mouth on his dick. I should have been the first one she did that
to. The only one, in fact. He took what was fucking mine.
I tossed the phone on the bed and laid flat with an arm thrown over my face,
beyond livid. I reasoned with myself. I had given Raven an open-ended
ticket after she confessed to loving me. It wasn’t irrational for her to think I
was trying to get rid of her because I couldn’t handle her feelings. Dating
other people was supposed to be the right decision. We were both supposed
to move on during the summer.
Except I didn’t move on. I couldn’t even look at another girl. Raven
obviously had no problems in that department.
Raven should’ve spoken to me before making these assumptions. Instead,
she blew me off while literally blowing that asshole. We had a long list of
reasons why we shouldn’t be together. Now I had to add trust issues to the
list.
Despite pointing out the flaws of being together, I knew none of these
reasons would stop me. After last night, my obsession had risen to a new
level. I got a taste of what I had been craving for years, and now, I had
become a madman. Last night, it took everything in me not to follow her
into the bathroom and fuck her again. I couldn't let her find another
douchebag and move on. She must feel the same. Raven wasn’t a pushover.
I had seen her say no to plenty of men. She wouldn't have given up her
virginity if she didn't feel the same uncontrollable pull.
I glanced at the clock. It was five a.m. I didn’t know when she snuck back,
but I wasn’t giving her the chance to avoid me all day again. We needed to
talk.
I remained in bed, contemplating what to do. When I saw the sun, I threw
on a T-shirt and a pair of sweatpants. The house was eerily quiet as I walked
to the kitchen to make breakfast before heading to Raven's room.
Trying my best to sound normal, I called out from outside her bedroom
door. “Rave, I made breakfast.”
“Oh, okay. Thanks. Be right there.”
I sighed in relief. At least she was here.
Raven walked in while I was setting the kitchen table. She looked freshly
showered and breathtaking in a casual white tank top with sweatpants. The
outfit did more for me than the high-end lingerie girls had thrown my way
in the past.
“Coffee?”
“Sure.”
I poured two cups of coffee as Raven stacked eggs and pancakes onto our
plates. I watched her from the corner of my eye, her expression unreadable.
I kept the conversation light. “I heard the fashion show in Paris went well.
You are a big-shot designer now. Are you going to remember us, peasants,
when you are at the top?”
“Big shot? I think I am a micro-shot at best.” She sounded casual, trying for
humor.
“Everyone needs a start. Do you get recognition as the designer of the
dress?”
“Mom said I get a small royalty for any of the It’s So Raven dress sales.”
“Hah! So, you are a big-shot designer,” I continued our banter. I didn’t
know if my voice matched my nerves. “Will you take me on a fancy date
now that you are a baller?”
“Umm—” Raven tucked her hair behind her ear.
I switched gears as she acted uncomfortable. “Did your mom like any of
your other designs?”
Raven took a sip of her coffee in between devouring her food. “No, I
haven’t shown her any other ones.”
“How come?”
“It never crossed my mind."
“You should.”
Raven nodded without looking up.
“Did you call your mom to tell her you arrived safely?”
“Yeah, but she didn’t pick up.”
“And Uncle John?”
“I called him, too. He has a virtual assistant now who deals with his
messages. She said he would return my call after work."
“Reid mentioned you went to see him this summer. How was the visit to
South Africa?”
“It was incredible and eye-opening. Dad helps a lot of people. And he was
really attentive to me throughout the visit.”
I didn’t respond. I loved Uncle John, but he had failed his daughter. He had
shown no interest in Raven’s well-being in the last four years. I’d hate for
her to get her hopes up after only one visit.
As if sensing my apprehension, Raven preemptively defended her father.
“And when I returned to Paris, he called me regularly. He has been great
lately."
I nodded but said nothing otherwise. I didn’t have the heart to tell Raven
that Uncle John called her frequently because she was near Theressa. He
had a weird obsession with his ex-wife. It was ironic because I had a weird
obsession with his daughter. That was why it angered me that he made his
only daughter feel unwanted.
Raven munched on another forkful of pancakes. Thoughts of Uncle John
disappeared as I stared at her perfect mouth. As if she could sense the
change in my thoughts, Raven pushed away her plate and sprung to her feet.
“I am going back to sleep. Still jet-lagged. Can I help you clean up later?”
“Don’t worry about it. I can clean up. Go sleep.”
I stared behind Raven. She was a flight risk and clearly uncomfortable
discussing what was happening between us.
As for myself, I didn’t need to process. I could barely think rationally,
shaking with my need for her. After last night, I no longer knew what was
right and wrong.
Well, I did, but I wasn’t sure it would stop me.
The rest of the day passed in a blur. I met with Asher, Jaci, Alexa, and
Brandon to discuss our next investor meetings. I wrapped up and returned
home by five p.m. The door to Raven's room was closed. It seemed she had
stayed cooped up all day.
I whipped up dinner and waited as long as I could before heading to her
room. I gave her space all day—breathing room, time to think about it. I
had been patient, especially after what I went through this summer. I
couldn’t stay away anymore.
“Rave!” I pushed her door open.
“Yeah?” Raven was sitting at her desk, fumbling with her phone. She
wasn’t in bed but didn’t seem lucid or ready to take on the day. She had on
her sleeping shorts with a tank top.
“I made dinner. Have you eaten since breakfast?”
“No. I didn’t realize it got so late.”
“Have you been in bed all day?” I waved toward her bed, wondering why I
hadn’t stayed in bed with her.
Raven glanced at me. “I tried but couldn’t sleep. I have been trying to get in
touch with Dad. The calls aren’t connecting.”
I said nothing, though I wanted to. In this scenario, it was best to remain
quiet.
My eyes were fixed on her as Raven walked to the charging dock,
presumably to charge her phone. The gentle sway of her hip and the way
she walked was captivating. I couldn’t stop watching her. Couldn’t stop
wanting to be near her. To smell her. Cover her with my scent.
I moved without direction until I stood behind her. She turned and found
herself locked in a staring contest with me.
Raven gave nothing away with her expression. I brushed the hair out of her
face, fingers lingering as I played with the strands. Other thoughts
evaporated, and she was all that remained.
Before she could react, I pulled her close and sealed my mouth over hers.
She was faster to reciprocate this time, tongue swirling against mine. After
a few minutes of rough kissing, I pulled away, leaving us both breathless.
This wasn't my plan. Not by a long shot.
I wanted a conversation, but an uncontrollable and insatiable hunger had
taken over. A hunger only she could satiate. I waited years, and now that I’d
had her, I didn’t know how to stop.
I kissed her frantically with one hand cupping her chin and the other on her
waist. I greedily explored her mouth as her tongue readily stroked back.
Running a thumb down her bare arm, I felt her break out in goosebumps. I
dipped my head to lick her jaw while my fingers slipped inside her shorts. I
played with the edge of her panties without touching her bare, proceeding
with caution to give her a chance to stop me.
I gently grazed over the material, waiting for an indication. When I did it
again, Raven moaned. It’s what I needed; this was everything.
Keeping my eyes trained on her, I moved to find her clit. She was dripping
wet. I fingered her while my mouth kissed and licked her. I grabbed her top
and moved it down to expose her tits. I squeezed her breast and flicked her
nipple with my tongue. Raven shuddered when I sucked on her nipple
harder by hollowing out my cheeks. Her mouth was slightly parted, pupils
dilated. Her hands pressed against my shoulders for balance, legs quivering
as if unable to remain standing for long.
I wanted nothing more than to watch her come apart. I needed it.
I suspended her in the air and walked us to the bed, all the while kissing her.
After kicking my shoes off, I lowered her onto the mattress. Grabbing onto
the waistband, I pulled down her shorts and underwear. Her tank top and
bra were the next to go.
Fuck me.
I had never seen anything so perfect.
Starting from her neck, I kissed every part of her body. Licking, tasting, and
sucking on her perfect skin until I reached her abdomen. Once I neared her
pussy, I glanced up. Raven lifted her head to look down. She watched me
press a kiss on her cunt. I stroked her slit with my fingers and swiped her
opening with my tongue.
“Fuck, you taste so good. So… fucking… good,” I stuttered in between
licks.
"Oh, my God.” Raven closed her eyes, head falling on the mattress.
I explored her greedily, lapping at her nub before stabbing my tongue
inside. She writhed under me, legs jerking. Raven squirmed unbearably, but
I ignored her pleas and kept at it until a cry ripped through her.
“Oh, fuck. I am coming. Oh, my God. Fuuuck!" Raven screamed with her
hands in my hair.
As Raven came down from her peak, I kissed her inner thigh, breasts, neck,
and pouty lips. This time, she kissed me back. Hard. I shifted us on the bed
and maneuvered her head to rest on my chest.
Other than her heavy breathing, the room was quiet.
“Do you want to—” Raven started.
“No, you’ll still be sore. I’m fine.” That was the truth. I only wanted to hold
her tonight. I shifted my erection. I might be hard as hell, but I was content
enjoying the view.
The exhaustion from the orgasm and the jet lag took hold of Raven. Her
eyelids grew heavy. Within minutes, she was fast asleep in my arms.
This was how it was meant to be between us. I smiled and kissed her hair.
After months of mental torture and insomniac nights, I had finally found
peace. I undressed down to my boxers, pulled her back to me, and slipped
into the same dream world with her.
Raven.
A loud thud woke me. Maybe an hour had passed, or maybe five. I had no
concept of time or how long we had been napping, but I heard the distinct
thud.
Ajax was still holding me, fast asleep. “Ajax.” I shook him.
“Hmm.”
“Ajax, wake up.”
“Wassup?”
“I heard something.”
“It’s nothin'.” Ajax sounded groggy.
“Ajax! Wake. Up. I think someone broke in.”
“What!” That finally caught his attention, and he jumped out the bed to get
dressed. “I’ll check downstairs. Stay here and lock the door after me, then
call 911. Do you have a bat or anything heavy lying around?”
I started dressing, too. “There is a glass bottle on my dresser. You can
smash—”
“Hello! Anyone home?” Reid’s unmistakable voice carried through the
open door.
This was my worst nightmare. Now I wished it were an intruder instead.
“Shit,” I whispered. “You need to leave.”
Ajax glared at me in response.
“Ajax, you need to go to your room.”
“No,” he said curtly.
Did he want his little brother to find us like this? I didn’t know what to do. I
could hear Reid shuffling. If he came in here… this scene looked bad
because it was bad.
I straightened my clothes and ran toward the door. If Ajax wouldn’t leave, I
would. I had to find Reid before he came in here.
Acting as casual as possible, I descended the stairs. “Hello, Stud. I see
someone found their way out of Paris.”
“Hello, Beautiful.”
I jumped into Reid’s open arms for a hug as he lifted me into the air.
“How was your flight?”
“So fucking long. I’m beat.”
I heard Ajax’s footsteps behind me but couldn’t force myself to turn and
face him. “Hey, scamp.” Ajax hugged Reid, ignoring me.
“If I am a scamp, then you are an old man.”
“I like being an old man.” Ajax pointed a thumb at himself. “You hungry? I
made dinner, but Rave and I never got around to it.”
Was that an innocent comment or a backhanded dig? I no longer understood
what was happening with Ajax.
The three of us sat for dinner. Deciding to focus on Reid instead of Ajax, I
acted normal—laughing, joking, and teasing Reid. Inside, I was a mix of
turmoil and chaos.
SEPTEMBER 2015.
Raven.
It was Labor Day. True to Sinclair family tradition, there was a
full-blown all-day barbecue. We were all piled into the kitchen and patio
area.
Ajax usually insisted our parties were contained in the downstairs area. This
rule was to remain in place until every member of the family turned sixteen,
which meant until Mia turned sixteen. As if it was the magical age to
become a responsible partygoer.
However, on Labor Day, Ajax allowed guests to roam free in the house for
this barbecue. A daytime barbecue didn’t stand to threaten his
impressionable younger sister with acts of debauchery.
Like every year, we’d invited neighbors, school friends, family friends, and
Ajax’s college friends. He had more friends than Reid, Mia, and I
combined.
Everybody loved him, and everyone looked up to him. I didn’t know one
person who disliked Ajax. His easygoing vibe made his presence extremely
attractive. My heart swelled with pride. Ajax would also be highly
successful once his app launched next year. As if he needed more bait to
charm people. As if anyone could ever resist him.
Including myself, apparently.
I still hadn’t wrapped my mind around the loss of my innocence to Ajax.
Luckily, Reid came home the next night, providing a much-needed
distraction.
That night, Reid and I stayed up all night playing video games. And we left
for the Hamptons the following day. Janeen's family owned a house in the
Hamptons and allowed her to invite a bunch of her school friends. I spent
some much-needed time away from the city, allowing me to wrap my brain
around my new reality—Ajax deflowered me.
We returned home the same day Mia arrived from Grand Cayman.
I missed her so damn much. There was an emptiness in this house when she
was gone. The moment she stepped inside, this inanimate brick-and-mortar
came to life.
Since her return, Mia insisted on spending every waking and sleeping
moment together. We spent the week visiting all our favorite New York City
spots. Mia wanted to be re-acquainted with city life after being locked away
on an island.
On her first night back, Mia insisted the four of us have a slumber party in
my room. She had her brothers and me wrapped around her little finger, so
we gave in. Mia and I bunked on the bed with the boys in sleeping bags on
the floor. We cuddled, ate popcorn, and watched crappy movies. There was
so much teasing, jesting, catching up, and love. It was a connection we lost
over the summer—one that I missed so much.
The night was magical, reminding me of simpler times. Everything was
normal, as if this thing with Ajax had never happened. Like I had imagined
it, or it was all a big misunderstanding.
Ajax showed no signs of awkwardness or indication that anything had
happened between us. He was utterly casual—until he grabbed me for a
breathtaking kiss when Reid and Mia went downstairs to replenish the
snacks.
He let go before they walked in, never uttering a word to me. He went back
to being cool, calm, and collected.
I had whiplash. Did that happen? I was losing my grip on reality.
So, when Mia woke me up the following day and dragged me out of bed, I
didn’t mind. I needed an escape from my mind. Mia was the only one loud
enough to speak over the pesky voice in my head. She was pure, honest,
and wore her heart on her sleeve. It was infectious. I didn’t make bullet
points in my mind or over-analyze when we chatted.
This wasn’t a dig at her intelligence or depth. Mia was extremely intelligent
but also a muscle relaxer, relaxing my tense brain muscles. I needed her
badly to feel sane again.
So, I didn’t complain when she insisted on sticking by my side all week. I
didn’t complain when we spent hours getting mani-pedis and makeovers. I
didn’t complain when she wanted to have a slumber party every night to
make up for the last four months. Face masks, girly movies, popcorn,
staying up late, and gossip. Bring it on.
But my grip on reality loosened again when I caught Ajax pushing the door
open the first night Mia slept over.
I realized why he was there, but he didn’t expect Mia to be.
Mia frowned at him and gave him a “Girls only, out please,” sass comment.
Ajax mumbled, “Why are the lights still on? It’s bedtime,” before heading
back.
He came to my room every night, only to find Mia sleeping in my bed. He'd
leave without making a peep, but I could feel the look on his face. Impatient
and hanging by a thread.
And today, it was like he couldn’t wait one more second. I had felt his eyes
on me all day.
I should be flattered. Ajax was the ultimate catch. Every girl my age would
die to be with someone like him. Every girl his age would die to be with
him or kill each other to be with him. Ajax was the definition of the perfect
man—men wanted to be him, and women wanted to be with him.
So, why did I find myself avoiding being alone with him?
I loved Ajax when we were all together, watching movies and having
family dinners.
I didn’t know how to feel about the new Ajax when he was alone with me.
Since my return from Paris, a dark cloud surrounded us whenever we were
alone. A darkness that had no place or relevance with the rest of Ajax’s
identity. It was causing his moods to be volatile, impatient, and sexually
charged. He was like a ticking time bomb.
And it was scaring the shit out of me.
Chugging back my remaining red wine, I pushed these thoughts away and
focused on the conversation instead.
“... especially the heat. That was the worst,” Mia wrapped up her lecture on
why the Grand Cayman was hell on earth. The small crowd around us
seemed amused.
I wasn’t listening. I didn’t need to. Mia had been complaining about the
Grand Cayman since her return. Suffice it to say, she didn’t have a good
summer. Her dissatisfaction had nothing to do with the island and
everything to do with Uncle Reese hiring a nanny to take care of her while
he worked. None of us were there to keep her company, either.
“Jeez, Mia. How terrible for you. You had to spend a summer in paradise,”
Reid teased.
Mia huffed. “If it’s such a paradise, then why don’t you go there next
summer, and I’ll go to Paris?”
Asher laughed at Mia’s sass. “That’s a great idea,” he chimed in. “Maybe
we can take a group trip to the Grand Cayman next summer and stay at the
Sinclair beach house for free.” He raised his beer bottle to clink with Reid’s.
Asher Huntzberger was here tonight. He was the first boy I kissed. We had
remained good friends throughout the years.
“And we’ll ship Mia off to Paris. You can be free labor for Theressa.” Reid
grinned ear to ear.
Not one to back down, Mia drove her point home. “That’s fine. I’ll get free
Theressa Beckett Specials while you fuckers fry in the heat with sand in
your ass.”
“Language!” Ajax chided as he joined the conversation. “And no one is
wearing Theressa Beckett Specials.”
“You said bad words when you were my age,” Mia complained. “And
Raven wears Theressa Beckett Specials.”
“Hey, asshole.” I elbowed Mia. “Way to throw me under the bus.”
“Ladies, please. Language. Show some decorum.” Ajax’s exasperated
attempts to discipline us were met with a round of laughter.
This was the Ajax I loved. How could you not? I worshipped this Ajax.
“And why the fuck should we show decorum because we are ladies?” Alexa
challenged. I liked this girl. A huge feminist at heart, she was never one to
let something like this slide.
Ajax put his hands up in surrender. “Everyone should show decorum, but
since joining this conversation, only the ladies have dropped f-bombs and
curse words.”
“Yeah, son! Cause we men got decorum,” Asher boomed.
“Decorum for men,” Reid egged him on, swinging an arm around me to
pull me into a one-handed hug. “Not to mention, Alexa, Ajax is allowing
you out of the dungeon for this barbecue under the condition that you don’t
corrupt our baby sister. If you don’t want to return to the basement, keep the
language clean.”
Alexa was a close friend of Ajax’s, who also used to be his fuck buddy.
Despite fucking him, I never saw her upstairs or in his room. When their
intimate relationship ended, Ajax moved on without peril, while Alexa was
a wreck for a while. I guess he replaced her with me.
Except, everyone knew about Alexa, and no one had a clue about us. That
thought made me feel dirty and cheap. Suddenly, I felt a sense of
camaraderie with Alexa.
“Look who's talking?” I narrowed my eyes at Reid. “Your potty mouth
should get you locked up and far away from us, impressionable ladies.”
“Nope! ‘Cause I got decorum.” Reid straightened his posture, waving his
hand like a Miss Universe contestant greeting the crowd.
Everyone laughed, and the day passed with nonsense conversations, old
friends, lots of food, and lots of drinks. A few hours later, I headed to the
living room to watch TV. I needed a break from socializing.
Suddenly, someone grabbed my elbow. I whipped my head in that direction.
Ajax.
There was an intensity in his eyes. He was vibrating with violent energy,
and all I could do was stare like a deer in headlights. He flexed his fingers
and pulled at my elbow. Ajax rushed us up the stairs without a word,
charging toward his room. I could barely keep up or catch my breath as he
moved us to his room and locked the door.
We were alone in his room once more.
Ajax.
One week.
I had barely any contact with Raven for a whole week. This was the first
time Mia wasn’t attached to her hips. Did she think a houseful of people
would stop me from taking advantage of that?
Reid was finally over his dose of Raven when Mia came into the picture.
My siblings were so fucking annoying. After spending a frustrating amount
of time being joined at the hip with Raven, Mia insisted on sleeping in
Raven’s bed every night. I considered shipping Mia off to boarding school.
For Christ's sake, she was worse than Reid.
What was with the Sinclairs and our fascination with Raven? I tried to get
Raven's attention every night and at every opportunity. We still hadn’t
talked. I only knew I had become a madman and needed to be around
Raven to feel sane.
All day, I had felt like a ticking time bomb ready to go off. When I finally
found Raven alone, I came at her like a wild beast. Manhandled her in
caveman style. We had sex and then nothing for days. No conversation. No
contact. My insides were about to explode with my need for her.
“Ajax, what—”
Before she could finish her sentence, I swooped her up and pushed her
against the bedroom door, covering her lips with mine. Pressing my body as
close as possible, I kissed her desperately, devouring her with my mouth. I
couldn’t stop if I wanted to, and I didn’t particularly want to stop.
I forced myself to pull away every so often to let the girl breathe. When I’d
see her take a sharp breath, I was back for more. It had been an eternity
since I kissed her. There was a maddening desire to cover her with me,
surround her, be all over her, suffocate her with my body. I grabbed onto her
thighs to lift her. My groin pressed into her as my hands spread her ass
cheeks wide. I kissed her and ground her against the door, ready to fall
apart. Unbuttoning her pants, I inserted two fingers inside her.
“Are you sore? Does this hurt?” I panted, barely able to say the words.
“Wha—N-No.”
I sighed in relief.
My muscles were tense from my lust high, which would remain dissatisfied
until I was inside her. Moving her off the door, I carried Raven to my bed. I
didn’t give two flying fucks about who was here—I didn’t know why I
invited these people to my house or why we were having this stupid party. I
wanted everyone out, including my siblings. Nothing mattered other than
this.
Raven was more sensible than me. “Wait. There are people in the house.”
“I don’t care.” Because I didn’t.
As I worked the buttons of her shirt, Raven restated her feeble protests.
“What if Reid or Mia come here looking for you?”
“Rave,” I groaned desperately. “I fucking need you. I can’t wait, not for
another second. No one’s stopping this. Not even you. Now take my
fucking shirt off,” I growled, ripping off her bra.
I had lost finesse and fumbled with her zipper. I slid her pants to her thighs,
taking her panties while Raven had barely unbuttoned my shirt.
Impatient with her slow fingers, I unbuckled my jeans to expedite the
process. I kept chanting a mantra to slow down. We only had sex once, so it
would still be uncomfortable for her. I couldn’t drive into her the way I
wanted—with manic force.
I needed to calm down if I wanted her to enjoy sex. She wouldn’t come
during vaginal sex the first few times. I had to find other ways to make it
pleasurable.
Pushing her gently down on the mattress, I kissed the pulse of her neck and
sucked on the skin. With biting kisses, I moved to her perfect breasts, perky
and full in my hands. I trailed my tongue along her chest, which rose and
fell. Lapping my tongue, I closed my mouth over her nipple. The sensation
was sometimes unbearable but sensitive enough to make her toes curl. I
nibbled and licked until Raven vibrated under me like she couldn’t take it
anymore.
I stopped torturing her and moved my mouth to her cunt with a grazing bite.
“Ah!” Raven’s body jerked on impact.
I gave her a painfully slow lick. Raven reflexively arched her back, pushing
her opening into my mouth to give me more access. She stared at me. There
was a primal look on her face that wasn’t there a minute ago. Thoughts of
the guests downstairs were gone. She was with me, waiting for my next
move. To appease her, I flicked her nub and then sucked on it.
“Ajax,” Raven gasped and fisted my hair with her delicate hands. Her
thighs were jerking, her pussy throbbing against my tongue.
God, I needed this contact. We both did from the sound of it.
I flattened my tongue and licked, leaving no room for air or space between
my mouth and her cunt. Listening to her moans, I located a spot that made
Raven’s back arch. I licked harder. Punishingly hard, giving her no choice
but to come for me. Her body trembled as she thrust forward.
“Oh, God,” Raven whimpered.
“I missed this,” I breathed, apparently allowing too much space between my
tongue and her pussy. Raven yanked at my hair to push my face down as if
she’d lose her climax otherwise. Like she couldn’t wait any longer.
I loved it. She was needy for me. Needy for only what I could give her. She
was dripping, riding my tongue, and entirely insatiable. I didn’t deny her.
Increasing my tempo, I drove it home as Raven ground against my mouth.
“Oh, fuck. I am coming,” Raven moaned.
I blasted up, pushing myself forward with my knees until my throbbing
cock found her cunt.
“Oh, God—” Raven’s voice wavered.
She was still coming when I rubbed the head of my dick against her sex. As
she steadied her breaths, I pushed inside. Her natural lubrication allowed
easier access this time, but she was still too tight. I grabbed her hair for
control so I wouldn’t slam inside. Inch by inch, I expanded and stretched
her until I was all the way inside.
“Fuck.”
I was inside her.
Inside Raven.
My Raven.
“Oh, shit!” I lifted my body slightly to stare at where we were joined. The
sight alone could make me come.
Raven hadn’t made the heart-wrenching sounds from our first time. While
the moment was bliss, Raven’s pain was killing me. This time, she took a
sharp inhale. I stalled on top, letting her get adjusted.
“Does it still hurt?”
“It’s not so bad.” Raven took more steadying breaths.
I distracted her from the uncomfortable, foreign feeling by dropping kisses
over her face and neck. Moving one hand down between us, I stroked her
sensitive clit.
Raven gasped, not expecting the new sensation. The pleasure distracted her
from the pain. With one hand on her jaw, I kissed her, eating at her mouth
and fucking it with my tongue. I pressed my dick against her sensitive spot,
which seemed to build Raven.
Her little whimpers and cries filled my room. She was so fucking erotic—
lips parted, eyes heavy and glazed over.
“I missed this. I missed this so fucking much.”
I only ground against her with my dick instead of thrusting. Thrusting
would be painful as her walls would burn from the movement. It might not
be the sex motion of in and out, but Raven enjoyed this part. I desperately
wanted this reaction one day while I fucked her hard. Baby steps.
I let my forehead drop to hers, staring into her eyes and not breaking the
connection as she chased her high. She wrapped her arms around my back,
trying to get me closer to her clit. That soaking wet tightness built again. A
silent scream from her parted lips leaked out, gaining volume.
“Shit. I’m coming again.” Her head fell back. “Oh, God.”
I moved upon hearing Raven go off. Rotating my hips, I pulled out only to
push inside torturously slow. My pace increased when I realized Raven was
too distracted by her orgasm to notice the burning sensations. Soon, I was
close to finding my release.
“Fuck, baby.” My wild groan was guttural. My world turned black, my
heart hammering as if it might explode. With one final thrust, I spilled
inside her.
I was a panting mess as we both lay there with my face in her hair. I turned
to kiss her cheek, neck, or anything in a reachable vicinity without moving.
Realizing I must be crushing her, I shifted to the side, still holding her
close. Pretty soon, we drifted off, with me subconsciously waking up to
ensure this was real.
Eventually, my eyes opened due to Raven’s fussiness.
“Should we go back to the party?”
“Why?” I whispered, stroking her hair.
“All of our friends are here. If we’re both gone for so long—”
I sighed. She was right, as I had been reckless.
“Okay.” Brushing my lips against hers, I started dressing though Raven
appeared drained. “I can go downstairs first. Take your time.”
“Okay.”
“Oh, and tell Mia to sleep in her damn room tonight. After everyone falls
asleep, come back to my room.”
Raven tensed. Tucking her hair behind her ear, she stammered, “Oh. I-I uh.
I d-don't—”
I patiently awaited her response, staring intently. I was hoping for the
intensity to portray that I wasn’t playing around with this request. Hell, it
was a demand at this point.
Raven stopped stammering and took a deep breath to gain enough
confidence to speak in complete sentences. “I can’t stay here tonight,” she
began determinedly. “I have school tomorrow.”
“Why can’t you sleep here if you have school?”
“I have to pack my bag and iron my uniform. If I stay here, I’ll stay up
late.” She didn’t meet my gaze while making the assertion. She might have
a point, but it didn’t ease my annoyance.
“Raven, you can still do those things. I’m asking you to sleep down the hall,
not on the fucking moon. What’s the difference if you sleep in your room
versus mine?” I failed to keep the irritation out of my tone.
“Please don’t be mad. I assumed you’d go back to campus tonight. With
your classes starting tomorrow—” Raven glanced at me apprehensively,
seemingly frightened.
I had to stop being so angry at her.
This wasn’t about sleeping in my room. I didn't know where we stood and
was too nervous about bringing it up or pushing Raven. I didn't want her to
bolt and find another douchebag as she did over the summer.
I sounded like a broken record. I told her that I had forgiven her. Obviously,
I hadn’t. I was still pissed. I didn’t trust her anymore. She wasn’t making it
easy, either. It didn’t reduce my anxiety when she acted reluctant. Lately, I
had to fight for an inch from her.
However, I had to stop if I didn’t want to scare her away.
“I won’t try anything if you need to wake up early,” I muttered, unsure if I
believed it myself. “And I’m not staying on campus this year,” I added.
“Why not?” Raven frowned, perplexed.
“With everything in the house, it’s easier than going back and forth.”
Raven nodded in understanding. Then she frowned again. “Isn’t it already
paid for?”
“There’s a long waiting list of people trying to get into on-campus housing.
It wasn’t difficult to get out of it.”
It wasn’t as easy as I made it sound. Changing my accommodations was a
considerable inconvenience, especially two days before the semester
started. I couldn’t verbalize the real reason I went through the trouble. I
could barely admit it to myself. The reason why I was staying at home was
—drumroll—I didn’t trust Raven anymore.
She refused to talk about us, and I couldn’t push until she was ready. This
much I had come to realize. She had been using Reid and Mia as buffers to
avoid a conversation. There was no way to grasp what was inside her head,
and until I knew where we stood, I wanted to ensure other douchebags
weren’t in her proximity. As unhealthy as it was, I was staying to keep an
eye on Raven.
There was one other factor. After being with Raven, only a few days away
was brutal. At my first chance, I dragged her to my room despite the house
full of people. I could finally breathe after having her under me. I’d take
torture over having to stay away for days on end.
Bending to meet her gaze, I returned to the original issue. “So, I’ll see you
tonight?”
“Okay,” Raven conceded.
“Good.” With a final kiss on her lips, I headed downstairs.
Raven.
True to my word, I slept in Ajax’s room the night of the barbecue. True to
his word, Ajax did nothing physical except cover my face with lots of sweet
kisses, stroke my hair, and hold me tight while we slept. He also wasn’t
angry like he had been recently. I felt cherished, not scared.
The next day, Ajax asked me to come back to his room. The familiar heat
reflected in his eyes. We got physical—earth-shattering type of physical.
My trepidation returned during our interactions as his body vibrated with
fury. All the same, I came three times. Twice from him going down on me
and once more during sex while he rubbed my clit to orgasm. The
discomfort from the invasion was getting better.
After staying up late last night for mind-blowing orgasms, I was sore and
swollen. I was exhausted but had a study group session at five p.m. and a
dance class at seven. Private schools had a full load that didn’t
accommodate your newly found sex life. I finished my schoolwork in the
library while waiting for my group to show up. I was yawning and
dreaming of my bed by the time they did.
After the study session, I called Dad while walking to the dance studio. His
virtual assistant picked up and told me he couldn’t come to the phone. As if
to plunge the knife into my heart, she informed me of giving him my
messages. He purposefully hadn’t returned the calls.
Thanks. I didn’t need or ask for the extra piece of information.
Swiping the tears falling onto my cheeks, I stared at my phone. Those
promises over the summer about things being different were all lies. He
kept in touch with me because I was with Mom. I knew it in my heart but
didn’t want to believe it. He wanted to show Mom that he was a good
father. Or perhaps he tried to one-up her upon finding out I was staying with
her for the summer. Maybe he wanted to find an excuse to talk to her,
knowing she was nearby.
Either way, I had his attention while I was with her. Upon returning to New
York, I had reverted to used trash as far as Dad was concerned. Mom was
no better. Since her career took off, she barely contacted me.
The day came crashing down. I was physically drained, and now the mental
exhaustion had taken hold. I didn’t bother with my dance class and rushed
home instead, wanting to bury myself under a warm comforter.
With a sullen mood and sleepy state of mind, I stumbled up the stairs. I
unbuttoned my shirt but left the white tank top underneath, not bothering to
take off my skirt as I sank into the bed.
It must have been eight or nine p.m. when I heard my bedroom door creak.
Raising my head, I found Ajax letting himself in and locking the door
behind him.
I gawked at him in my sleepy haze. He was painfully beautiful with an
angelic face. That body, perfectly ripped, and the veiny forearms with broad
shoulders. His defined biceps peeked through his fitted shirt.
How come I never noticed Ajax this way before?
I had slept with him, so how did I miss this? He was a walking sex god.
Jesus. How do women resist him? They should be throwing themselves at
his feet. He might scare me at times, but it was impossible to deny that Ajax
was the epitome of male hotness.
I couldn’t help giving him a sleepy smile. In turn, Ajax rewarded me with
his million-dollar megawatt grin. Crouching next to me, he kissed my
forehead before brushing his lips to mine.
“Hi.” My eyes fluttered close when the bed dipped. Ajax climbed on,
spooning me from behind.
“Hey yourself,” he murmured, kissing my hair. “Did you have a good day?”
“Mm,” I mumbled, half asleep.
“How come you’re in bed already?”
“Bed’s comfy.”
“Oh,” was all Ajax said.
I didn’t say more, falling back into my slumber.
“I got a call from your dance teacher. She said you were a no-show today.
They couldn’t get in touch with you, so they called me.”
Ajax drew imaginary lines on my arms. Goosebumps. I was getting wet
from arm touching. What the hell? It wasn’t foreplay, but I was drowning in
his heady lust fog from the slight touch. I couldn’t think or focus.
“Was tired,” I mumbled.
“You never missed class before. She was worried. Why didn’t you call them
to let them know?”
I didn't respond. All I could think about was getting off or going back to
sleep. I chose to sleep.
“Rave?” Ajax scratched my back to get my attention.
“Hmm.”
Ajax gave up on the one-sided conversation. “If you’re going back to sleep,
get out of your school uniform."
I had drifted to sleep when hands grabbed the waistband of my skirt and
slipped it down my legs. “Wha—”
“You went to sleep in your skirt. It’s getting wrinkled.”
I forced my eyes open and watched Ajax drape my skirt over a hanger. He
turned off the lights except for the bedside lamp and undressed down to his
boxers. He returned to the bed, washboard abs glistening in the dim light.
I couldn’t look away.
Lifting the comforter, Ajax slipped under it while I stared, wondering if an
angel had fallen on earth. Or maybe it was the Devil. A beautiful Devil.
“You are so fucking hot.” The words slipped out before I could stop myself.
Ajax seemed surprised, like it was the last thing he had expected to hear. He
raised an amused eyebrow. “You’re not so bad yourself.” He grinned ear to
ear. “In fact, you might be the prettiest girl I have—”
My hand moved to grab the back of his neck to drag him closer. I nudged
my tongue out, seeking entrance into his mouth.
Ajax stiffened in shock. I had never made a move before.
He reciprocated without hesitation, hands pulling my hair while moaning
into my mouth. Our tongues wrestled for control as he hauled me closer. By
the time his undeniable erection strained between us, I was awake. Fully
awake.
It didn’t matter if my negligent parents didn’t bother returning my calls. Or
if my father spent time with me only to spite my mother. Or if my mother
would rather chase fame than be with me.
This man cared. He cared enough to find out why I didn’t attend a dance
class. My parents didn’t even know about my dance classes. Since my
return, they hadn’t checked to see if I was dead or alive. Ajax was the only
one who could replace what they took from me. Replace the things I could
never verbalize or demand out of them. They broke my heart. He put it back
together.
Currently, I couldn’t get myself to think past it. I couldn’t bring myself to
care about Ajax’s newfound anger, either. I wanted temporary oblivion, and
Ajax was the only one who could give it to me. He had been overwhelmed.
He knew I was sad, too. Maybe this was his way of consoling us—by
letting me get lost in this gorgeous and brilliant sex god of a man while
temporarily blanking his mind of obligations. Whatever his reasons for
pursuing this, I’d take the momentary reprieve.
Feeling brazen, I slipped my hand inside his boxers and stroked his dick.
Without hesitation, I lowered to take him in my mouth.
“Fuck,” Ajax thundered. He pulled the loose hair out of my face and
gripped it with one hand. His other sifted through my hair. He didn’t guide
me this time. I followed my intuition from the sounds he made.
Ajax groaned out loud. Feeling him tremble under me made me feel
powerful. I was also the only one who could give him what he needed.
I lifted my eyes to look at him. He stared at me with an incredulous
expression. We maintained eye contact as his dick throbbed in my mouth.
“Fuck. I’m going to come. Take your mouth off me, baby.”
I was aware of what happened next. When Reid and I watched porn, we saw
women swallow cum with some of it dripping out of their mouths. I had
gone down on Michel but never swallowed. In my current sexual state, the
challenge didn’t bother me.
Ajax stared at me in shock as I kept sucking him off harder.
“Baby, what are—oh, fuck.” Ajax punched down the mattress with one
hand while tightening the grip on my hair with the other.
It was like taking a shot. I didn’t overthink it, and it went down smoothly.
Thank God nothing dribbled out of my mouth. It wasn’t a sexy look.
“Shit.” Ajax seemed astonished by my boldness. “Come here.”
He grabbed my face and kissed me feverishly. Within seconds, my
underwear was off as Ajax pushed me onto the mattress. He swooshed
down, two strong hands lifting my thighs. Before I could reposition
adequately, his wet tongue was in my folds.
Ajax had figured out how to make me come. He paid close attention to my
reactions the first couple of times, and now he had the lyrics to my pussy
memorized.
My blood heated, and my ears rang. I trembled when he lapped his tongue
around my nub. Pressing his tongue against me, he ground onto my clit,
leaving no room for air. I arched my back within minutes, ready to shatter
for him.
“Fuck. Oh, my God. Oh, my God!” I came holding onto his hair and riding
his tongue, not ready to let the high end.
I heard words, but in my satiated mind, I couldn’t figure out the source.
“Raven?” My face was moved with a grip on my chin, Ajax’s emerald eyes
almost blinding me with their shine. He chuckled. “I love seeing you post-
orgasm. You are so cute. Completely out of it and sprawled out.”
He pressed a kiss on my lips, rubbing his dick against my sex. He was hard
again. Extremely hard.
He told me last night how incredible he felt when we were joined. Like we
were connected as one. That’s what I need today. I needed to feel connected
to someone who cared about me, like I was a part of them.
I grabbed his shoulders when Ajax pushed inside me, hugging him tightly
to increase the intimacy. Ajax held on to my hips and plunged deep,
smacking his hips against mine until finding his climax.
Afterward, we lay side by side.
“Rave.” Ajax brushed his thumb over my lips. “Isn't it time we talked about
it?”
Talk about what?
Oh.
I had never missed a dance class before. I should’ve known better than to
assume Ajax would drop the topic. Those classes were costly. I shouldn't
have bailed, but I also didn’t want to discuss why I skipped—my parents.
It was weird for Ajax to act like a concerned parent while holding me
naked. The lines were severely blurred between us. So, I kept my eyes shut
to suspend this alternate reality.
“Rave,” Ajax tried again before giving out a defeated sigh. He kissed my
cheek and pulled me close as we called it a night.
After dinner, Reid and I cleaned the table while Ajax boxed the leftovers.
It was a Friday night family dinner. We had a massive feast with way too
many leftovers. Mia did her chores in record time and bolted to her room,
talking to her friends or whatever the hell thirteen-year-olds did.
“When do you want to leave for Janeen's party?” Reid quirked an eyebrow
at me.
“Janeen’s Party? Are her parents home?” Ajax responded on my behalf,
knowing the answer full well.
Slight annoyance nagged at me. Reid narrowed his eyes, too, but didn’t
respond.
“It’s for Janeen’s birthday,” I offered, hoping Ajax didn’t make a thing out
of it. I didn’t want to mitigate another fight if this tainted Reid’s good
mood. “She throws a September blowout every year.”
Ajax didn’t comment, seemingly biting his tongue.
“It’s true. We go every year.” Reid tapped his phone, presumably texting
our clique of friends. “I’m going to take a shower and change. Let’s leave
right after.”
As soon as Reid was out of earshot, Ajax turned to me. “How late will you
be?”
“I don’t know.” I shrugged.
“Right.” He appeared tense as if wanting to argue.
“You okay?”
“I didn’t know you guys went to this party yearly,” Ajax responded
skeptically. “Will there be drugs, drinking, parental supervision? I don’t
have any details.”
My blank stare likely reflected confusion over Ajax’s apprehension. Reid
and I went to plenty of parties. Ajax was aware of our drinking. There was a
full-on war about it.
Reid and Ajax got into it a bunch of times because Reid started drinking at
fourteen. Ajax put a stop to it. Reid called him a hypocrite since Ajax also
started drinking at a young age. Ajax explained that he didn’t have good
caretakers to look out for his well-being. Reid did.
Ajax felt strongly about it, so I never gave him grief. I declined Reid’s offer
numerous to join him for a drink, scared of Ajax finding out.
Reid disagreed with Ajax’s do as I ask, not as I do parenting method. In fear
of Reid’s further rebellion, Ajax made a deal. Reid and I would be allowed
to go to parties, including Ajax’s infamous parties, if we abstained from
drinking until college. However, he’d lock us up indefinitely if he caught us
drinking.
Reid renegotiated that deal. He agreed to stop drinking temporarily with the
understanding that when we turned sixteen, we’d be allowed to drink at
parties and social events, so long as we were safe.
At the time, Ajax thought sixteen was far away. He gave in, hoping our
dads would return from their assignments before we were old enough to
cash in on the deal. They could deal with the fallout. Until then, his job was
to keep us alive.
Ajax looked ready to split his hair as we neared our sixteenth birthday, and
our dads' were nowhere in sight. Nonetheless, Ajax kept his word. When we
turned sixteen, he looked the other way while we drank. He did give us a
bunch of safety lectures before we turned sixteen. To this day, Ajax
occasionally provides refresher courses on what not to do.
Don't get blackout drunk.
Don't mix alcohol and drugs.
Don't drink and stumble around the city. If you are in a safe place, stay
there.
I received additional lectures for being a girl.
Watch out for roofies.
Don't accept a drink you didn't make.
Don't get so drunk that you aren’t in control.
We mostly followed his rules. Reid and I broke them on special occasions,
like our birthdays. We had gone to plenty of parties and had always been
safe. If we followed his rules, Ajax never gave us a hard time.
So, why was this suddenly a problem?
“Does it matter?” Tonight’s line of questioning was throwing me off. “We
go to parties all the time. We are careful. Reid hasn’t gotten out of line since
we were fourteen. I always keep him in check. Even if you don’t trust Reid,
I've never given you a reason to doubt me.”
Ajax tensed instead of acknowledging my words or agreeing with me.
What the fuck. What was that supposed to mean?
“You do trust me, don’t you?” I tried again for good measure.
Ajax remained quiet, eyeing me apprehensively. I said nothing more and
returned to cleaning up, feeling his eyes burning through me.
“Just come to my room when you get home. I’ll leave the door open.” Ajax
didn’t bother looking at me as he dismissively walked away.
Come to my room.
Those were the exact four words he uttered every night.
I used to love going to Ajax’s room and talking to him for hours. Now, it
seemed like a dirty request. It shouldn’t be. We had slept in his room
without having sex. I had my period earlier in the week. It lasted four days.
I wanted to abstain from sex while on my period. Ajax still instructed me to
come to his room. We watched movies and YouTube videos. He held me
and kissed me. It was wonderful.
However, that hunger of his returned on day three. He said he could no
longer hold out. We had sex in the shower and then on his bed after putting
down a towel.
Ajax’s insatiable appetite intimidated me. It frightened me when he acted as
if he couldn’t stop. The only times we didn’t have sex were when I was too
sore to continue. Otherwise, we’d probably have sex all the time.
I didn’t have prior friends-with-benefits experience—let alone a real
relationship—for comparison. I was friends with only one of Ajax’s ex-fuck
buddies, Alexa. If the situation weren’t so awkward, I’d ask her how often
they had sex during their arrangement because this didn’t seem normal.
Fuck. Why was I using the word normal? I was screwing my guardian while
my parents lived it up abroad. I should throw the word normal out of my
vocabulary.
Feeling heavy-hearted, I slowly walked to my room to get changed for the
party.
Last night, Reid and I stayed over at Janeen’s house. Reid was drinking.
Nothing too excessive. All the same, he passed out in the guest bedroom.
Pretty sure he also took one of his groupies in there.
I had no interest in interrupting their lovemaking or slugging home his
dead-weight body. I thought it was best to stay the night. I did the
responsible thing by texting Ajax.
Rave: We are staying over at Janeen’s.
Ajax: You assured me that I could trust you.
What the hell? Ajax told us to stay over if we were safe and had a few
drinks.
Rave: You can. Reid passed out in the guest room. I didn’t want to leave
him there.
Ajax: And which room are you sleeping in?
Seriously?
Rave: Janeen’s room.
No response after the last text.
This morning, we didn’t wake up until eleven a.m. After gathering our wits,
Reid, Janeen, and I walked to a nearby cafe. As we squeezed into a booth,
my phone alerted me of a message from Ajax.
Ajax: Meet me tonight at Sorento’s at 7:30 p.m.
I frowned, unsure what to make of the text. It wasn’t a question, but I
responded with—
Rave: Okay.
Sorento was a local restaurant we frequented. It was my favorite, and I
often went with Reid and Mia after school. I loved the food, the eclectic
decor, and the overall vibe. I had no idea why Ajax wanted to meet at
Sorento. It wasn’t like we could have sex at a restaurant.
It didn’t matter. Ajax didn’t leave room for discussions anymore. It was
never a request, always an order, like going to his room every night. It had
turned into an expectation.
It was our dynamic for years—Ajax deciding everything for me—but he
was never this invested before. It never affected me to this extent.
Something flipped in Ajax since we started a physical relationship.
Sometimes he was caring and sweet, like the old Ajax. At other times, I
walked on eggshells, scared to set off his new volatile anger. I found myself
doing whatever he wanted to avoid a fight or deflect his anger. Like his
personality, my attitude toward him was fleeting. There were times when I
was ecstatic to see Ajax. Then there were times when I avoided him out of
subconscious fear.
I wished he’d pick one personality and stick to it. This flip-flopping was
driving me crazy.
Ajax.
I was nervous as shit. Really fucking nervous.
Technically, this was our first date. It happened to be with one of my best
friends, and we’d already had sex. As a bonus, we lived together.
This was backward.
Fuck. I had no idea how to be romantic. I had never been someone’s
boyfriend or seriously dated anyone. Raven might be inexperienced in bed,
but I was inexperienced in this arena.
I was twenty years old and never had a girlfriend. Kind of fucking pathetic,
considering how early I started with my sexual conquests.
I wasn’t a commitment-phobe. There was never enough time with my
responsibilities and grueling academics. I also never met anyone who
intrigued me enough to bestow the title.
I had gone on dates before, but the first or second date was when I told
someone I didn't want to be in a committed relationship. We could date
casually or be friends with benefits as long as there were no expectations.
When I went off to college, I finally had the time—or at least enough free
time—for a girlfriend. This was thanks to Raven, who picked up the slack.
Once I did have time, I’d lost interest in other women. I pined after the only
girl I couldn’t have.
Since we started sleeping together, it had been highs and lows. At times, I
felt connected to Raven. She was the girl who was madly in love with me.
On other days, she was closed off.
Last week, I went to her room after finding out she had missed her dance
class. Out of nowhere, Raven came on to me and initiated sex. She looked
at me like I was all she needed. Afterward, I tried talking about us, and she
shut down.
I hadn't tried the conversation again. I realized it was a pointless discussion
anyways. Nothing could change between us until my guardianship was
over. After Raven graduated, we’d still face backlash from our families and
friends. However, if my legal obligations were done, we’d at least have a
leg to stand on.
In the interim, I shouldn’t be sleeping with the underaged girl I was
supposed to be caring for. I should feel like a piece of shit and put an end to
this relationship, but the truth was—I was all in. I’d known it since the day
we kissed, perhaps even before.
While I didn’t care anymore, it’d be hell for Raven and my siblings if the
word got out. They wouldn’t be able to deal with the taunting and the
gossip.
If we discussed our relationship, the only possible conclusion would be to
continue as-is for the next eight months. It was Raven’s senior year. She
might not want to experience her last year of high school dealing with the
hurdles of a taboo relationship. She might want to take a date to her senior
prom instead of dating the prom chaperone.
I couldn’t deal with that, nor could I change the circumstance. There was no
point dwelling on a sore topic. Raven didn’t like heavy or awkward
conversations, either. So, I simplified it. I was content being with her in any
way I could. I wanted to be with only her, and she wanted me, too. We
could have an understanding, even if we couldn’t acknowledge it at present.
After all, actions spoke louder than words. In that spirit, we could start by
doing things outside the bedroom. Activities that didn't raise suspicion.
Asher threw a party last night in celebration of our new app. It would have
been suspicious if I had taken Raven without Reid tagging along. I’d
planned to discuss it with her when Janeen’s party trumped me.
I couldn’t say no. I had set clear expectations for Raven and Reid and
allowed them reasonable freedom so long as they met them. I understood
early that telling a teenager no only ended with teen rebellion.
I was irritated as fuck over the situation. I didn't commit to plans because of
Raven. I stayed home, hoping she’d come home early. I was pissed when
she decided to stay over at Janeen’s. My jealousy came rushing back.
Fuck. All I felt lately was jealousy, possessiveness, and being out of my
mind. Last night, I couldn’t stop wondering who she was with and if horny
teenagers were making moves on her.
The reasonable side of me was happy she was safe. The caveman side
wanted to take a cab and drag her ass home. Except I couldn’t do that
without raising said suspicion.
I hadn’t seen Raven since last night. I spent the day meeting my group
about marketing strategies for our app. We launched it for beta testing and
were assessing the reception. I sent Raven a text in between my meetings.
Instead of being irrationally angry at her about a party, I needed to be
proactive. Before she could make other plans, I asked her to meet me for a
date. I made the arrangements—the nanny was staying over to watch Mia,
and I made reservations at Raven’s favorite restaurant. After dinner, we
were going to her favorite Fro-Yo place, though Raven would likely insist
on getting dessert at Sorento’s.
It was two minutes past 7:30 pm, and I was already impatient. Why was I
nervous? I lived with this chick.
Finally, I saw Raven walking through the restaurant door. Whenever I saw
that girl, the wind was knocked out of me. I always noticed her hair first.
With her pale complexion, her hair looked like the darkest shade of black.
My eyes landed on her generous lips next. They looked plump, kissable,
and bitable.
I was getting distracted again and needed to remain focused on the game
plan.
I put up a hand to wave, and our eyes locked. Electricity coursed through
me the moment we made eye contact, and everything else disappeared. Like
a social media filter, the background faded away, leaving us in focus.
Raven smiled shyly and sauntered over. She was in a casual Theressa
Beckett Special. The dress came to her thighs. Her four-inch heels
elongated her toned legs, making the dress seem shorter.
I loved the skin she was showing, but so did every asshole eyeing her like
she was on the menu. I wanted to stamp mine on her forehead so none of
them would dare look again.
I stood when she reached the booth.
“Hi.” Raven leaned over to peck me on the cheek.
“How are you?”
“Good.”
“Here.” I handed her a menu and led her inside the booth, sliding in next to
her.
“Mm. I am starving. What are you in the mood for?” Raven studied the
menu.
“I like the Southwestern Salads here. What about you?”
“They have the best Red Velvet Cake.”
This girl was ridiculous. “Are you going to even look at the dinner menu or
just order one of each dessert?”
Raven narrowed her eyes and mumbled, “I’ll get an appetizer.”
“At this rate, you’re going to be fat by twenty-five and have your first heart
attack by thirty. Death at thirty-five.”
“Meh. Gotta go some someday. It’ll be worth it.”
We both burst out laughing.
I. Fucking. Missed. Us.
Laughing, teasing, normal, and in sync.
“How about we make a deal?” Putting an arm around her and pulling her
close, I said, “I’ll live in denial that you’re digging yourself to an early
grave if you eat something healthy and green first. Afterward, you can have
all four desserts on the menu. I’ll look the other way and pretend you’ll be
alive to see Mia graduate college.”
This won me a belly-aching laugh with her hair falling forward.
“Deal!” Raven handed the menu back to me. “Here. Choose something for
me, and then I want all the desserts.”
“Yes, Ma’am.” Shaking my head, I put our menus down. This was normal.
If Raven was unsure about a decision or didn’t care enough to make one,
she asked me to make it for her.
I ordered two salads and all four desserts when the waiter came for our
order. He looked at me quizzically. He was about to tell me he’d ask about
dessert after dinner, but I held up my hand to stop him.
“I have to order dinner and dessert together; otherwise, the lady won’t be
happy.” I motioned toward Raven, who flashed her pearly whites to the
waiter.
Raven insisted that dessert be ordered at the same time as dinner. If we
didn’t, she’d refer to The Incident of 2012. None of us wanted a repeat.
A couple of years ago, we went to a fusion restaurant. Raven was excited to
try their extensive dessert menu, but the service was extremely slow. By the
time we finished dinner, no one, other than Raven, was in the mood to wait
another forty-five minutes for dessert.
Raven pouted all the way home and kept throwing daggers at us with her
eyes. Very little could bring that girl down, but the lack of sugar would do
it. She barely spoke for two days, freezing us out. It drove us crazy.
I shook my head as the waiter grabbed the menus and refilled our water.
“How was the party last night?”
Raven visibly tensed at my inquiry. “It was fine,” she mumbled vaguely.
I could feel her pulling away. This was ridiculous. I didn’t bring her here to
interrogate her. I wanted us to have a good time and changed the direction.
“Cool. How are your sketches going? Draw anything exciting lately?”
“Yes! I started a rough draft today.” Raven’s eyes lit up. She delved into a
series of ideas for a new outfit. She spoke animatedly about a reversible
dress so people could have two outfits for the price of one.
As dinner was served, she inquired about Columbia and the new app. Some
people had a way with words, while others had listening skills. Raven had
both. She listened attentively as I spoke of our app, interjecting at the right
moments to ask insightful questions.
Once we dug into dessert, her face suddenly turned ghostly pale. Raven
jerked out of the arm I had around her.
“Rave, are you okay?”
Not understanding the turn of events, I followed her gaze. She was staring
at a family—mom, dad, and two teenage daughters. Twins.
“I go to school with them.”
Before I could respond, they spotted Raven and started walking over.
“Hey, Rave!” one of the twins said in a singsong voice.
“Umm. Hey guys. Wow, what a coincidence.”
“Raven. Hello there!” exclaimed a middle-aged lady I presumed was the
twins’ mother. I recognized her from a PTA meeting.
“Hi, Mrs. Alpert.” Raven stood to air-kiss her cheek. “This is Mrs. Alpert.”
Raven motioned at the woman to introduce us. “And this is my— this is
Ajax. He i-is—” Raven stammered for an appropriate title. “He is Reid’s
brother.”
That’s what I had been reduced to? Reid’s brother?
I stood to shake hands. The dad gave me a once-over. “Yes, I remember
meeting you.”
“That’s right. I saw you at one of the PTA meetings, and I think we
chaperoned a school dance together.” I couldn’t place them, to be honest,
but Wellington had a strict rule about parents and guardians being involved.
Parents must chaperone twice a year and attend four PTA meetings. It was a
safe bet I had met them at one of those events.
“Maybe.” Mr. Alpert scrunched his face in concentration. “But I also know
your family as well as the Becketts. John and I did our residencies
together.”
“You did? You know Uncle John and my dad?”
“Yes. When John moved here, he knew my girls attended Wellington.
Before Raven started school, he called so the girls could look out for her.
That’s how they became friends.” He looked from his daughters to Raven
for confirmation. They nodded in agreement.
“Mr. Alpert and Uncle Reese worked together when they first moved to
New York. Small world,” Raven chimed in.
“That’s right.” Mr. Alpert smiled kindly. “You know, before leaving for
Doctors Without Borders, John told me he only accepted the position
because you agreed to take care of Raven. Later, he told me how you
became Raven’s legal guardian. That’s such a wonderful thing you did,
young man. Especially while you’re in school yourself. Raising teenagers
and attending Columbia is no easy task. I couldn’t have done it.”
Raven turned beet red at the reminder. I could barely mutter a thank you.
We had been reminded of our cruel reality, and I could already see the
wheels turning in Raven’s head.
That’s how the world saw us—me raising her as if she were my kid. If I
threw my arm around her now or kissed her, all those praises would turn
into disdain. Disdain over taking advantage of the daughter Uncle John
trusted me with.
Luckily, the hostess came over to show the Alperts to their table. Raven
kept glancing at them after they were seated, barely saying another word.
This night was shot to hell.
“Should I get the check?” I asked.
I could feel my self-loathing return. Even as it did, it changed nothing for
me. I eyed Raven apprehensively, needing the same confirmation from her.
“Yeah,” was all Raven managed in her small voice.
After grabbing the check, we strolled home quietly. I nixed the plan for FroYo. She wasn’t in the mood. I could feel the over analyzation resonating
from her and refused to give her space or pull away.
Opening the door to the house, I let Raven in first. Before she could bolt, I
grabbed her elbow and whispered, “I’m going to check on Mia. Come to
my room after you change.”
Raven froze. I was terrified of her saying no. I wouldn’t be able to deal with
it if she shut down right. I needed her and couldn’t breathe without her.
My fingers dug into her elbow to communicate the seriousness of the
request. My stern glare was meant to add intimidation. I didn’t care if my
intensity freaked her out or if she had no choice in this matter, because right
now, she didn’t.
Raven winced slightly before finally giving me a nod. Without looking in
my direction, she raced to her room.
Lesson learned. If she were going to shut down every time we faced our
reality, then I’d limit the reality. If she was only compliant inside the home
perimeter, here’s where we’d stay.
I’d let her live in denial if she was ashamed of this relationship. If that’s
what it took to keep her, we didn’t have to talk about us. We didn’t have to
talk about anything anymore until things could change down the road.
This was torture for me, but I could take anything as long as I could touch
her, feel her, smell her, hold her, and be inside her.
I needed her like I needed air, and that’s something I couldn’t risk losing.
Raven.
I ran to my room and shut the door. My life was a mess, and I needed to talk
to someone. Preferably an adult instead of an immature teenager.
I opened my laptop to launch Skype in hopes of speaking to my parents.
The absentee parents were my last resort because I was sleeping with the
only “present” parent I had left.
Sex might provide us with temporary oblivion, but the self-loathing to come
after doesn’t. The physical aspect was fantastic with Ajax. Everything else
felt wrong. What seemingly started with helping Ajax alleviate his anxiety
and comfort me about my missing parents had morphed into something
ugly, one I didn’t know how to back out of.
Ajax dictated my life without leaving room to choose otherwise. I
compartmentalized as much as I could, but the divider walls were
crumbling—the ones separating my thoughts into different boxes.
We went to Sorento’s last weekend. We couldn’t grab a measly dinner
without a rude awakening of our reality. We ran into my school friends,
along with their parents. Of course, they knew of our situation and praised
Ajax for raising me. Mr. Alpert’s words were mortifying.
“Raising teenagers and attending Columbia is no easy task.”
I couldn’t hide from the shame. Ajax was fucking me while raising me. I
couldn’t comprehend how he acted so normal about this. When we were in
public, it was like we were nothing. He barely acknowledged me anymore.
The moment everyone was out of earshot, it was the same every night.
Come to my room.
I. Hated. Those. Words.
Recently, those were the only words he uttered to me. It made me feel like
his cheap whore. Other than those words, we never conversed, and I missed
the old Ajax so damn much.
I missed my friend.
Whenever we were alone, Ajax grabbed me and fucked me until late at
night. He was always on a mission to make me come. By the time the
exhaustion from the orgasms took hold, I’d be fast asleep. It was the same
every night.
Yesterday, after hours of sex, he finally said something different. Something
that annoyed me more than him not talking to me.
Reid and I planned to go to a friend’s birthday this weekend. We let Ajax
know days ago, and he was okay with it. Last night, he changed his mind
about me going.
Reid and I planned on staying over at our friend’s place. Mia also had a
sleepover. When Ajax realized the house would be empty, he decided I
could no longer see my friend on her birthday, prompting me to tell Reid I
had too much homework. I didn’t.
Ajax was boxing me in, and there was not a thing I could do about it. I
didn’t hold any power in this situation and had to do as he said. He often
got angry if I countered with a different option. His fuse was so short
nowadays that I was constantly on edge. I wasn’t allowed to voice an
opinion over the progression of this situation.
It was so damn frustrating.
Then Ajax decided to sprinkle romance on top of this mindfuck.
Tonight, he cooked dinner for me—lasagna, my favorite. He also ordered
my favorite desserts and set up a romantic ambiance, completed with
background music.
I didn’t know how to take any of this. He wanted to fuck me all the time,
every second we were alone. He fucked me until neither of us could breathe
or move from exhaustion. He took away the most cherished aspect of our
relationship—our conversations. He never wanted to talk to me, yet he left
no room to breathe or talk to anyone else.
Then he threw a romantic gesture my way.
Was that my consolation prize for putting up with this shit?
Ajax made the decisions in my life. He was the experienced one, so why
hadn’t he disclosed more on the topic? He had provided me with no
explanation as to why he was pursuing a sexual relationship with me. His
confident approach to what we were doing continuously made me doubt my
sanity.
As soon as dinner ended, I told him I had a Skype call scheduled with Dad.
He didn’t argue. Thank God for it because I needed to talk to my parents. I
needed advice and direction from an adult.
I didn’t have to tell them what was going on with Ajax. I could keep it
vague, tell them I was having boy problems. I just needed to hear their
voices.
It was ten p.m., which meant it was four a.m. in Paris, and five a.m. in
South Africa. Shockingly, both of my parents were up at this ungodly hour.
Mom was likely leaving a glamorous party, and Dad was waking up to start
his shift.
Needing to talk to someone coherent, I Skyped Dad. After three missed
Skype calls, I tried his phone, which was still forwarded to his virtual
assistant.
“I am so sorry. Mr. Beckett can’t come to the line,” she informed.
“Oh, okay. Can you tell him that I need to talk to him? It’s urgent.” I was
falling apart and hoped she could hear the desperation in my voice.
She was quiet for so long that I worried she disconnected the phone. “Let
me page him and see what he says. What’s the best call-back number?”
She should have my number, considering how many messages I had left. He
should also have his only daughter’s phone number. Regardless, I left my
number and hung up.
I waited for a call. Nothing.
I tried Mom next. I called her phone while changing into my sleeping gear.
No response.
Finally, I heard my phone ding—a text from my mom.
Mom: Can’t talk right now, darling. Busy. I’ll call when I am free.
Busy meant getting drunk with celebrities at a fashion show after-party. Not
surprisingly, Mom didn’t ask why I had called so late.
I needed my parents. Not in a few minutes, not when it was convenient for
them, not when they were ready to face me. I didn’t care about their
heartbreaks, their dreams, or their insecurities. I wanted to be selfish. I
needed them to put me first.
I stared at my phone, willing it to ring. No call or text came through.
Minutes passed by before I blinked away the tears.
I was alone in this world. Generally, I didn't mind being alone. I enjoyed my
space. Being creative. Doing things only I liked. However, I hated feeling
lonely, having no one to talk to or bare my soul to. I loathed it with all my
might.
Suddenly, I was the same thirteen-year-old girl who moved to New York.
Lost. Sad. Lonely. As usual, only one person was here with me.
Leaving my useless phone behind, I strode toward Ajax’s room.
“Is everything okay?” he frowned. Surely, he could tell from my expression
that I was on the verge of tears. He jumped out of his desk chair and pulled
me into a hug.
Ajax closed the door and lifted me. He sat on the bed with me on his lap as
I nestled into his warm hold, silently seeking comfort on his large chest.
“Your dad didn’t pick up,” he guessed. “Do you want to talk about it?”
“No,” I responded harsher than intended.
Ajax looked surprised by my tone but quickly masked his expression. “It’s
okay,” he said quietly. “I understand. I won’t push you.”
He understood why I couldn’t talk about my parents. I didn’t need them.
Despite our new dynamic's shortcomings, I was glad Ajax was here.
Otherwise, I’d be completely alone. I sought parental guidance tonight. I
found it from the only man who was always here.
Ajax. Of course, it was fucking Ajax picking up the pieces after my
shithead parents.
Right now, I didn’t care if things changed for the worse between us or if
Ajax didn’t open up to me anymore. I couldn’t bring myself to care if this
was wrong or if Reid might be pissed. I wouldn’t even care if Mr. Alpert
and his family were to walk in, gasping in disgust.
I. Didn’t. Care.
I didn’t want to be alone anymore. I was tired of being alone. Ajax and his
electrifying touch could make my loneliness go away. My body had
instinctively learned to react positively to him. I was putty in his hands as
soon as he touched me. Maybe it was because he was my first. I was sure
initial sexual experience defined what we liked in bed.
Or maybe it’s because it was Ajax. I might be new to this, but I was
experienced enough to recognize that he was incredible in bed. I was glad
to have him as my guide into the sexual realm.
Ajax was shirtless with a pair of sweatpants that hung low. His chest was
warm, perfectly golden tan, and smooth with few hairs. I placed my palm
on his chest. He was beautiful, like a sculpture, and I wanted to touch him
everywhere.
The way Ajax watched only encouraged me. Flicking my tongue out, I
licked him from his pectoral muscles and lowered to my knees to lick his
six-pack. I traced his perfect V with my fingers before running my tongue
over it.
Grabbing hold of his sweatpants, I slid them down. My fingers closed
around the base of his thick shaft, and when I saw a drop of precum, I
leaned over instinctively to lick it off.
“God,” he mouthed, looking in agony from the slow burn.
My thoughts, the previous meltdown, and the feelings of rejection faded
away. Feeling wanted, admired, and confident, I leaned over for long slow
licks, using both my hands to grasp him from the base. I stroked while
sucking him off until I felt his erection straining. Rising to my feet, I
wiggled out of my shorts.
Ajax grabbed me, pulling me closer to straddle him. He positioned me over
his length as my wet lips rubbed against him. Staring deep into his eyes, I
took hold of his dick. I wanted to be in charge, and from the looks of it,
Ajax didn’t mind.
I guided him inside, putting my hands on his shoulders to lower myself onto
his cock. I worked his hard length inch by inch, adjusting and rotating for
my pleasure.
“Oh, my God,” I panted.
“Fuck, baby.” Ajax put one hand around my waist to guide me, but I
brushed his hands off. I wouldn’t let him control today’s session.
Instead, I guided his hand to my clit, so he could rub the right spot while I
rocked against him. My body clenched, his dick throbbing and pulsing
inside me.
“Raven, I want to hear you come,” he said, out of breath, taking my lips
between his teeth.
“Then don’t stop.”
My eyes were unfocused, hands clamping as Ajax increased the tempo on
my sensitive spot. I rode him until my body could no longer hold off. I dug
my nails into his chest as I convulsed, sobbing in elation.
“That’s it, baby. Come for me,” he murmured. Both his hands landed on my
hips to ground me further, extending my orgasm.
“Ajax, oh God,” I cried out.
Ajax railed into me, thrusting his dick upward. My moans brought on his
climax. Grabbing my hair, he let go with a shout, “Fuck, Rave.”
My face landed in the crook of his neck. A few moments later, Ajax lifted
me slightly to pull out. I was unaware of being carried as he gently dropped
me on the bed. He moved to my side and pulled me into a spooning position
before drawing the comforter on us. When awareness returned, I found his
head resting against my neck.
“That was amazing,” he murmured with eyes closed.
He was right.
Maybe I was acting like a horny teenager, but I had never experienced
something so powerful and mind-numbing. It stopped my worries, my selfesteem issues, and my abandonment issues.
What we were doing was wrong and immoral and would destroy our lives if
we were found out. It was probably illegal, too. I couldn’t imagine the law
allowing foster fathers to sleep with their wards; technically, that was
Ajax’s role in my life. There was a daunting expiration date looming over
our heads. Not to mention, my complicated feelings over how Ajax had
been treating me as of late.
Nonetheless, I couldn’t deny Ajax’s words. Sex between us was amazing. It
had become mind-blowing.
Downright addicting.
I tightened my hold around the quilt me as I browsed online. Loud voices
drifted through the hardwood floors above my head. Reid and Mia were
chatting with their cousins, excited to catch up.
Ajax rented a car to visit Delaware and New Jersey for a Sinclair family
reunion weekend. His uncle lived in New Jersey and hosted the first night,
while his aunt lived in Delaware and opted to host the dinner tomorrow
night.
Ajax’s uncle was a sworn bachelor with a big home and no family to fill it
with. So, he offered his house to the out-of-towners driving in for the
occasion. I volunteered to sleep downstairs, which was far more private.
The couch in the basement was comfortable, and there was Wi-Fi to keep
me entertained. Ajax refused to leave me behind in New York, but I wanted
to allow the Sinclairs an opportunity to catch up with their family.
I mindlessly surfed social media, but nothing caught my attention. What
finally caught my attention was the creaking of the steps leading to the
basement. I realized someone was descending the stairs.
I froze, fingers wrapped around the edge of my blanket, as Ajax hopped off
the last step and came into view. My head inadvertently tilted to see if
anyone else followed him.
He paused, craning his neck as if searching for someone. The basement was
dimly lit, and I was off to one corner. Ajax twisted his body, his eyes finally
landing on me. I almost jumped from the intensity he wore, impatience
written in his fibers.
“Rave.” His voice was deep and warm, mixed with relief. His eyes scanned
my tank top, the only part of me visible as the quilt covered my lower half.
Underneath, I wore my usual sleeping gear—shorts and a tank top—while
Ajax hadn’t changed out of his gray t-shirt, hoodie, and dark jeans.
“Ajax, what are you doing down here?” I whispered, ripping my eyes away
from his flexing biceps as he crossed his arms over his chest.
We hadn’t had much interaction tonight. Ajax’s uncle rented a private room
in a restaurant for the reunion. It was a ploy to confine the younger
members safely while the older generation drank at the bar. They dragged
Ajax along. Even from a distance, I noticed a few friendly women
approaching him at the bar. The guy I was sleeping with was being blatantly
hit on, as it often happened with Ajax, and I had no idea how to feel about
it. However, I knew enough not to bring it up, as it wouldn’t be a
conversation he’d entertain.
Making his way to the couch, Ajax sat next to me. I sat cross-legged with
the computer on my lap, a quilt draping over my body.
“Share your blanket with me.” Ajax tugged at the throw as I set my laptop
on the coffee table. “Come here,” he ordered, opening his arm with an
invitation to cuddle.
My gaze shifted to the staircases, and I shook my head in mortification. He
was insane. Anyone could walk down those stairs.
Ajax closed his eyes as if reigning in frustration. “Rave… I’m tired. I can’t
do this right now. For God’s sake, just come here.”
Taking in his swollen eyes, I reluctantly scooched. Ajax wasted no time
wrapping his arm around my middle to drag me closer until my legs and
thighs were on his lap. He readjusted the throw, so we were both under it in
an unbelievably compromising position.
Ajax contentedly dug his nose into my hair. “Much better,” he murmured,
his lips lingering on my pulse.
My breath hitched when he kissed my neck, eyes drifting to the stairs.
“Ajax—”
He tilted his head, catching my lips with his. Ajax groaned, and his tongue
lewdly stroked against mine in an instant, hand squeezing my breast to set
everything ablaze. His cock jerked against my ass. The hand on my breast
shifted to my thighs, pressing them down so he could ground his dick
against my pussy from underneath.
There was no guesswork needed about what he wanted.
“Ajax, they’ll hear us.” I leaned away from him, but Ajax followed me to
get me on my back. I pressed a hand on his chest to keep him at bay.
This situation was turning riskier by the day. We were living on the edge.
Our dirty secret might come out any day to taint the lives of everyone we
knew and loved. Ajax seemed to have foregone his usual self-control, but
one of us had to start making better decisions.
“We’ll be quiet,” he said unconvincingly, desperation pounding through
him.
It had been a couple of days since we were together. I knew from
experience that he wouldn’t settle for an easy fix. It’d be rough and loud
despite his cousins, aunts, and uncles mingling in the living room above our
heads. Their voices carried down the stairs, the sound mixing with our harsh
breaths.
“We can’t,” I said hoarsely, though I recognized the look on his face. One
that indicated he was too far gone and unable to focus on anything else.
“Can’t wait, Rave,” he countered in a strangled voice. His hand slid to my
inner thighs to part them. He rubbed his palm against my clit, and his dick
throbbed underneath me. The double assault had my head spinning. His
heart slammed under my palm, resting on his chest, and I knew he could
feel the throbbing ache of my pussy.
“Not here. Anyone can walk in,” I protested.
Ajax blew out a relented sigh against my cheek, barely rasping out, “The
car. It’s parked in the driveway.”
I didn’t argue, knowing it was the safest of the two. It was dark out, and no
one would hear us unless we were screaming our heads off.
“Okay,” I said quickly to remove us from the situation. “Let’s go through
the basement.” I barely nodded at the basement door when Ajax yanked the
quilt off me and threw me over his shoulders like a sack of potatoes.
“Ajax!” I hissed in warning. “Put me down.”
He ignored me, charging the door with only one mission in mind. Opening
it with force, he practically sprinted to the car parked at the end of the
driveway.
I vaguely lifted my head to watch him pull out the keys from his pocket. He
flung open the door to the back seat before throwing me inside. The leather
seat was cold, but I couldn’t focus on the temperature with Ajax taking off
his hoodie and climbing in. I scooted back instinctively, but he grabbed my
arm and pulled me to his lap, facing away from him. I stared out the console
window, heart careening at his low grumble.
Lifting me slightly, Ajax yanked my shorts and panties down enough to feel
me raw. His hand slid inside.
“Oh, God,” I moaned lowly, my eyes fluttering.
Ajax groaned when he felt my wet folds welcoming him in. My head
almost hit the car’s roof when he unbuckled his jeans, one hand between my
thighs while the other pushed his jeans and boxers down. His pulsing cock
slid between my thighs as he shifted me into position, ripping another moan
out of me.
“Move your head back. I want your lips.”
Distracted, I leaned into the hollow of his neck and turned to face him. Ajax
took my lips insatiably, sucking on my tongue as he forced his cock inside
me.
“Mmhmm,” we moaned into each other’s mouths simultaneously.
He held me with a hand wrapped around my middle. His other hand parted
my folds, circling my clit unbearably slowly as he pounded into me from
behind. I rocked against him, barely able to breathe between his cock
stretching me and his vulgar tongue ravaging my mouth. My walls
squeezed as his fingers identified a spot that had me clenching. I tampered
down to hold off just as Ajax rolled his hips.
Unable to take it, I ripped my mouth off his, struggling to breathe. An earthshattering climax rippled as he palmed my swollen cunt, and I parted my
lips to scream. Ajax slapped a hand over my mouth while I rode it out, my
soaking wetness between us.
I blacked out, head landing in the crevice of his neck, whimpering. Tears
leaked out as I stared at the roof of the car. It was dark while Ajax kneaded
my tits and growled his climax.
“Fuck, yeah.” He latched onto the back of my neck to muffle his sounds,
making me yelp. I bit my bottom lip as Ajax thrust up again to take me any
way he saw fit. Ajax spread my legs wider and kept ramming into me until
he emptied himself.
We sat in that position for God knew how long, unable to move or speak.
His face was buried in my hair while my head was knocked back against his
chest. Limbs numb and aching.
Sex with Ajax had changed me. My brain screamed that we were crazy to
think we could keep this up. Yet, every fucking time—no matter how many
times we did it—it was always the same. Earth-shattering and never
enough.
OCTOBER 2015.
I was a crazy person. I was sure of it. My head felt like it was
being fucked with, though it was my body taking the fucking. Sometimes, I
wondered if everything happening with Ajax was a part of my delusions.
There was no way it could be real.
Ajax acted calm and collected in front of others. We still had movie nights
and family dinners. The other day, he went to my PTA meeting. He dutifully
met with my teachers and asked my counselor questions about my chances
for FIT. Then he took me home for an "afternoon delight." He could turn it
on and off while I was drowning and going insane.
Now I was reminded that it was real and not part of my imagination.
I was in the hallway leading to Ajax's room. I slept in his bed last night and
only wore one of his oversized sleeping shirts. I was in the process of
sneaking back when Mia appeared out of nowhere.
"Mia." I jumped, caught off guard.
"Hey, Rave. What are you doing?"
I was dumbstruck. What am I doing? I wasn’t close enough to the hallway
bathroom door to use it as an excuse. Then again, I had a bathroom in my
room.
I had no idea how to explain it, so I tried the half-truth.
"Nothing. I was just saying bye to Ajax."
Ajax left for the weekend. I vaguely recalled being woken up at an ungodly
hour of the morning to be kissed goodbye. He was skipping his weekly
lectures to go out of town and meet with investors. The nanny was staying
here in his absence to take care of all household-related chores.
"Oh, okay." She eyed my shirt, or rather Ajax's shirt, and my bare legs.
"I’m going back to sleep. It's still early."
"Okay," Mia repeated.
She didn't believe me; I could see it in her eyes. This wasn't a close call. It
was the call—the wake-up call I had been anticipating.
Turning the corner, I rushed inside my room and shut the door. A bucket of
cold water had been dumped over me, dousing my libido. Unsure of what to
do, I spent the morning locked in my room. I needed to talk to someone
about this, but who?
I couldn’t talk to Reid.
I couldn’t talk to Mia.
Dad wouldn’t return my calls.
Mom barely texted me back.
I couldn’t talk to any of my school friends or family friends, either.
Ajax was entrenched in my life. Everyone knew how we were related. The
thought of anyone finding out about our intimate moments made bile rise in
my throat. As great as the physical connection might be, I could barely
admit it to myself. I'd be horrified if others found out. I couldn’t talk to
Ajax, either. Unless we were having sex, he was aloof. I had no idea how to
reach him anymore, leaving me feeling lonely.
I thought things might be different with my parents after the summer, but
they broke my heart all over again. Sex with Ajax had been filling the void.
It was a sickness I craved—attention from Ajax or my parents. As a result, I
had been overlooking my other concerns.
However, I could no longer ignore those concerns. I was lonely again, and
this time it was because of Ajax. I wanted things to return to how they were.
This relationship had run its course for me, but I had a feeling that wasn’t
the case for Ajax. He seemed insatiable, rougher, and hungrier each time we
were together. Marks and bruises were becoming more and more frequent
with every tumble.
My thoughts were interrupted by a knock. "Can I come in?" Mia peeked
through the door.
In all the time I had lived here, Mia had never asked permission to enter my
room.
She knows.
I didn't know what I'd do if she confronted me. "Of course," I said in a
small voice, bracing myself.
Mia was only thirteen. How much of this adult stuff did she understand?
I recalled myself at thirteen and realized Mia knew more than enough.
Many girls in my grade were already sexually active by then. New York
was the fastest city in the world, and the kids were just as fast.
"What were you really doing in Ajax's room this morning?" Mia got right to
the point.
"I told you—" I had barely started when Mia cut me off harshly.
"Stop lying, Raven!" Mia snapped.
My jaw dropped. For the second time, a Sinclair had spoken to me in a way
they had never done before.
"I know you and Ajax are hooking up." Lost for words, I stared at Mia, who
stumped me again by asking, "Are you guys fucking?"
My eyes almost bugged out. "What! Of course not," I replied without
hesitation. I had never lied to Mia before, but I was desperate.
Mia eyed me suspiciously, deciding if she should believe me. A thirteenyear-old was making me feel like I was on time out. "I came to your room
in the middle of the night, but you weren't there. I searched all over, then
heard your voice coming from Ajax's room. Ajax always makes a point to
keep the door open when you're in there. The door was closed, then I saw
you in Ajax's shirt. You do know that I'm a teenager, right? We understand
these things."
Yes, I was aware.
I remember my freshman year of high school. Girls were having sex like it
was a regular part of dating. The movie, Thirteen, was a relatively accurate
depiction of how much thirteen-year-olds understood. It made the situation
mortifying.
She heard me. She heard me while I was in his room, doing God knows
what at the time. Shame wasn't the only thing coursing through my veins.
Fear came next.
"What did you tell Reid?"
"Are you asking if I divulged my suspicions to him? I wouldn't do that."
I let out a sigh of relief. "Thank you," I managed to croak. "It's not what
you think."
"Did you sleep with Ajax?" she asked again.
Mia believed me to be a virgin. I was the one to give her a sex talk. Even if
she saw or heard me, it was believable that we had abstained from sex.
"I stayed in his bed a few times."
"But you didn't have sex."
"No." I averted my eyes and fixated on the closed door. I didn't know what
to say or how to explain, but Mia did it on my behalf.
"Rave, we all love you. My dad, my brothers, me, and even my sick mom.
When you joined our family, I was so excited that we finally became real
sisters. But I never thought you’d let something like a silly crush ruin this
family.”
Mia stared at me with utter disappointment and anger. I had seen her cut
down enough nannies who dared to walk through our doors and knew she
could be ruthless if properly motivated. She was well-spoken and could use
her words to her advantage. Mia had a fear of public speaking. In Ajax's
fix-it mode, he enrolled her in a Toastmasters for Kids. The organization
gave her fierce confidence and an extensive vocabulary. I never thought I'd
be on the receiving end of her sharp tongue or her fury.
I could deal with her words, but the look she wore... I couldn’t deal with it.
Feeling as if I had been struck, I whispered, "Please stop."
"No. You need to listen to what I have to say. I might be young, but I'm not
stupid. I get that your parents left you, but so did mine. I also had to grow
up. So, you can't use that card to get out of this."
I stared at her silently. Mia had already put a knife in my heart; she only had
to twist it.
Mia continued her tirade. "Ajax used to tuck me into bed. Once you moved
in, I often noticed you standing at the doorway to watch up. Reid used to
die of jealousy watching you stand there. He hated how you yearned for
Ajax’s attention."
I wasn't staring all those times because I yearned for Ajax's attention. I was
sad. Mia had someone who cared enough to tuck her in. I'd watch Ajax talk
to Mia. He'd ask about her day and what she learned in school. It made me
miss my parents and the good old days when they tucked me into bed.
Like the whole world, Mia misunderstood my feelings. She thought I had
an unhealthy obsession with Ajax. Or so I presumed, until she surprised me
with her perceptiveness.
"I knew you weren't staring because you were pining after Ajax. You were
sad about your parents and craved the attention Ajax gave us. You sought
him out because he was the last parental figure you had left.”
Mia’s insight shocked me. Being the youngest family member, she never
interfered with the ongoing family drama. I never realized she was so
observant.
“But Reid didn't see it that way. Jealousy changed him, turning him into a
different person. Angry. Always lashing out. Rebellious. He and Ajax used
to be so close, but they drifted apart. You and Reid are attached in a
codependent way. He doesn't know who he is without you, so he hates Ajax
for taking you away. You broke their bond."
My eyes snapped to Mia’s. She strode closer and sat in my desk chair.
"I knew it wasn't intentional. I just assumed you'd snap out of it and realize
Ajax is only a person, not this god you make him out to be. He was forced
into a difficult role and stepped up to the plate. We love him for it, but he
can't live up to your unrealistic expectations. Ajax can't replace your
parents, Rave.”
Her eloquent words stunned me. I didn't argue. Mia wanted her say, and I
owed it to listen without interruption.
She looked at me for a long while as if choosing her words carefully. Her
voice turned softer. It was so husky that I could barely make it out. “Ajax’s
just a boy a few years older than you. He thought a pretty girl liked him,
and he started liking her back. Reid thought he was losing you to Ajax. It’s
not surprising that they misunderstood the situation. They’re both clueless
when it comes to women. We have an insane mother. Neither of them has
had a healthy relationship with a woman. No one to set an example."
She was right on all accounts. I couldn’t believe she read the situation so
accurately. It sounded like she was the only one to see things as they were.
Despite her age, Mia was more mature than us. The rest of us are
emotionally stunted, constantly misreading signals or sending out mixed
ones, never having an adult to guide our emotional development.
Mia was an exception because she had Ajax.
"I don't know exactly when things turned for Ajax," she murmured. "He
masks his emotions so well that it’s impossible to know what he’s thinking.
I can read him at times because he raised me. It was clear to me that he was
attracted to you. I’d notice his eyes light up whenever you walked into a
room.”
This was news. I didn't realize Ajax's attraction was long-standing. He had
never indicated it.
Mia noticed my perplexed face and answered the unspoken question. "I
can’t comment on the depth of his attraction. I only know that he wants
you."
She swung in my revolving chair before standing to pace. Mia stopped to
pierce me with sad, blue eyes, looking ready to make up her mind. I waited.
"But you don't know what you want from Ajax." She narrowed her eyes,
some of her previous irritation returning. "So, why are you doing this,
Rave? You can date anyone. Ajax’s the only person Reid doesn't want to
share you with, not to mention how much it would hurt both of our families.
He’s your guardian, your parent on paper. Everyone we know will gossip
and tear our lives apart if this gets out. And if things don’t work out
between you two, it will tear this family apart, too. If you aren’t in love with
him, why the hell is this worth it?"
Now that Mia expected an answer, I was silent. I had no answer because she
was right.
"It's not," I admitted.
I took a deep breath, preparing my speech. I had to lie to Mia once more
because I couldn’t acknowledge the extent of our illicit relationship. I was
unsure if I could dodge her line of questioning as she caught me in a
compromising situation. I had to admit to some things while avoiding the
larger truth.
"You're right. The three of us are clueless about healthy relationships. But
you’re wrong about Ajax and me. Ajax was attracted to me, but it dissipated
over the summer. We had some misunderstandings before I left for Paris. I
won’t bore you with the details, but Ajax was upset that I left abruptly.
After I returned, he wanted us to work on rebuilding trust. We’ve been
having intense conversations about how to move forward, and we wanted to
speak without an audience. He has been closing the door so that we can
hash it out. We concluded that we were good friends, and it was misplaced
feelings."
"Are you sure?"
"Positive," I replied without hesitation. "This won’t affect our family, I
promise. You know how I calm Ajax when he gets anxious? He
misunderstood it for attraction. He got confused. Ajax is allowed to make
mistakes, too."
I never knew myself to be such a good liar. Though I was lying through my
teeth, I vowed to turn these lies into truths. I'll end it with Ajax the moment
he returns.
Mia's eyes softened, but her guard was still up.
I continued. "Come on, we all know Ajax only does the friends-withbenefits thing. That's so not my style." I used my hands animatedly to get
my point across. Hand gestures were valuable tools for winning arguments.
"But this morning—"
"I fell asleep in Ajax's bed. I know it's inappropriate, but you must know it's
innocent. We used to fall asleep in his bed when we were younger. Now that
we’re older, it's hard to remember the boundaries."
Mia glanced unsurely at my profile. I was hell-bound on convincing her
before she walked out of the door.
"Do you feel weirdness or tension when you see Alexa?"
"No, but—"
"Ajax and Alexa used to sleep together, and there’s zero weirdness between
them. Ajax and I didn't even do anything. I wouldn't do that to Reid." The
last sentence took all my soul to spit out. I was a horrible, despicable human
being.
"Okay, if you're sure things will return to normal," Mia said unsurely.
"It will," I asserted. "Mia, I'm a mess. All of us are fuckups except for you.
I'm sorry I slept in Ajax's room and crossed boundaries. And I'm sorry that I
made Reid angry by choosing Ajax over him. I'll make sure everything is
normal moving forward. Please don't be mad at me."
"You don't get it. It's not me you should be worried about."
"What do you mean?"
"Come on, Rave. Do you really not know?"
I dumbfoundedly stared at Mia as she further shattered my world with her
next bit of information. As if there weren't enough reasons, her news
hammered the nail into the coffin over why I should have never started
anything with Ajax, nor could it happen again.
Today was D-Day. Ajax was coming home.
I was back from school and waiting impatiently for Ajax. I had been
preparing my speech all weekend and didn't want to put it off any longer.
Reid wasn't home, and Mia was at a friend's house. It’s now or never.
Over the last few days, I had barely spoken to Ajax. He had been busy with
meetings and presentation prep, so the timing hadn't worked out between
my school, study groups, and dance classes. I dutifully dodged his text
messages, keeping replies short and cordial. I wanted to speak to him in
person, not over the phone.
Mia and I haven’t had more serious conversations since the confrontation.
As far as she was concerned, this matter was behind us. Despite the lies I
gritted out, I'd make it right.
I stared at the front door, willing it to swing open. As if on cue, it did. In
came all of Ajax's six-foot frame. He seemed tired with puffy eyes, but his
face lit up when he saw me. The smile was sincere. So much so that I
almost lost my nerve at the thought of disappointing him.
Then his eyes darkened as he took in my school uniform. It wasn’t different
than what I regularly wore. It was nothing over the top sexy, either, like the
outfit Brittany Spears made famous in her music video.
Nonetheless, he eyed me hungrily and charged toward me with dark energy.
I could feel his sheer want directed at me, ready to ravish, prepared to mark
me as his. Heat resonated through him as his desire engulfed and suffocated
the room.
Instinctively, I ran around the coffee table. "Stop."
He stopped. Ajax froze, surprised by my hostile tone. "Raven." He frowned.
"What's going on?" He stayed put, which was good. I needed distance to
have this conversation instead of being distracted by the physical
component.
I steeled my nerves and squared my shoulders. Instead of rambling, I
needed to get straight to the point. "This—this thing between us isn't
working. And right now, I don't want you coming any closer."
Ajax looked taken back and… hurt. Damn. I hated this. "What? What do
you mean?"
"Whatever was happening between us, it's over," I said determinedly.
"No, it's not." Ajax narrowed his eyes, his voice eerily steady.
I looked straight into his eyes, refusing to back down. "Yes, it is. We are
over."
"No, we most definitely are not." His voice rose as he enunciated each
word.
I stared at Ajax. I might not have all the experience in the world with men,
but I knew if one party wanted to end things, the other didn't have a choice
in the matter.
"Ajax. I-I um," I stammered. He always managed to make me feel like a
child. I took a deep breath. "We need to end it now before this gets out of
control. Mia suspects something is going on between us. She caught me
coming out of your room, and she can tell you want me. I convinced her it
was nothing, but it was too close of a call."
Ajax nodded, the severity of our situation setting in. "You’re freaking out
because Mia might know something."
"Of course, I’m freaking out over it. What kind of question is that?"
Ajax looked hurt. Again.
I hated this conversation so damn much, and it softened my tone. "It’s too
complicated. I don't want to risk what we have here. It's better if we go back
to how it was."
"I don't want to go back to how it was. I'll tone it down around Mia. We'll
be more careful from now on."
"No," I hurriedly countered as panic settled in. I wiped my clammy hands
on my skirt. He was making me feel like an insane person for making
rational decisions.
Ajax lifted a hand to run it through his hair, studying me suspiciously. "Is
this about something else? Did I do something wrong? I know I’ve been
away, but I tried to call and text as much as I could—"
"It's not that," I cut him off quickly. “It's nothing you did.” I couldn’t bear to
see the agony on Ajax’s face, but I had to stay on course. I didn't want to be
his fuck buddy. Why was that so hard to believe?
I looked around the room, praying for divine intervention to make him
understand. "Look, we tried the whole friends-with-benefits thing, but I
have outgrown it. You are one of my closest friends and legally my
guardian. We have to live in the same house, so let's be adults about this."
Ajax gaped at me like I’d lost my mind. "What the hell, Raven? Do you
think I risked everything to have a fuck buddy? You think that's what we
are?"
"Not anymore."
"This is not about sex," Ajax yelled. He breathed heavily to steady his
temper. He spoke in a lower but still angry tone. "Where the hell is this
coming from?"
I narrowed my eyes. Was he trying to pretend I was the most oblivious
person on earth? "You sleep around with your female friends. Then you
guys go back to being friends. The only type of relationship you do is
friends-with-benefits," I declared, throwing the condescending tone back at
him.
"You know about my past?"
"Everyone does."
Ajax stared at me for a long moment. "Yes," he started apprehensively, "I
did sleep with some of my female friends. Not all, but a few. I'm not proud
of it. They don’t have to be in my life if it makes you uncomfortable. I don't
want anything from them other than a cordial friendship."
"Why can't you extend the same respect to me?" I asked. "I would also like
the courtesy of a friendship."
"For God's sake, Raven, you are not my fuck buddy. I'm not that desperate
for sex. You’re the one who teases me about my groupies, remember? If
that's all I wanted, you must know I have other options." Ajax sounded
incredibly frustrated.
He looked into my eyes, piercing me with his green orbs.
"Rave, I'm sorry if I gave you that impression," he said softly. "You're not
my fuck buddy," he repeated. "You are just mine. I love you. I always have.
I’m so in love with you that it hurts. And you love me, too. You told me so
yourself. How can you compare what we have to those girls? You’re so
emotionally damaged that I don't know how to reach you sometimes. I
thought you understood how I felt." He shook his head. "I thought wrong."
It was my turn to gape at Ajax like he had grown three heads. I didn't have a
sensible comeback to his proclamation.
Ajax couldn’t love me. Not like that. It was impossible.
Mia's words came back to me. She said Ajax's attraction took root because
he thought I was into him. If I told him the truth, maybe his feelings would
fade, and we'd move on from this ugliness. We had to move on for
everyone’s sake.
" Ajax,” I spoke softly. “I have to be honest with you. This was a huge
misunderstanding. I'm not interested in you like that. I never was."
"I don't believe you for a second," he replied without hesitation.
He strode closer, reaching out for me. I stayed behind the round coffee
table, using the circle as leverage to move away from his grasp.
"Ajax, I made a mistake." I held up my hand, indicating for him to stay
away. "I-I gave the wrong impression. Everyone thought I had a crush on
you, but it wasn't the case. I never knew other people saw it that way. After
I returned from Paris, things got out of hand before I realized it. This was
all a miscommunication."
Even as I said it, it sounded insane.
Echoing my sentiments, Ajax bellowed, "Are you fucking kidding me?" He
yelled so loud that it was pin-drop silent when his voice died away. "We’ve
been sleeping together this entire fall. You're telling me that was all a
miscommunication?"
Ajax glanced around manically, a tinge of desperation rolling off him. He
had no idea what to make of this. He walked around the coffee table to
reach me. Once more, I moved in the opposite direction, avoiding physical
proximity. I’d melt into him otherwise.
"Please stop. Let me explain."
"Okay." Anger spewed from his eyes as he stopped pacing. Ajax folded his
arms across his chest. "Please. Go ahead, explain," he said sarcastically.
Ideally, he'd be seated and calm while we spoke. Unfortunately, I didn't
have the luxury. I had to do this under Ajax's unnerving gaze and tense
posture.
"It was hard when my parents left," I started from the beginning. "They
deserted me, and I had no one. When you offered to take over my
guardianship, it meant the world to me. You meant everything to me."
Ajax's eyes remained unforgiving, face entirely void of expression.
"I wanted to do everything I could to help you. Reid and Mia were giving
you a hard time, and college was difficult. So, I picked up where I could to
make your life easier. I didn't want to be another chore for you. I wanted
you to be glad I joined this family and not regret your decision to be my
guardian."
Ajax appeared bewildered by my statements. "That never crossed my
mind."
"I know that now," I said. "I didn't understand it before. So, I'd follow you
around for an acknowledgment. I wanted to make you proud. You were my
hero," I said with a sad smile and quickly added, "You still are."
"Okaaay. Then what's the problem—"
"You're my hero because you are my guardian,” I whispered, eyeing him
tentatively. “That's how I see you. I didn't realize my looking for your
approval would make it seem I had feelings for you. I swear, Ajax. It wasn't
like that. It wasn't until Reid and Mia brought up—"
"Reid suspects it, too?"
"No!" I shrieked. I steadied my voice and gave my head a sharp shake.
"No," I repeated. "Reid's the one who made me realize my behavior was
inappropriate. I was trying to be helpful. In reality, I acted like a fool. I
assured him nothing was going on. Reid would hate me if he found out
otherwise."
I paced on my side of the table. I felt Ajax's eyes moving with me. I turned
to face him with a need to portray my sincerest remorse.
"Everyone thought I was infatuated with you. Reid and Mia suspected the
same and pointed out that I was sending mixed signals. I had no idea how
other people saw it. That's why I left for Paris. I thought I was embarrassing
myself and wanted to learn how to behave appropriately."
"Fine. You can make an excuse about your innocent gestures coming off as
something more. Mixed signals. But there were no mixed signals while we
were having sex."
"Ajax, I didn't—" I trailed off, unsure how to explain it. "When I returned
from Paris, you seemed so sure and confident about what we were doing. I
didn't know what to do."
"Let me get this straight. You realized you were giving off mixed signals
and ran away to Paris. After returning, you slept with me to fix the mixed
signals you were giving off?"
He was right. Who in their right mind would do that, then let it go on for so
long? I tried to explain it anyway.
"That first time we did it, you had a panic attack. You said you needed me. I
went along with it because I love you, but I thought it was a one-time thing
—"
"And all the other times?"
"I just—I don't know how things got so out of control. I know it's
frustrating to hear. I'm sorry for being such a mess."
"You told me you loved me on the night of your birthday party," he
muttered.
"And I do. I love you. Just not in that way. I later realized you might have
misunderstood me. I thought you were sending me to Paris to shake off this
crush, which I didn't even have."
"We kissed that night. Did you mean that differently, too?"
"What? We didn't kiss the night of my party." I frowned. I didn't know what
he was talking about.
His eyes roamed my face. "I came to your room to talk to you. Then we
kissed."
I was stunned. Then came the shame. He was going to hate this next part.
"Shit, Ajax. I was really drunk. Plus, Reid and I got high." I lowered my
eyes. "I'm sorry. I don't remember us kissing."
"What the hell, Raven!" Ajax blew up. "You promised me you'd never get
blackout drunk. You promised to be safe. I let you drink wine at home. I let
you drink at parties. I let you stay out. I give you so much freedom. I want
to trust you, but you keep breaking my trust. Getting trashed. Smoking pot.
Boys in Paris. What if someone took advantage of you in that state? Did
you consider the consequences of your actions?"
"See, right there. Reason 101 why this doesn't work. I can't have an honest
conversation with you. The lines between being a parent and a lover are
severely blurred. You can't fuck me one minute and lecture me the next
about drinking and smoking pot."
We glared at each other, but I gave in first.
"I'm sorry. You are right. Those weren’t safe choices, and I shouldn't have
done those things. It doesn't change the matter at hand. You are one of my
closest friends. I should've been more upfront. I'm sorry. I didn't mean to
hurt you. I never want to lose you. I would like for us to go back to being
friends."
"No," he said definitively.
"Ajax, you can't say that."
Ajax's eyes were hard with defiance. "I can."
"Ajax, please."
He eyed me but said nothing more. Turning his back, Ajax started toward
the door.
"Ajax, please don't be angry. Don't leave like this." I followed him,
desperately trying to make him understand. “Please. I’m sorry. I am so
sorry.”
Ajax opened the door before I could reach him.
"Ajax, please!" I yelled as panic settled in. He was leaving me! I had lost
him.
Ajax didn't respond as he slammed the door, leaving me in a world of tears.
NOVEMBER 2015.
Raven.
The last few weeks had been the worst of my life. I had signed up
for more study sessions than ever before, trying to keep busy. Wellington
was one of those pretentious prep schools that allowed students to grow at
their pace. This meant we could get ahead of the syllabus if we so pleased
and be done with our school year earlier than scheduled. I was done with all
my electives and cores. I could do a remote internship in Paris next
semester and still graduate on time.
The thought was tempting. I was starting to feel out of my mind in New
York City and this house. I needed to get away for the sake of my sanity.
It had been a couple of weeks since the big blowout with Ajax. He walked
out and hadn't returned since. After he left, Ajax started a text thread with
all three of us, making up an excuse for having to stay on campus for the
next few weeks. Then he called the nanny to extend her stay. Ajax gave the
nanny specific instructions for things that needed to be done around the
house. He also made her check up on Reid, ensuring he was home by dinner
time on weekdays to finish his chores and schoolwork. Ajax had kept an
eagle eye on his brother and sister from afar.
I naively assumed Ajax would return home sooner than later. Imagine my
surprise when I learned that Uncle Reese and Tessa were returning from the
Cayman Islands. Ajax called Uncle Reese, saying he was overwhelmed
with school and the new business. He had never asked Uncle Reese for
help. Uncle Reese requested a leave of absence and took the first flight
home. They'll be here for the month, and Ajax isn’t coming back anytime
soon.
Ajax still stopped by Mia's school on select days to walk her home or take
her out for a milkshake. She also received daily phone calls from him, as
did Reid.
I did not.
No calls. No texts. No responses to my calls or texts.
The first week after he left, my heart gave out whenever the phone rang, a
text alert went off, or I heard the door, thinking it was him. I was even ready
to sit through one of his endless lectures about drinking and safety.
I couldn’t take the radio silence.
Why was it so unforgivable to want our old relationship back and for things
to return to how it was? Given our relation to one another, Ajax must've
known there was an expiration date to our illicit affair. Still, I messaged him
many times, begging for forgiveness. He never responded unless it was
related to his responsibilities as my guardian or something to do with the
household. His messages were curt and to the point.
It seemed this had more to do with Ajax’s ego and pride than hurt feelings. I
didn't believe he loved me, as his actions had never hinted at it. Ajax was an
upfront guy. If he was interested in more than sex, he had plenty of
opportunities to voice it. Only after I ended things did he magically decide
he loved me.
I would have believed Ajax had he said those words earlier. Throughout our
short-lived “relationship,” he stopped talking to me; all he wanted to do was
have sex. We had no emotional connection. Was I supposed to believe sex
was love?
I couldn’t help but feel that Ajax thought of me as so desperate for love that
I'd have sex with him again if he said those words. His theory wasn’t
entirely unfounded. I gave up my virginity out of my love for him. Yet the
moment I couldn't give him what he wanted, I ceased to exist to Ajax.
This was so unfair. It wasn't my call to start a sexual relationship. Ajax
initiated it, so why was I being punished?
I hated it. I had been wallowing for weeks. I wanted to be angry at him, but
I couldn’t. No matter what, I could never hate Ajax.
-----------
I hated Ajax. There, I said it.
I never thought I'd think those words, but I did. I hated him.
It had been more than a month since Ajax walked out. I had hoped we could
fix things. Now, the hope had been replaced with anger. So much anger.
A few weeks ago, Ajax picked up Reid and Mia after school to take them
out for a family dinner. He conveniently chose a day when I had dance
class. The same thing happened a few days later. Then it happened again.
To not cause suspicion, Ajax started texting all three of us on our group
thread, intentionally suggesting hang sessions on days I had dance practice,
study sessions, or other commitments. I had no choice but to decline.
Soon, Uncle Reese joined these family dinners since this was the first time
he wasn’t actively working. The whole family, including Tessa at times,
now regularly got together. I was deemed too busy to attend due to an
overloaded schedule. Not only was Ajax ignoring me, but he was making
me feel left out of my family. He was alienating me, punishing me until I
realized my harsh truth—I had no one unless he allowed it.
Ajax’s claim of loving me was a joke. You don’t do that to someone you
love. Ajax wanted me for my body. Now that he had no more use for me, he
was getting back at me for hurting his pride.
Yet, I was currently decorating the house for Ajax's surprise birthday party
tomorrow. I was an idiot.
I was making the same mistakes I did with my parents—getting my heart
broken in exchange for crumbs of love. Except, it was worse with Ajax. My
parents were neglectful, but they didn't take anything from me. However, I
gave Ajax everything he wanted, and he left me the minute I put my needs
before his.
The first week Ajax left, I would have taken any opportunity to be around
him. To make him see reason. Apologize again and again. Based on how he
had been treating me over the last few weeks, I didn't want to be around
him anymore. The last thing I wanted was to attend his stupid birthday
dinner or the party afterward.
Yet, I put up decorations for the remainder of the night and stayed home
alone on a Friday for one more man who broke me.


Ajax.
I chugged the remainder of my beer and waited for the buzz. It didn't come.
This must be my fifth beer tonight, and my judgment remained unimpaired.
Asher should ask for a refund from the liquor store. If I couldn’t get tipsy at
this party, this would be even more insufferable than I had imagined.
Reid and Raven organized my twenty-first birthday party and put Asher in
charge of liquor since they needed someone over twenty-one to purchase it.
Asher failed at his job. This shitty alcohol was defective, failing to have me
buzzed.
The whole family, including my mother (shockingly), took me out for a
birthday dinner. They had been planning this surprise party for months,
scheduling an intricate family dinner beforehand to get me out of the house.
Afterward, my parents arranged to take Mia and stay overnight at the Plaza.
They gave us the place so it could be a proper rager. I knew about this party
before the big reveal. It was obvious. I should be thrilled, but I hadn’t been
thrilled for some time.
Last month, I went out of town for a few days. I never would've left had I
known how drastically things were about to change.
I was already out of my mind, missing Raven like crazy, by the time I
returned. Raven was finally coming around, being more open and even
initiating sex a few times. I thought we were on the same page until she
pulled the rug from under me.
Raven told me she wasn't interested in me. Sleeping together was a huge
misunderstanding. I was about to lose my mind.
That girl pursued me for years. Coming to my room, curling up in my bed,
always calling and texting me. For God's sake, who gave up their virginity
as part of a misunderstanding? None of it made sense. As if to twist the
knife, Raven said she didn't mean it when she said she loved me.
She decided it was over without so much of a discussion. I couldn't listen to
her anymore and walked away. Raven always needed time to process. It was
my turn. I had to cool off before doing something I’d regret.
Then it hit me. Raven was freaking out because of Mia's suspicions. I
should’ve shipped Mia off to boarding school when I had the chance.
Raven went in full denial mode, saying things to justify what had been
happening between us—even denying her proclamations of being in love
with me.
I decided to give her time to think about it and let her stew in her crazy
mind.
It was for the best. I was still worried about other guys with Raven, as my
trust issues hadn't evaporated. I asked Dad to come home for a month.
Between him and the nanny, I could watch her from a distance. From what I
heard, she hadn't been anywhere other than school, home, and dance
classes.
Not surprisingly, I received a steady stream of texts and calls from Raven. I
never responded unless they pertained to my responsibilities. I was letting
her miss me for a change.
Not the most mature way of dealing with things, but I didn't know how else
to make her see reason. No two people on this earth have had something as
undeniable between them. I figured that by my birthday, she'd get things
sorted in her head and conclude that we belonged together. She had to
because I couldn’t live like this anymore. I had suffered for years holding
back from Raven. I couldn’t do it again. I thought last summer without her
was terrible. After having her under me, last summer was child's play in
comparison.
I had been bunking with Brandon in the interim. Brandon wasn’t the kind of
guy who asked many questions. I had been skipping classes, drinking
heavily, and drowning in misery in his spare bedroom. Brandon didn't ask
what was wrong. It was precisely what I needed because I was in hell.
I meant it. This was—what I assumed—my hell would feel like. My mind
was continuously raging; my heart ripped out every minute of the day. A
party was the last thing I wanted after what I had been going through.
However, today was the day I planned to get answers. I needed to make
Raven face our reality.
Except, Raven had gone back to her personification of an ice princess. She
kept the conversations light throughout dinner, barely making eye contact or
acknowledging me. It was infuriating. It took everything to remain calm.
We returned to the house for a party I didn't want, with people I didn't care
to see. I kept scanning the rooms for her face, but she had made herself
scarce.
This party was wilder than usual because of Mia's absence. I was worried
about what Raven might be up to. Thoughts of drugs and Raven with other
men stirred my paranoia.
I didn't get the allure of these wild parties anymore. Beer pong. Keg stands.
Getting your dick wet.
Why would I shoot a ping pong ball in a cup to encourage another asshole
to drink? Why would I want someone to hold me upside down to drink
beer? And I didn't need to be at a grimy party to get a half-drunk chick back
to my place. There was only one person my eyes sought.
Raven had ruined me for other women. Even before we got together,
fucking other women was hollow. I couldn't get off unless I thought of her.
Empty fucks. At the time, I attempted to end my inappropriate feelings and
move on from the girl who lived under my care. Now, I knew there was no
one else for me. Other women ceased to exist the moment I was inside her.
However, the only person to hold my interest was nowhere in sight. It was
worrisome. Half the assholes here whipped their heads in Raven’s direction
the moment she walked in. They didn't try to hide their leering eyes, and I
could only stare down so many fuckers.
I wouldn't have these murderous urges if I could hold Raven’s hand or make
a public claim. These assholes would automatically get the message and
move on to the next unsuspecting prey. Even if I couldn’t make a public
claim, it would give me a sense of solace if I knew she was mine behind
closed doors. I didn't have that assurance anymore.
I needed to numb the agony. I needed a buzz to tolerate tonight until I could
talk to Raven and fix things between us.
Annoyed, I chucked the beer can in the trash and roamed the house. Since
Mia wasn’t here, we allowed the herd to party in the main area except for
the topmost floor where we slept. That was always off-limits.
My eyes searched for her once more when I heard the alert on my phone—a
text from Reid.
Reid: Met a college hottie. Going back to her place. I'll be safe. Have a
good birthday.
Ajax: Ok, be safe.
I shook my head at the phone. Reid followed the rules I set. He came home
on time on the weekdays and was honest about his whereabouts on the
weekends. As long as he followed the rules, I couldn’t stop him from
sleeping around. At least I gave him the sex talk. I had to trust that I did
right by him and he’d make good choices. God forbid the day came when I
had to deal with Mia doing this crap. I couldn’t fathom it.
Some of my anxiety returned as dark thoughts surrounding my siblings and
an uncertain future with Raven haunted my mind. She was my salvation,
my fighting chance against these thoughts. She was my drug of choice—a
pure addiction—and right now, I needed a hit. I needed to see her.
I zigzagged through the rooms to ditch the prying claws of interested
females offering themselves for birthday sex. Not interested. When would
they learn? I hadn't shown interest in any of them for months.
My eyes searched for someone else. Finally, I spotted Raven. She stood
outside the back entrance of the brownstone.
I took an uninterrupted moment to stare at her. I saw her only an hour ago,
but it still felt like the first time. She was stunning—the epitome of an erotic
Snow White. Her long jet-black hair hung low to her waist; her perfect, pale
skin was warm and flushed.
The thin straps of her black dress highlighted her narrow shoulders while
showing off a bit of cleavage. The dress stopped at mid-thigh. It could be
modest were it not for her high-heeled shoes. The five-inch red bottom
heels (no doubt another gift from Raven's absentee mother) propped up her
legs and ass, making the dress drip with sexiness.
She was gorgeous. The most beautiful woman I had ever seen. The most
beautiful thing on this planet. It was inhumane to stand here and not be able
to touch her.
I heard her soft laugh, and my heart lurched. She was talking to someone,
but I could only see her through the transparent screen door. The other
person stood outside my view, blocked by the wall.
I started toward her but froze in mid-step. A set of lips were on her, a hand
caressing her face.
What the fuck!
My legs carried me to the back entrance, swinging the door open with such
force that the screen almost broke.
"What the fuck are you doing?" I shouted in her face.
Raven whipped her head in my direction in shock. "Ajax—"
My hands were already in fists. I was about to kill the fucker who dared to
touch her when it hit me that it was none other than Asher fucking
Huntzberger.
Asher, who was a family friend and one of my best friends. Asher, who was
one of my business partners. Asher, who was my age and went to Columbia
with me.
"Shit, man. I'm sorry," Asher fumbled.
I grabbed Raven's arm, moving her behind me. I was going to kill Asher
and bury him six feet deep.
"Listen, man, I know she's like your little sister—"
I didn't let Asher finish. I lost it for two reasons. First, the obvious: his lips
were on Raven’s. Second, he called her my fucking sister.
Grabbing the cocksucker by his collar, I got ready to end him. Asher's eyes
were the size of saucers.
I blacked out as I threw punch after punch, whaling on Asher without
direction. My vision was blurred. Most of them probably landed due to the
blood on my fists.
I found Asher lying on the ground when my sanity returned. I only stopped
because Raven had wrapped herself around the front of my body. I wanted
to charge at him again, but she hugged my front and screamed. "Oh, God,
Ajax! Please stop. You're going to kill him. Are you fucking insane?"
"Yes," I shouted as I roughly grabbed her by the elbow and charged inside
the house.
A crowd had already gathered around a badly bruised Asher lying on the
ground. I saw a couple of our other friends coming to his rescue. There was
a first aid kit in the bathroom, or they could take him to a hospital. I didn't
care.
Mia and Raven were off-limits to these hounds. Everyone knew it,
including Asher. They were told long ago; this was how it would end if they
ever touched Raven or Mia. Those were always the house rules. No one
would hold this against me since Asher was the one who fucked up.
I was too angry to care even if he didn’t. I was shaking and could barely
steady my temper. Leaving Asher to be dealt with by our friends, I dragged
Raven inside.
"We're going upstairs," I growled in her ear.
Without giving her a chance to respond, I walked at a manic speed. She said
a few confused words of protest but, in the end, focused on walking up the
stairs in her high-heeled shoes.
Within a few minutes, we reached the topmost floor of our house.
"Ajax, what the hell was that?" Raven demanded.
Instead of responding, I lead her through the hallway.
"Look, not that it's any of your business, but I think Asher had a lot to drink
and got carried away. You should’ve respected me enough to let me deal
with it," Raven continued. "Ash is not a bad guy; you know that. You
shouldn't have done that. It was out of line."
Raven gave out an exasperated sigh.
"Can you please speak to me?"
"Don't ever say his fucking name again," I turned around and yelled so
loudly that Raven looked terrified. How was that for a response?
I shouldn't scare her after beating a guy half to death in front of her, but I
didn't care. She shouldn't be saying his name or calling him by a nickname
like Ash, as if he had a place in her heart. The thought alone made me want
to go back and murder him. Finish the job I started.
The events from tonight had my mind spiraling. The thought of seeing her
with another guy made me see death.
My decision was made up—Raven was mine and mine only. I wouldn't
allow her to keep living in denial. We belonged together. She needed to
come to the same conclusion.
I wrapped my hand around her waist and led her to my room. I hauled
Raven inside, closing the door and locking us in. I grabbed her and pushed
her against the wall by the door.
"If he looks at you again, I'll kill him. I'll kill any fucker who touches you,"
I said quietly with immense anger.
Raven stared at me but stayed put. My frustration and rage took over,
turning into predatory desire. I wrapped a hand around her waist and placed
another on her cheek. I smashed my lips to hers, kissing her hard. I didn’t
leave an inch of doubt, licking her lips with my tongue.
When she didn't open her mouth, I placed a thumb on her bottom lip to pry
it open, slipping my tongue inside. Her body trembled as I explored her
with my hand, moving it up the side of her waist.
God, I missed this. I missed it so fucking much.
"Ajax, stop." Raven put her hands on my chest, trying to create distance.
I was having none of it. Grabbing her hands, I pinned them on the wall as I
burnt Raven with my eyes. "I'm the only one who's allowed to touch you.
To feel you. To feel this."
Raven was paralyzed. Picking her up, I dropped her on my bed and grabbed
at the hem of her dress.
"Ajax, I can't!" Raven shrieked. "I already told you. I can't do this
anymore."
"For fuck's sake, Rave. I know Mia gave you a scare, but you can't pull
away like this. We want each other. This is no one else's business but ours."
"Ajax—"
"Rave, I can't look at you, be around you, and not be with you. This is
torture for me. You’re so beautiful and perfect, and I miss you. I miss being
with you. Don't you miss me?"
"Not like that, I don't," Raven looked down and muttered. "I'm sorry. I let
this go on for too long. This is not only because of Mia. I don't want this."
"You do. You are overanalyzing it as you do with everything else."
"I'm not. Get it through your head—this is over."
"No, it's not." I grabbed her chin and returned to kissing her while slipping
off her shoes.
I needed to connect with her. Needed to feel her squirm under me. It had
been too long. I needed to remind her how good it was between us. I slid
her dress with my hand, bunching it around her waist. Reaching for her
black thong, I pulled it down.
Raven pushed at my chest again to create distance. Not happening. I
grabbed her thighs as I sat between her parted legs.
"Ajax, please stop."
"Please, baby, I need this," I groaned. "It's my birthday, and all I want is
you."
I slid my hands up and down her naked thighs, my thumb brushing against
her bare pussy every so often.
"No," Raven said firmly. I didn't budge. "No," she repeated, but this time let
out a moan. She was distracted by my thumb teasing her core.
"What are you saying no to?" I whispered in her hair.
"I'm saying no to you. I don't want to fuck you. I don't want to be with you.
I'm saying no to all of it," Raven breathed.
Gripping her hips, I circled her pussy again with my thumb. She moaned
like I was creating an unbearable sensation using the friction of her smooth
lips.
"How can you say that?"
She tried to push me off again, but I was double the size. Unmovable.
"Ajax, we can't. We talked about this."
"No. You talked, I listened," I murmured. "Now, listen to your body. Do you
feel this?" Raven moaned as my fingers stroked her pussy. As predicted, she
was soaking wet. "That's it, baby. Don't over-analyze this."
I turned my face to kiss her cheek. Raven fluttered her eyes shut and arched
her back as I wrapped a hand around her waist, keeping the tempo with the
other. Dutifully, I kissed her face, bit her jaw, and sucked on her neck, all
the things Raven liked.
She looked lost. This was it. This was what I had been craving for weeks.
Before then, I craved it for years. I couldn’t stop now if I wanted to.
Out of nowhere, Raven screeched, shocking me out of my lust-high mind.
"No!" She grabbed my wrist. "Enough, Ajax. I don't want to do this
anymore. I already told you that."
I was baffled. Did Mia's words have that much of an impact? I told her how
I felt, but she was ready to give up on us because of a thirteen-year-old
child.
I glared. "Your body is saying otherwise."
I pushed her onto her back, bracing her stomach with my hand. I stretched
out over her lower body to eat her out.
"Ajax, please stop. My word should be enough."
I didn't stop. Raven asked me multiple times; I should, but I couldn’t.
There was an insatiable hunger in me that wouldn't let me stop. I needed to
taste her, taste what was mine, and make her understand what she meant to
me. It was an unbearable, mind-wiping, primal instinct that kept me going.
My tongue had no finesse, going crazy on her pussy.
Raven's eyes closed. Her fingers landed in my hair, grabbing hard,
reminding me of what she liked. "We can't—oh, God," Raven panted.
"We can," I said in between lapping at her. I used more techniques, finding
the spot to make her squeeze.
"Fuck," Raven sobbed as her crescendo built, tears seeping out of her eyes.
She yanked my hair, ready to pull them out.
Soaking wet tightness built up. Her back arched, eyes rolling back and
fluttering. The silent scream from her parted lips increased with shuddering
whimpers and cries. My fantasy was back to life, and the real thing was
much more erotic than my dreams.
“Fuck. Fuck! Ah. I’m fucking—holy shit. I’m coming." And she did. Hard.
Raven tried to catch her breath as I worked my way up. I unfastened my
jeans, pushing them down along with my boxers. Grabbing at the hem of
my shirt, I pulled it over my head. I held onto Raven's thighs and pushed
inside her.
Fuck. Me.
"Shit, baby. God," I grunted while kissing her like a starved man—her face,
neck, and breasts. Lifting her thighs, I went as deep as I could.
This was heaven. This was home. Being with her filled my soul in a way I
couldn’t explain. She was my missing part. Without her, I'd always be
incomplete.
I fucked her like a crazy man. Like a deprived man taking his fill. I pushed
deep and pounded her ass into the mattress. My orgasm caught me off
guard, and I roared into her hair. The absence of her body brought on the
most excruciating climax to date.
I pressed my forehead against hers, finally having had the fix I needed. We
were breathing harshly as I pulled out and slumped on top. I held her tight,
hoping to mold her into my body. I never wanted to let go.
Raven lay complacent on the mattress. I sat on my haunches to stare at the
work of art. Staring at her had become my favorite pastime.
However, Raven refused to make eye contact, turning her face away and
looking out the window. I stroked her hair and turned her face to me. She
batted my hand away.
"You shouldn't have done that," she muttered so quietly that I almost missed
it.
"Why?"
"I said no. You should've stopped."
"You were gripping my hair so hard I was scared you’d rip it out if I dared
to stop," I deadpanned.
Raven didn't respond.
"It's never been like this with anyone. Even with your limited experience,
you must know I'm right. You came within a minute of me going down on
you." I raised my eyebrow and smirked.
Raven didn't respond. She slowly rose to get dressed. I watched her with
apprehension. It sunk in that I fucked up tonight. I shouldn't have pushed
her. I should’ve stopped when she asked.
She was calm, but there was an air about her telling me she was pissed.
More than pissed.
As she finished, Raven creaked open the door. I wanted to tell her with all
my soul not to leave. I'd fall apart again without her, but I stayed put.
Raven turned her head toward me and finally spoke, "Happy birthday,
Ajax."
With those words, she was gone, leaving me to drown in my misery once
more.
Raven.
Avoiding Ajax required all my organizational skills. Since his birthday
party, I had made it my life's mission not to be around him alone.
I told him to stop. I told him multiple times. Yes, my body responded to
him, and once we started, I didn't protest anymore. He still should have
respected my decision the first time I said no. Men were supposed to stop
when you said no, right? I had never experienced otherwise.
I blocked the thought out. I had to if I wanted to keep living here since Ajax
had officially moved back. Instead, I justified his actions. After all, I was
physically reactive when he went down on me. It didn't help that Asher
kissed me, sparking Ajax's jealousy.
What the hell was Asher thinking anyway?
One minute we were talking, and the next, he grabbed and kissed me. I
didn't kiss him back. Along with giving the wrong signals, I must also be
terrible at ending things with men.
I heard through the grapevine that Ajax was kicking Asher out of their
business. When they drew up the contract for the company, Ajax was a fifty
percent owner since he funded the initial expenses. The rest of them split
the remaining percentages.
Ajax came into his trust fund after his twenty-first birthday. He spoke to the
family lawyer to give Asher a small sum of that money to buy him out. I
was unsure of how he convinced Asher to sign the papers, but Ajax had
shown me how much of a force of nature he could be during his birthday
party. I spent the next day cooped up at Janeen's house. We weren’t allowed
sleepovers on school nights, so I grudgingly returned home and felt Ajax's
starved eyes taking me in throughout dinner.
Uncle Reese and Tessa were staying at the house until the Thanksgiving
Holidays. Ajax wouldn’t try anything if his parents were in the house.
Regardless, I had been sleeping in Mia's room as an extra security measure.
At other times, I kept myself busy. School. Dance classes. Study sessions. I
also worked on my application for a remote internship next semester. The
only hitch in my well-laid-out plan was Reid's new love interest. He met a
college girl at Ajax's party, and they had been spending a lot of time
together.
Typically, I was Reid's wingman and found his conquests amusing. This
time, not so much. I needed more defenses against Ajax's out-of-control
libido. There was safety in numbers. Reid couldn't have found a more
inconvenient time to become serious with a girl. It was selfish thinking on
my part, but I couldn’t help it. Tonight was the perfect example. Since Tessa
enjoyed her relaxing spa experience at the Plaza, Uncle Reese decided on a
repeat to recreate another good day for his wife. He was taking Mia along
with him, and I didn't have Reid as my buffer.
We didn't have school tomorrow. I tried to stay over at Janeen's house, but
Ajax crushed those plans. When Janeen’s responsible parents called Ajax to
ensure I could stay over, he politely declined, stating I had forgotten our
pre-existing family plans.
Lies.
Now, we were alone for the first time since his birthday. Ajax walked his
parents out, telling them to have a good time. I watched him lock the door,
bracing myself.
Ajax glanced at me. I didn't have to guess what was on his mind. It had
been a few days since we had sex, and he was getting impatient. Eyeing the
staircase, I marched toward it, intent on locking myself in my room for the
rest of the night.
Ajax charged behind, gripping my shoulders as I reached the top of the
stairs. Turning me around, he gave me a shake. "Where are you going?"
"I-I—" I trailed off, unable to answer.
"We have to talk, Rave," Ajax said sharply.
"About what?"
"Are you serious? About us. We’ve been sleeping together, remember?"
"So?" I challenged.
"So?" He sounded incredulous. "What's wrong with you? W-we have been
sleeping t-together." It was Ajax's turn to stammer. "I'm your first. You gave
your virginity to me. What does that mean to you?"
"Ajax, whatever happened between us is done." I ripped out of his grip,
mostly because he let me go. "I can't change the past. We can only move
forward. This," I wiggled a finger between us, "is over."
"That's what you think."
"Whatever." I tried to skate past him, but Ajax blocked me, grabbing my
waist. "Let me go."
"Why should I?"
"Because I know what you want, and I refuse to give in."
"What I want or what we both want?" Ajax deadpanned.
"Please stop."
"Why can't you admit that you want me, too?"
I rolled my eyes and jerked out of his hold. My patience was running thin.
"You seem awfully fixated on a short-lived relationship based on
meaningless sex."
"And you seem awfully quick to forget about it." Ajax glared. Then he
sighed in defeat. "Look, Rave. If you were dissatisfied with the extent of
our relationship, I can do better. We can have whatever kind of relationship
that makes you comfortable. Do you want to be my girlfriend? Do you want
to tell people about us? Tell me what it’ll take. Talk to me."
Ajax seemed so hurt that my heart squeezed in a way I couldn’t explain, but
I refused to veer off course.
I didn't trust Ajax anymore. All he wanted out of me was sex, despite me
saying no multiple times. I didn't believe Ajax when he said that he loved
me. He was full of shit. This was about his damn ego. He was attracted to
me, and I turned him down. He didn't know how to handle rejection. His
ego wasn’t my problem. Not anymore. I didn't want to be his stupid
girlfriend, and I didn't want anyone to know about us. I wanted to keep my
promise to Mia, and I wanted this nightmare to end.
"Ajax," I said quietly, "I'm sorry if you thought what we had meant more." I
paused to gauge his reaction. I had to be careful. As furious as I was at
Ajax, he was volatile and unpredictable. I needed to deal with him
diplomatically.
"But we have to call it for what it was. We had a fling based on sex. It was
misplaced feelings for both of us. Temporary oblivion. That's all. We have
to move on."
Ajax smirked, shocking the hell out of me. "Are you convincing me or
yourself?"
My anger returned with full force. The bit of diplomacy I had left was gone.
"Your ego is bruised. That's why you are acting like this."
Ajax's expression didn't change—angry, determined, resonating with sexual
desire. He grabbed my elbow, fingers flexing until it turned painful.
"Stop acting so innocent, Rave," Ajax hissed. "You came on to me just as
many times. You reciprocated, too."
This was true. Our physical connection was a crazed magnetic pull that
never died down. We took comfort in each other’s arms and the escape it
provided. Ajax might have started our sexual relationship, but whenever my
parents rejected me, I sought him out, too. I was surprised he would throw
that in my face. Ajax used to be my hero. When did he turn into the villain
in my book? He never made me feel bad before.
"I trusted you," I spoke evenly. "I went along with it because I didn't think
you'd steer me wrong. We both made a mistake."
"Keep telling yourself that. You love me, but you're scared of what people
will think. I can't do it like you can, Rave. I can't sacrifice what I want in
fear of other people." Ajax scooped me into his arms and took long strides.
"Ajax, what are you doing? Let me go!" I shrieked.
He didn't respond. Ajax pushed the door open to my room and dropped me
on my bed. I tried to jump up, but he lunged at me, effectively pinning me
down. When did he become like this? He manipulated tonight to take
advantage of me.
"Ajax, get off me," I spoke as steadily as I could manage.
His hand moved down my body and slipped inside my shorts easily,
fingering me before I could stop him.
"I don't know how else to make this clear to you." I kept calm to reach his
rational side. "I don't want to have sex with you."
"Then why are you so wet, Raven," he murmured in my hair. "Your thong is
soaked."
Fucking hell. Ajax taught me everything about sex. He taught my body to
respond to him, and I was always aroused at his will. No wonder he didn’t
stop.
"Because I’m a teenager," I countered. "Everything gets teenagers horny."
"Stop lying to yourself and stop fighting this."
"Ajax, I'm saying no. You are supposed to respect my wishes. You know
that, right?"
Ajax didn’t respond. A climax like never before replaced my protests as he
worked me. I grabbed onto his shoulders, shuddering from my orgasm.
Ajax didn't miss a beat as he pulled down his basketball shorts and
slammed inside me.
"Fuck. I love you, baby. I love you so fucking much." Kissing and nipping
my lips, he tenderly petted me as he came and slumped on top of me.
Kissing my temple, he reminded me of what my body already knew. "You
are mine. You'll always be mine."
Ajax.
I had to stop. I had to dig deep and find the strength. I was ashamed of my
behavior and could barely look at myself in the mirror.
If a girl said no, you stop. It was simple. I had never done anything
otherwise.
So, why can't I stop with Raven?
This whole week had been a fight. A fight with my sick urges to take what
was mine, and a battle with Raven.
Before we started a physical relationship, I denied myself what I wanted
most in the world, but I could control it because I had no idea what I was
missing out on. I didn't know what it was like to be with her.
Being with her was this potent, mind-boggling, addicting dosage of cocaine.
One hit, and I was hooked. Food, money, life, success, friends, family, there
was nothing I wouldn't sacrifice. There was nothing I could prioritize in my
lust-filled, sick mind that was worth stopping this madness for. Nothing
placated me until I was inside her.
No matter how many times I had been with her, I wanted more. This
sickening addiction was getting worse every time I was with her. My body
had built a tolerance, and I needed more of her to get the same high.
I couldn’t go on feeling like this. This insanity, this infinite obsession, this
lust; it had to end at some point. It had to slow down, at least. How could it
increase by the day? Wasn't sexual tension supposed to decrease once you
had sex? When would this craze end?
I reminded myself that I did stop for a few weeks after starting our physical
relationship. Even after becoming insane—driven only by lust and my need
for that girl—I managed to stop. She told me it was over, and I stayed away
for a few weeks. If I could do it once, I could do it again.
I tried. Last night, I stayed with Brandon, but my dark thoughts returned
tenfold. Thoughts of her with another man. The idea of her being ripped
away from me for good. All those thoughts tore up my insides. The first
time she was without me, she left for Paris and found some douchebag. The
second time she was without me, I caught her kissing Asher. Those
memories returned like a hurricane, and a gnawing voice yelled, she is
mine.
I returned home before the night was over.
When Raven broke things off with me, I told myself that I was giving her
space. She needed to miss me to remember how much she appreciated me.
This felt different. Though I kept telling her she wanted me, I no longer had
the same faith. I couldn’t get her to admit she wanted to be with me. Every
time she said no, she ripped my heart out. Every time it was ripped out, I
became a bigger monster.
Even as I kept telling myself I needed to let her go, I couldn’t. She deserved
a happy life away from me, but I was too selfish to let her have it because it
meant I'd never have a happy life. If I didn't push her, it meant a life without
Raven. I couldn’t fathom the idea. Despite my shame at my behavior, I
couldn’t say I regretted my actions.
As I had said, I wasn’t a good man.
I can't do this to Raven. Even as I made my daily promise to stay away, I
couldn’t.
We had a Thanksgiving Party tonight. Raven acted all polite and shit as she
does nowadays in front of people but willfully ignored me at all other times.
I waited for everyone to clean up and fall asleep, then started toward her
room. As I pushed the door open, I found an empty bed, which meant she
was staying with Mia again. I shouldn't be surprised. It had been Raven’s
number one shield against me.
However, Raven underestimated my determination tonight. It had been a
few days since we were together. Now, I was more of a madman than
before. You couldn’t reason with a lunatic. You could only use logic against
those who had rational senses left. If she thought she'd get away from me,
she had another thing coming.
I confidently strolled into Mia's room to claim what was mine. Raven was
sleeping on her side, facing the window. She looked freshly showered and
comfortably tucked into bed.
I sat on my haunches to study her. She was beautiful when she slept. Raven
stirred when I brushed the hair away from her face and stroked the apple of
her cheek with my thumb. Her eyes flew open in confusion. Careful not to
wake Mia, I got straight to the point.
"Come to the hallway with me. Otherwise, I'll wake Mia up, and we can
talk in front of her," I whispered.
Raven seemed perplexed but followed my directions. Raven knew I wasn’t
past waking Mia if I dared to enter her room. She slowly rose from the bed,
careful not to dip the mattress so Mia didn’t feel the sudden shift.
As soon as we were in the hallway, her silence dissipated. "Ajax? W-what
the hell is going on?"
"Did you think you'd get away from me by staying in Mia's room?" I asked
through clenched teeth. Raven stared at me, dazed from her sleepy state.
"I'd rather fuck you in my bed, but if you’re going to be this difficult, then
I'll happily fuck you in this hallway or your bed—hell, even in Mia's bed.
Choose an option."
Raven's eyes widened, fully awake from her slumber. "Ajax, everyone is
here tonight. You can't possibly be doing this right now."
"I don't give two shits about who's here. If you care so much, don't make
this worse than it needs to be. Come back to my room."
"No, Ajax. Not like this. Not when everyone's here at the house."
Grabbing her by the arms, I shocked her by kissing her. Hard. She pounded
my chest as I slipped my tongue inside her mouth. I broke the kiss and
yanked at her hair. "In that case, I'll fuck you right here."
I could barely think. I was in a fog—drowning and suffocating in it. Fuck, I
wanted her. I wanted her so fucking much that I'd happily fuck her in the
hallway. I didn't care if we got caught.
Raven appeared mortified. "Ajax, no. Are you insane? We are not having
sex while your parents are here."
I was trying hard to control my anger. How could she not want me the same
way I wanted her? Did she not feel this magnetic pull we had toward one
another? I'd do anything for her, and she continually rejected me.
I hauled her closer, determination plastered in my expression. "We are, and
you get to choose where."
Raven struggled but realized she couldn’t get out of my hold. Careful to
keep her voice low, she put a hand on my chest. "Please, not here. Okay.
Okay. You win. Let's go to your room," she said desperately, presumably to
get out of this hallway where we could easily get caught.
I was quick to take advantage of the situation. "You won’t be difficult? I
don't want to fight you every step of the way tonight. If you give me a hard
time, I swear I'll bring you back here—"
"I'll be good," Raven conceded.
"And you'll stay the night? You can go back before anyone wakes up. If you
don't want to wake up early, we can sleep in your room, and I'll wake up
early. Either way, we’re sleeping together tonight."
Raven didn’t respond. I could see the defiance in her eyes. She didn't want
to risk getting caught in the morning.
"I'm serious about this, Raven. You care so much about what other people
think. I don't. Disappoint me tonight, and you'll see how less I care about
what people think. I'll fuck you in front of my parents if that's what it takes
to show you. It's your call."
Raven blinked like she couldn’t believe the words coming out of my mouth.
She should know by now. I wasn’t the man she used to know. "Let's go to
your room. I promise I'll stay. I promise I'll do whatever you want," she
whispered, probably biting back the curse words she wanted to hurl at me.
I lifted her in my arms before she could change her mind. I carried her to
my room—locking the door behind us—then tossed her on my bed,
pouncing on her immediately.
Raven had been pulling all the strings of my heart. I’d had no control. I was
so fucking angry and needed to take back some of the control. I needed her
to know she was mine.
I pulled her close—hands fisting into her hair—slamming my lips against
hers. Raven whimpered into my mouth as I pushed her onto the mattress.
Growling under my breath, I covered her body with mine, hands resting on
either side of her face.
I straightened, only to pull my shirt over my head. My heart beat like a wild
drum as I pulled her tank top off and her shorts down. Pulling her panties to
the side, I pushed two fingers inside her. I looked her in the eyes as I
lowered my face down to her pussy, tongue seeking out her clit.
"Oh, God," Raven moaned, expression wild. Her body strained under me.
She choked on a scream when I pressed my tongue against her cunt. I was
going to make her come over and over again until she forgot to leave me
again.
"Oh, God. Oh, God," she whimpered, careful to keep her voice low.
This wouldn't do. I wanted her to scream. I needed to hear her scream my
fucking name. I didn't care who heard us. I wanted everyone to know that
she was mine—my parents, my brother, my sister, all of New York City.
I withdrew my fingers and flipped her over to her stomach. With my hands
firmly gripping the backs of her knees, I slid both of her thighs forward—
ass in the air, face on the pillow. My tongue sought out her sensitive spot
again as two of my fingers slipped back inside. Raven bit down on the
pillow to muffle the sounds coming from her.
"I want to hear you scream," I hissed. "Scream my fucking name. Say that
you’re mine; say it loud enough for everyone to hear."
Raven panted, stifling her moans. "Ah—"
Her thighs quaked, and I noted she liked this position. This was the fastest I
had seen her ready to fall apart. I pumped my fingers while my tongue
grazed her clit.
"Please—" Raven begged, and my chest swelled with pride. She never
begged.
"Say you’re mine if you want to come." I pumped my fingers quicker and
lapped at her clit faster, keeping her on the edge. "Say it."
"Fuck, Ajax… I'm yours. Oh, fuck… Oh, God. Please don't stop."
She didn't scream loud enough to carry her voice, but she said my name.
Said she was mine. No one else's.
She was mine—my Raven.
I pressed my tongue on her clit, letting her rock to find her release, making
the bedsprings creak with my efforts. The death-grip clutch of her cunt kept
my fingers locked inside.
"Oh, God," she gasped.
"You are mine," I repeated through clenched teeth. I had only stopped for a
millisecond, but Raven looked ready to lose her shit. She pushed her pussy
back against my tongue.
"Yes, I'm yours. Please, Ajax… don't stop. I'm coming. Keep going."
The moment I gave her that friction, she came on my mouth, moaning
incoherently. Raven fell flat on her stomach, limp. I worked my way up,
kissing the back of her body as I went. I drew a line up her spine with my
tongue.
"You okay?" I murmured when I reached her ear lobe.
She said something incoherent. Raven was brain-dead from her orgasm and
could barely form a word. It pulled out a low chuckle from me, my bad
mood seeping out. She screamed my name and said she was mine. She gave
me what I needed, but deep down, she knew the same truth I did.
She isn’t mine.
I am hers.
As Raven steadied her breathing, I lifted off her, realizing I must be
crushing her with my weight. Lying back, I grabbed the back of her arm to
flip her and pulled her to my chest. Raven’s eyes landed on my tented
sweatpants, my hard cock straining toward her. Hazel eyes peeked up
before lowering.
I stroked my dick through my sweats. "This is what you do to me."
Raven lifted off my chest to move down my body. Making space for herself
between my thighs, she pulled at my waistband. I lifted my hips so she
could pull my sweatpants down. She kissed my abs and lower abdomen,
then grabbed my shaft with her delicate hand. She leaned forward with her
mouth open to lick drops of pre-cum around the tip.
"Shit." I mashed my teeth together, already feeling my body vibrating.
She licked the tip of my cock again, finally closing her lips around me. My
hips bucked forward, pushing further into her mouth.
I stared at her, awestruck, lust-filled—a man obsessed. Raven wrapped her
fingers around me, sucking and pumping. I didn't know how much longer I
could hold back. Brushing her hair back and tugging it restlessly, I raced off
to the finish line.
"Baby, I'm going to come." Raven bobbed her head up and down before
cupping my balls. That did it for me as I came in her mouth. "Shit. Shit. Oh,
God."
I was still floating in euphoria when I blindly reached for her to get her
back on my chest and lie in a post-coitus cuddle. I was beyond content.
After what seemed like forever, I didn't have to fight her every step of the
way. She came as hard as I did.
Why didn't she understand how good we had it?
After some time had passed, Raven shifted. She planned to slip back to
Mia's room despite her promise. When Raven stirred again, I flipped her
over, bracing one hand on each side of her head.
"I'm not done with you," I growled, nipping at her ear with my teeth.
Maybe I needed to slow down and take a breather. But in my sick mind, I
knew I wouldn’t be able to blackmail her again once my parents left. This
was the first time in so long that she wasn't fighting me. I planned to take
full advantage of this situation.
I kissed her, then dipped down to lick the side of her neck. I pushed her legs
open, spreading her wide. I looked into her eyes, stopping for a single,
heart-pounding second.
"You are so beautiful," I murmured.
I pressed my fingers on her clit, but the opposite side I had stimulated when
I went down on her. Her pussy was slick, and I thrust into her hard, not
willing to hold back tonight.
Raven initially gave nothing away with her expressions. After a little while,
she threw her head back, moaning and rasping.
Soon enough, Raven gave out another earth-shattering orgasm. I didn't wait,
pumping into her faster, so we could come simultaneously.
Settling her against me, I grabbed her as hard as I could, not entirely
believing she’d stay through the night.
DECEMBER 2015.
Raven.
I was getting changed into my sleeping clothes when I heard my
bedroom door fly open with Ajax stepping inside. I rolled my eyes. I’d had
a grueling day between school and dance practice. The last thing I wanted
to do was deal with Ajax.
Ajax had been on a mission to talk about us. He was manipulating me into
sex and didn't stop when I asked him to. There was nothing I could do about
it. So, what the hell was there to talk about?
"We have to talk," Ajax said predictably.
"We don't," I snapped.
"Unfortunately, you're not the only one who gets to decide. You've been
avoiding me."
"And you couldn't take the hint?"
Ajax looked at me for a long while. "I hate hurting you," he finally
muttered.
Really. Was that all he got? "Well, thank you for that. Now, please leave."
"Why are you being like this?"
"Oh, do I sound annoyed? A few days ago, you threatened to fuck me in
front of your parents. I'm sorry. I should be thrilled to speak to you," I said
sarcastically.
Ajax tried to make eye contact as he spoke. I avoided his gaze, looking
anywhere but at him. "Rave, I don't want to keep pushing you, but you
refuse to talk about us. I'm losing it here."
"Ajax, go find someone else to fuck. All the girls who came over last
weekend were dying to sleep with you. Choose one of them and leave me
alone. They won't mind your horny episodes or your bipolar mood swings."
Ajax flinched. His pained expression tore up my heart. How could he give
me puppy dog eyes after threatening to fuck me in front of his parents?
Ajax promised never to leave me but walked out when I wouldn't give him
what he wanted. He broke my heart, just like my parents. After returning,
all he wanted was my body. He didn't care when I said no or asked him to
stop.
The veil of deception had been lifted. I didn't idolize this man in front of me
anymore. I didn't believe anything coming out of his mouth. All he wanted
was sex. His recent behavior was proof of it.
Well, he didn't need me for sex. We had a Thanksgiving party last weekend
with many of our family friends. Asher was conveniently left off the guest
list. Half the girls here spent the night making moon eyes at Ajax. Those
girls were prettier than me. They were more experienced and probably
better in bed. He could have his pick of the litter and leave me alone.
"Raven," Ajax started softly, "you have every reason to hate me. I don't
know what I can say to make it better. I can't. I have no excuse for my
behavior. I can only tell you that I can't live without you. I love you. I love
you so fucking much. I don't know how to make it stop. I feel like the only
way it will is if I rip my fucking heart out."
How could Ajax keep dropping the L bomb so casually? Well, he could
because he was lying. He'd say anything to get me to spread my legs again.
I didn't want to hear it; I didn't want to listen to any of this.
"Shut up!" I screeched. "Shut up, shut up. Stop lying through your teeth.
You don't love me."
"Of course I do. I’ve always loved you," Ajax merely stated, like it was the
most normal thing in the world. As if I should’ve known.
“In that case, you are doing the most heinous things in the name of love. If
you loved me so damn much, how could you do what you did?” I jabbed a
finger at his chest.
Ajax didn't respond. He focused on me; face covered with sadness. I
couldn’t stop my traitorous heart from softening. No matter how much I
vowed to hate him, this was still Ajax. No matter how much they broke me,
I could never hate my parents either. I suffered from bouts of unconditional
love; I only wished to get it back in return.
I wished my father could love me without conditions, even if I didn't come
as a package deal with my mom. I wished Mom could love me, even if I
couldn’t fulfill her need for a glamorous life. I wished Ajax could love me,
even if I couldn’t give him what he wanted physically.
Ajax finally spoke. “You are right. You should tell everyone what I did. I
deserve whatever punishment I get.”
My heart squeezed so hard that I couldn’t breathe. "I can't do that," I
whispered.
"Why not?"
"You know why."
"Because you love me?"
Jesus. Give him an inch, and he takes a yard. "No, I don't," I said firmly.
"Stop lying, Raven. Why can't you just admit it?"
"Ajax, you were my first. You taught me everything I know and like about
sex. I might be unable to control reacting positively to you, but I can control
everything else. You can force my body, maybe manipulate it to respond to
you, but you’ll never have anything else of mine. You'll never have my
heart."
Ajax glared at me. I could see the caring Ajax leaving the vicinity, replaced
by the lust-crazed sociopath I didn't want to be around.
"That's not true. I know you feel the way I do. I can feel you in my bones,
in my blood. If you feel otherwise, then here." Ajax grabbed my hand and
placed his phone in it. "Call your parents. Call my parents. Call Reid. Hell,
call the police. I won't stop you. Tell everyone what I did. I'll take whatever
the consequences are for my actions. I'm still man enough to own up to that
much. Do it, Rave."
I blinked.
Ajax had gone off the deep end. If he went to jail, it would leave all three of
us wholly abandoned. I would lie through my teeth, take a bullet, or get run
over by a bulldozer before putting Reid or Mia in that position.
"I'm not going to do that."
"If you’re not going to tell them, then be with me."
"Never."
Ajax looked around desperately, searching for an answer. "Rave, you're so
out of touch with your emotions that you don't understand your own
feelings. You love me, but it's like you can't access that part of yourself.
Why are you doing this to yourself? Why are you doing this to me?" He
looked at the end of his rope, which wasn’t good news for me.
I refused to be here when Ajax went off. I shook my head. He was wrong,
but I didn't care to prove it. He could have the final word as I was done with
this conversation.
I spun in place, ready to exit my room. Ajax grabbed my elbow, effectively
ending my escape plan. My reflexes kicked in, and I turned to slap him
across his face. "Do not fucking touch me!"
Ajax didn’t flinch. He reciprocated by grabbing my arms and pulling me to
his chest. "You are such a confused little girl," he yelled as he shook me.
"You don't know what you want. You need me to tell you what you want,
like always."
Refusing to back down, I yelled, "Really! Am I confused? You promised
my dad to take care of me. Instead, you’re fucking me. You're supposed to
be my guardian." I hoped the last portion would shame him into snapping
out of it.
No such luck.
"It's simple, Rave. We belong together. Stop fighting this." Ajax pulled me
closer.
I pushed back, dropping his phone in the process on the soft carpet. "Stop it,
Ajax."
Ajax seemed out of his mind, deaf to my words. Like he was talking to
himself, having a personal monologue. I only happened to be here. "You
said you love me. You said it yourself."
"I don't love you. Now get off me," I stated firmly.
He grabbed my wrists hard enough to leave marks. I bent and twisted to
struggle out of his hold. "Ajax, stop," I said more forcefully.
He let go of one wrist to grab the buttons of my shirt, yanking it open. The
buttons ripped and scattered across the floor.
"What are you doing?" I bellowed as I struck him with my free hand.
He seemed utterly oblivious to my attacks and grabbed onto my shorts. This
was a Ajax I had never met. He had blacked out, possessed. I tried to push
him off but lost my balance and fell backward on my ass. Ajax wasted no
time. He was on top of me with rapid speed, trapping me.
"Please, baby. Please don't fight me. I love you so fucking much. You're all
I ever wanted." He kissed my face as I tried to kick him. Ajax grabbed my
leg, holding it down. I was on my back, stretched out under him. Grabbing
my wrists, he pinned them on each side of my face. It was a painfully hard
grip.
"Ow. Ow. Ajax! You're hurting me," I cried out.
He didn't respond, nor did he slow down as he yanked my shorts down.
"Stop! Please, Ajax, I'm begging you. Don't do this. It's me, Raven. How
can you hurt me like this?"
"Yes, my Raven," Ajax breathed into my ear.
"Yes, yours. Remember? Your Raven. Please don't do this to me." I was
grasping at straws. I didn't know what else would snap him out of this.
There were other times when Ajax didn't listen to me when I asked him to
stop, but never like this. All those times, I was never scared of Ajax. This
time I was paralyzed with fear. If there was a time to stop, this would be it.
Ajax didn't seem remotely coherent or conscious. I had never fought him
this much and didn't know how to reach him. This wasn’t my Ajax, my
hero. Couldn’t he see I was begging him, that I was in pain?
"I can't live without you, baby. You’re in my system, imprinted on my soul.
Just love me. That's all I want. I'll make you so happy, I promise."
"Stop!" I shrieked. I screamed, though no one was home. I kicked him again
but failed to land a solid strike. In turn, Ajax grabbed under my right knee
and pushed it up forcefully.
"We are always at peace when we’re connected. You know it, too. I can
make you feel it again. I know you'll remember once I’m inside you. You
always do."
He pushed two fingers inside me as he bit my neck and breasts. I sobbed
and cried while Ajax kissed away my tears, telling me how much he loved
me.
Finally, it sunk in. He was going through with it. I genuinely didn't want
him, but he was doing it anyway.
The point of no return, and I… this wasn't real.
Ajax yanked down his sweatpants. One of his large hands had both my
wrists locked on top of my head. He used the other to rub my clit and found
a spot that made me wet enough to take him. He was unmovable. I didn't try
to use the rest of my limbs since I couldn’t escape his massive frame, so I
did the next best thing.
I turned my head to the side and told myself this wasn't happening. I had to
distance my mind from what was happening to my body. If there was a time
for my compartmentalization skills to come in handy, it was at this moment.
Not even allowing me the tiny spectrum of denial, Ajax nudged my face
with his hand, forcing me to face him. He kissed me and bit my bottom lip
when I didn't open my mouth. I didn't care if he split my lip; I refused. Ajax
didn't clamp down any harder but shoved his tongue inside me anyways. He
explored my mouth hungrily and moaned. His fingers found the right spot
on my clit, and I struggled against an oncoming orgasm. Trying to ignore
the caresses, I attempted to escape inside my mind. Ajax hated it when I did
this. It was his biggest pet peeve when he couldn’t get a reaction from me.
Good. I hoped it pissed him off.
However, Ajax was having none of that today. He grabbed my chin and
kissed me like a maniac. I was distracted and caught off guard when he
slammed his cock into me. I slid upward due to his sheer force to drive into
me, and he brought me back to place.
I didn't move, playing dead as he thrust into me. That's why the orgasm
took me by surprise when his fingers slipped between us to rub the right
spot. Despite myself, I came at the same time he did.
He slumped over me while I lay perfectly still underneath. I couldn’t
believe that just happened. I never thought something like this could happen
with Ajax, of all people.
He turned his face to kiss my cheek. "I love you."
"You are a sick cocksucker."
"Language, Rave," Ajax chided. I turned to stare at him in disbelief. Was he
disciplining me while still inside me?
I didn't say more as Ajax pulled out and went to the bathroom. A few
minutes later, a warm washcloth cleaned the last of him off me. Two large
hands picked me up and carried me to the bed.
Ajax pulled the comforter over, slid underneath it, and held me to him. He
was asleep within minutes. I tried to wiggle out of his hold, but it was of no
avail. Even in sleep, Ajax's grip had grown iron-strong since he figured out
I didn’t want to sleep in the same bed as him.
My eyes drifted shut while I plotted how to get out of this situation. A
lightbulb went off, and I vowed this to be the final time he touched me.
MARCH 13TH, 2020.
Raven.
It wasn’t supposed to happen again. I promised myself that the last
time he touched me would be the last time he touched me. For years, I had
been able to keep that promise. One afternoon shattered everything I had
built.
I stared at Ajax's locked bedroom door while he spooned me from behind.
He whispered annoying shit in my ear, things he thought were sweet or
dirty talk. I tuned him out, keeping my focus on how to escape this
situation. I already moved out of my place and didn’t have a friend in the
city to provide me with shelter.
"Raven, you can't leave this house," Ajax said, presuming I was planning
my escape. He waved a hand in front of my eyes, blocking my view of the
door.
"Shut up."
"Great comeback. I expected something more original."
"Go choke on a dick. How's that for originality?"
"Heard it way too many times. It was Reid's favorite line against me when
he was a teenager."
"So, it's a classic," I retorted.
I tried to get up, but Ajax's arms tightened around me instinctively.
"Can you please let go? I'd like to change and shower before the entire
family gets here."
"I'm not ready to let go. I missed this way too much. They won't be here for
a while if you want to—"
"Ew. No, thank you. You got what you wanted. Now, please get off me."
"Ew? I don't think that's what you were saying—"
"Yeah, yeah. You can get me off by looking at me. Great, you made me
orgasm and passed it off as consent. Good for you. I’ve heard this shit
before. I want to go shower and get your smell off me." This time I did
manage to rip out of his hold.
Ajax quirked an eyebrow. His amused expression made me want to murder
him.
I searched for my clothes, aware from my peripheral vision that Ajax was
eyeing my naked body like it was his last supper. I wrapped a bedsheet
around me in a bath towel fashion. I had barely found my shoes when Ajax
rose from the bed and pulled on his boxers. He’d pounce on me again if I
weren’t out of here soon. I could feel it.
Fuck it. I’d rather sprint to my room in this bedsheet. There was no one else
around.
Leaving my clothes behind, I purposefully marched toward the bedroom
door with my shoes in hand. I unlocked it, swung the door open with
force… and immediately wished I hadn't.
The walls closed in on me as I gripped the door with one hand and bunched
the bed sheet with the other. This was a nightmare. Any second, I'd wake up
to realize I was anywhere but here.
My world spun. Life would never be as it was.
Ajax joined me at the door and put an arm around me, further solidifying
the truth of this nightmare. Standing in front of me were my parents, Ajax's
parents, Mia, and… Reid.
October 2015.
"Come on, Rave. Do you really not know?"
I dumbfoundedly stared at Mia as she further shattered my world with her
next bit of information. As if there weren't enough reasons, her news
hammered the nail into the coffin over why I should have never started
anything with Ajax, nor could it happen again.
"Reid’s been in love with you since the day you guys were born."
*
End of Book 1!




